 Sugar-futures prices fell on indications that the European beet sugar crop might be bigger than last year's.  The October delivery declined 0.23 cent a pound to 13.90 cents a pound.  F.O. Licht, the West German sugar statistical firm, in its latest estimate of the European beet sugar crop for the 1989-90 season that began Aug. 1, projected that output for all of Europe would amount to 32.3 million tons, up from almost 30.1 million tons in 1988-89.  Western European production was estimated by the firm at 18.3 million tons, up from 17.9 million tons last season.  But Licht said that the output by European Community nations would drop to 14.7 million tons from 14.8 million last season.  Thus, the firm said, less sugar would be available for export from the European Community than was last year.  Production in Eastern Europe will total 14 million tons, compared with 13 million tons last year, Licht said.  Soviet Union output will rise to 9.5 million tons from 8.9 million tons last year.  Higher production is also expected in most Eastern European countries, the report said.  The firm said weather in the Soviet Union had been excellent.  As a result, that nation may have more sugar than it did last year, which could reduce import needs, Licht said.  One analyst observed that the October futures contract had shown an inability to sustain advances at a price higher than 14 cents a pound.  Yesterday, the price rose to 14.18 cents before falling back, he noted.  Another analyst, Bernard Savaiko of PaineWebber, New York, said traders regard the sugar market as basically bullish, but they're afraid to buy contracts.  "There won't be a significant change in attitude until Third World countries are willing to pay high prices that have been created by the delicate balance" of supply and demand, Mr. Savaiko said.  Until that happens, he said, futures traders will be reluctant to aggressively buy contracts.  One major factor keeping less financially developed countries from buying is that sugar is a dollar-traded commodity, he said.  That means it is very expensive in terms of the countries' local currencies, he said.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Futures prices of soybean contracts closed mixed, and corn contracts closed slightly lower.  According to Victor Lespinasse, a floor broker with Dean Witter Reynolds, Chicago, futures prices have settled into a narrow trading range this week because rainy weather in the Midwest is reinforcing projections for near-normal harvests this fall.  "We are in a state of equilibrium for the time being," he said.  In the next few weeks, weather will probably have less of an effect on futures prices because the crops will have passed the stage in which their yields are the most sensitive to rainfall.  One of the few developments in the market was a projection by a Brazilian newsletter that the amount of land planted with soybeans this fall in Brazil, a major soybean exporter, will drop from last year's level because of higher fertilizer prices.  Wheat-futures prices rose slightly in the wake of news that Egypt is buying 400,000 metric tons of U.S. wheat.  ENERGY: Petroleum futures were mostly lower following a report from the Department of Energy that showed a surprisingly large increase in U.S. crude oil inventories.  West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery declined 19 cents a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange to settle at $18.60.  November crude also fell 19 cents a barrel, and the December contract was down 20 cents.  Heating oil also weakened in U.S. futures trading.  Unleaded-gasoline futures were mixed, although the September contract increased 0.22 cent to settle at 54.15 cents a gallon.  The strengthening wasn't enough to pull up crude oil.  But in spot and futures markets outside the U.S., crude oil prices were flat to slightly higher.  COPPER: Futures prices continued their rise.  The September contract ended with a gain of 2.65 cents a pound at $1.305.  Traders are closely watching as the September price edges closer to its life-of-contract high of $1.315, set March 7.  December achieved a new life-of-contract high of $1.273, before easing somewhat to end at $1.27 for a gain of 2.60 cents.  According to one analyst, demand for copper is strong while "every producing country is suffering from one production problem or another."  As of the end of July, U.S. rod and mill use of copper, which accounts for twothirds of U.S. copper consumption, rose 10% from the year-earlier level, the analyst said.  In addition, he said, Japanese buying of copper continues to be active.  Technically, the market is strong, the analyst said, and if the September contract succeeds in breaking above the $1.32 level, the next resistance point won't be until $1.46.  Three-quarters of workers at Centromin's Cobriza copper mine went back to work as Peru's nationwide mining strike entered its 11th day, Knight-Ridder reported from Lima.  The report also said Southern Peru Copper Corp.'s Cuajone mine remained paralyzed.  Workers at the company's Ilo smelter held a meeting to discuss the strike, but all turned up for work yesterday, according to the report.  COFFEE: Futures prices gave up more than they had gained on Wednesday.  The December contract declined 4.34 cents a pound to 80.4 cents.  Selling was sparked by a comment by Jorio Dauster, president of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, which supervises the coffee in that country, according to one New York coffee dealer.  Mr. Dauster was reported to have said that Brazil had succeeded in selling seven million bags of coffee in the past seven weeks and that it was doing well without export quotas.  Mr. Dauster was also quoted as saying that Brazil was seeking to expand production of washed coffee, the dealer said.  An analyst said he had heard that Brazil wouldn't reinstitute its retention tax, in which the number of bags of coffee retained by the government is in proportion to the amount of coffee exported.  That more coffee would be allowed to leave the country was regarded as a price-depressing factor, the analyst said.  The dealer said he wasn't aware of any action on the retention tax.  So what's next?  The last traces of the October 1987 stock market crash were erased at 4 p.m. yesterday when the Dow Jones Industrial Average closed at a record high of 2734.64.  Now come higher highs, say the bulls.  No, it's recession and retreat, counter the bears.  Clearly the bulls hold center stage these days, albeit with an important caveat: The optimism of most of them is tempered by a measure of caution.  Take, for instance, Ned Davis, a technical analyst who says the stock market's rally "is like a runaway train -- don't stand in front of it."  Mr. Davis says: "You can't predict the top, but we're near to it.  We think the trend is your friend, but you have to say it's a mature friend.  It's a high-risk phase of a bull market."  When Merrill Lynch market strategist Charles Clough Jr. surveys the horizon, however, he likes what he sees: "The interest-rate situation is benign; there's been a sense of cautiousness all the way up in this rally; the corporate sector has been a tremendous source of liquidity through buy-outs; and confidence in the economy has been restored."  That isn't to say that stock prices can continue the pace they have set since the rally began last November, he warns.  "We're not suggesting that it can continue with this sort of power, but if the interest-rate climate remains benign and inflation continues under control, one would have to presume that the market can go higher."  He also says the leaders in the next phase might be the only bunch of stocks that have been real laggards so far -- the generally smaller issues that trade on the American Stock Exchange and in the over-the-counter market.  "We're rotated through most of the large-capitalization stocks," he says, noting that at one time or another, growth stocks, interest-sensitive stocks, consumer stocks and cyclical stocks have been the rally leaders.  "Now maybe the rotation will move to the secondary stocks."  Elaine Garzarelli, head of sector analysis at Shearson Lehman Hutton, dismisses lingering fears among some investors that with stock prices at all-time highs, another crash is likely.  Ms. Garzarelli, one of the few analysts who correctly called the 1987 crash, says the formula she used for that prediction is giving an "all clear" signal for further gains in the Dow Jones industrials.  "My forecast is 2850 to 3000 by year-end," she says.  "It doesn't have to crash again."  John Connolly, chief investment strategist at Dean Witter Reynolds, is even more optimistic: "Our target is 3200.  Things can go wrong, but right now it looks like we have inflation being tamed, rates going down and no recession."  He points out that these are ideal conditions for cyclical stocks and that 20 of the 30 stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average are in that economy-sensitive category.  Investor caution in the wake of the stock market crash actually is one reason that many analysts and money managers remain bullish.  They're encouraged because they don't see the sort of wild-eyed speculative fever that seemed characteristic of the market when the industrials hit their pre-crash high Aug. 25, 1987.  "There are still many, many institutions and scores of individual investors who have stock positions that are very low," says Marshall B. Front, executive vice president and head of investment counseling at Stein Roe & Farnham Inc., a Chicago-based investment counseling firm.  "Many of them, seeing the market break through its all-time high, are likely to give up on the idea that they will be able to add to positions on a significant correction, and they're likely to commit some cash in the period immediately ahead."  "This is the bears' last stand," says Peter Canelo, chief portfolio strategist at Bear Stearns & Co.  "It's hard to believe we're in a bear market when we're hitting new highs."  Mr. Canelo says basic measures by which stock prices are judged point to higher highs.  The price-earnings ratio of the Dow Jones industrials, for example, stands at slightly more than 12.  In an economy that isn't headed toward recession, "12 times earnings is a bargain," says Mr. Canelo.  He suggests that the ratio could easily go as high as 15, which would translate to a Dow Jones Industrial Average of 3100 or 3200.  Yet not all the bears are willing to roll over and play dead.  David Bostian, president of Bostian Research Associates, recently advised his conservative pension fund clients to get out of stocks, based on his reading of the economy.  His economic model is predicting a recession, probably within five or six months, and he says many investors are making a mistake by relating the stock market's performance to the economy's performance.  "The thing people need to think about is that we had the crash two years ago and didn't faze the economy," he says.  "Now everybody is thinking the economy is going to be okay because the stock market is up.  But they had better not assume that the stock market is going to pull the economy out of a recession."  And some bears simply think it has all been too much, too fast.  "You're in an irrational zone," says Barry Schrager, a money manager and technical analyst.  "I'm going down to 50% equities.  Anytime the Dow is up over 30% in a 52-week period you're in a danger zone."  Joseph Granville, who has been advising clients over the past few weeks to raise cash aggressively by selling stocks, says he wasn't surprised that the Dow Jones industrials made a new high.  But that doesn't change his advice.  "All that the new high told you is that we haven't reached the top yet," he says.  "But you could see it in 24 hours or 48 hours or 72 hours.  What I'm saying is that all my work points to a big downer in September or October."  But Mr. Granville says he isn't using the word "bear" to describe his market outlook.  "I'm predicting a move of 200 to 400 points down," he says, "but the word I'm using is 'detour.' I don't think the bull market is over.  I'm looking for a very important buy signal in November."  Peat Marwick has won away one of two Canadian firms of Ernst & Young, vaulting over Ernst & Young as the biggest world-wide accounting firm.  Peat said it has signed a memorandum of understanding proposing a merger of Thorne Ernst & Whinney into a new firm, Peat Marwick Thorne in Canada.  With combined annual fees of more than $450 million, Peat Marwick Thorne would be the biggest Canadian accounting firm.  Approval by partners of Thorne and Peat is expected within the next two weeks.  By acquiring Thorne, Peat Marwick's international organization, KPMG, boosts its annual world-wide revenues to $4.3 billion compared with Ernst & Young's $4 billion without Thorne.  "Merging with Thorne more than doubles our size in Canada, which we consider a strategic economic force in North America," said Larry Horner, chairman of Peat.  At the same time, Ernst & Young, recently formed by the merger of Ernst & Whinney and Arthur Young & Co., said that Clarkson Gordon, the Canadian member firm of Arthur Young's international organization, will join Ernst & Young.  Accounting business specialists say that the defection of Thorne from the Ernst & Young merger illustrates the fragility of the latest round of international mergers among accounting firms.  When Peat merged with KMG Main Hurdman two years ago, Thorne, which was part of KMG, defected to Ernst & Whinney and now returns to Peat's fold.  Arthur Andersen & Co. is discussing a possible merger with Price Waterhouse, which several years ago wasn't able to complete a merger with Deloitte, Haskins & Sells because of opposition from Price's British partners.  Ernst & Young has been struggling to combine Thorne and Clarkson Gordon -- an effort that has finally collapsed with the defection of Thorne to Peat.  Gundi Jeffrey, editor of the Bottom Line, a Canadian accounting publication, noted that Thorne is managed on a regional basis while Clarkson is run centrally.  "It was a big cultural clash that prevented getting the two firms together," she said.  Ernst & Young isn't happy losing Thorne because of its prestigious client list, which includes Thompson Newspapers Ltd., Wardair International Ltd., Loblaw Ltd. and George Weston Ltd.  But Ernst & Young points out that Clarkson's clients include such big companies as Bata Industries Ltd., Falconbridge Ltd., Verity Corp., Polysar Ltd., Canada Packers Inc. and Noranda Inc.  "Sure we're upset because we wanted a merger {of Thorne and Clarkson} in Canada," said Jesse Miles, co-chairman of Ernst & Young International, the world-wide organization of Ernst & Young.  "But we recognize that the cultural differences between two firms and their approach to practice made them unable to reach an agreement.  You can't force these things."  In Japan, Mr. Miles said that Ernst & Whinney's affiliate, Showa Ota, and Arthur Young's affiliate, Asahi Shinwa, will be working out a merger over the next year or so.  "Regulatory approval is necessary and takes some time there," he added.  Ernst & Young said that its merger had been approved by affiliate firms in the United Kingdom, Australia, Belgium, France, the Netherlands, Spain and Portugal.  This comprises 85% of the revenue and personnel of the combined firms, it added.  Asked why Clarkson rather than Thorne stayed with Ernst & Young, Mr. Miles said, "Clarkson had been part of Arthur Young for 45 years whereas Thorne had only been part of Ernst & Whinney three years.  With the longer associations, it made sense for Clarkson to stay with us."  The Bottom Line's Ms. Jeffrey noted that Thorne audits 152 of Canada's top 1,000 public firms while Clarkson audits 145.  In U.S. currency, Thorne's annual revenue is $224 million, and it has 4,100 employees, including 518 partners in 57 offices.  Clarkson's annual revenue is $197 million, and it has 3,400 employees, including 440 partners in 29 offices.  Peat said that combining its practice with Thorne in Canada creates a network of 5,600 staff members, including more than 800 partners in 61 Canadian cities.  Ernst & Young in Canada after being joined by Clarkson will be the third biggest Canadian firm after the affiliate of Deloitte Haskins & Sells and Touche Ross & Co., which recently merged into Deloitte & Touche.  Holiday Corp. is checking out of the Holiday Inn business.  The hotel and gambling giant agreed to sell its Holiday Inn division, the world's largest hotel chain, to Bass PLC of Britain.  In the purchase, Bass said it plans to issue stock worth about $125 million, and will retire or assume about $2.1 billion of Holiday debt.  Holiday said it will spin off the rest of the Memphis, Tenn., company, which includes three other hotel chains and hotel-casinos in Las Vegas, Nev., and Atlantic City, N.J., among other cities.  Holiday holders will receive about one-quarter of a share of Bass stock, a $35 cash dividend and one share in the new company for every Holiday share held.  And the new Holiday, which will be renamed, says it will get to focus on its newer, faster-growing hotel chains like Embassy Suites and Hampton Inns.  The sale is the end of an American icon.  Holiday Inn was begun by entrepreneur Kemmons Wilson more than 35 years ago and was the U.S.'s first motel franchise.  Its big green sign became a national symbol of a reliable night's stay.  But in recent years, the chain had seen its mass-market niche eaten away by specialty hotel chains that catered to the elderly, the wealthy and business travelers.  That, among other things, is why analysts think Bass is paying a generous price for Holiday Inn, in what is believed a major, and risky, diversification out of the beer business in Britain, where it is the biggest player.  Based on yesterday's trading in Holiday shares, though, analysts value the restructuring at $84 to $90 a share.  The company said it couldn't assess a per-share value.  It's unclear how Holiday management will fare.  After Nov. 11, Holiday's senior executives, who own about 5% of the company, can immediately double their holdings under an earlier recapitalization plan -- but only if they agree to sell the company.  A Holiday spokesman said the details haven't been worked out yet to determine the effect of the new restructuring plan on that provision.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Holiday jumped $6 to $83.  Bass is no stranger to hotels or to Holiday Inn.  Bass owns a small European chain, and in March agreed to acquire Scott's Hospitality Inc.'s Canadian hotel unit, Commonwealth Hospitality Ltd.  Since 1987, Bass has agreed to buy eight European Holiday Inn hotels, more than 100 other Holiday Inn hotels outside North America and 13 of the company's U.S. hotels in three southeastern states.  Still, the latest purchase would represent a grand diversification from the company's core business of U.K. brewing, allaying recent criticism for relying too heavily on beer and Britain.  Bass said the Holiday interests it would acquire had operating profit of $133 million for the year ended May 26 and had net assets of about $560 million.  Holiday accounts for 10% of all hotel rooms in the U.S. and more than 25% of rooms in the middle-price range, Bass said.  Among other things, Bass will acquire 55 Holiday Inn hotels owned or leased by Holiday Corp., as well as franchise agreements, joint venture agreements and management contracts covering about 1,400 more hotels throughout Mexico, Canada and the U.S.  But expanding into North America's midrange hotel market, which suffers from oversupply, is fraught with risk.  Holiday Corp. is abandoning the best-known brand name in the middle-market category, but is also leaving a hotel segment growing more slowly than the rest of the industry.  Between 1987 and 1988, room demand in the so-called motor-hotel segment, dominated by Holiday Inn, grew only 2.2%, according to Smith Travel Research, which tracks the industry.  But demand for all-suites hotels and economy motels, two business lines that the spin-off company will retain, soared about 10% each.  Holiday Inn also has been squeezed into a precarious pricing position, in which it is being attacked from above by discounting and promotions at more upscale chains, and from below by rate-cutting discount hotels.  "They're being hemmed in," says Randy Smith, president of Smith Travel Research.  And because Holiday Inn's hotel operations are heavily franchised, Bass's ability to control the upgrade and development of the properties -- many of which are older -- could be hampered.  "Bass is kind of stuck with having to get franchisees to pour money into the properties," says Douglas K. Shifflet, president of D.K. Shifflet & Associates, a market research firm.  "It's hard to get everybody to do that adequately."  Traders in London also apparently were skeptical.  In late trading yesterday on London's Stock Exchange, Bass was quoted at #11.04 ($17.37), a drop of 43 pence.  In a statement, Bass Chairman Ian Prosser said the planned purchase is "a substantial move forward in the Bass strategy of becoming international" in each of its core businesses.  Bass's spokesmen wouldn't comment on the acquisition agreement.  Under the restructuring, the spun-off company will be run by senior managers of Holiday Corp., and its shares are expected to be traded on the Big Board.  The company would be the world's 12th-largest hotel company based on the number of rooms.  The transaction, expected to be completed around year end, requires approval from Holiday and Bass shareholders, as well as consent from gambling regulators, among other things.  The restructuring of Holiday is the second metamorphosis the company has undergone since 1986.  In a move meant to fend off raiders, the company increased its debt in a recapitalization to $2.8 billion; about $1.4 billion of the Holiday debt that Bass will assume is publicly traded.  Holiday subsequently sold hotels at unexpectedly high prices, while retaining the management contracts on them, analysts have said.  Using proceeds from the sales, Holiday has cut its debt about $900 million.  The new company plans to finance the $35-a-share special dividend with borrowings.  Based on about 26 million common shares outstanding, the total amount to be financed has an indicated value of $910 million.  Analysts praised Holiday management for devising a generous payout overall under the proposed restructuring, designed to be tax free to holders.  The analysts also were pleased the company was unloading the hotels in the mature portion of the industry, while retaining the high-growth businesses.  Separately, pre-announcement trading in Holiday securities has spurred inquiries by the New York Stock Exchange and the Chicago Board Options Exchange, officials at those exchanges said.  On Wednesday, the day before the announcement of the Bass agreement, Holiday's stock soared $7.875 on the Big Board and its options were among the most active and advancing issues on the CBOE.  A Big Board spokeswoman said the exchange is making a "routine" analysis of the trading.  A CBOE spokesman said, "We're doing a routine inquiry as we would do with any unusual activity in volume or price movement in the underlying stock."  ---  Barbara Toman contributed to this article.  The U.S. Court of Claims barred the Energy Department from awarding a 10-year, $1 billion contract to a consortium led by a Bechtel Group Inc. subsidiary that the agency had selected for the job.  The court was acting on a complaint filed by TRW Environmental Safety Systems Inc., a TRW Inc. subsidiary that had bid unsuccessfully for the contract.  TRW alleged that the selection process violated federal law and that the choice of the Bechtel-led group was based on criteria different from what the department said it would use, according to a lawyer for the company.  Under the court ruling, the department is barred from awarding the contract described in the solicitation to any company other than TRW.  Late yesterday, a spokeswoman said the department was disappointed with the court's decision and would review its options, including whether to solicit new bids for the work or appeal the ruling.  Bechtel, in a statement, said, "We're very disappointed in the judge's decision."  The company declined further comment, saying its officials hadn't yet read the entire ruling nor conferred with the Energy Department.  The consortium, led by Bechtel Systems Management Inc., was to provide systems engineering, development and management services for the department's high-level nuclear-waste disposal program.  Under that program, the department is evaluating the suitability of a proposed waste repository site in Yucca Mountain, Nev., about 100 miles northwest of Las Vegas.  The department spokeswoman said she didn't believe the ruling would significantly hinder the department's ability to proceed with short-term studies of the suitability of the site.  A spokesman for TRW said "we continue to stand ready to provide the systems engineering and management expertise to help solve the critical national problem of high-level nuclear-waste disposal."  TRW filed its complaint last December following the Energy Department announcement that it had selected the consortium.  Stocks vaulted to record levels in a rally powered by buy-out speculation, program trading, and investor enthusiasm.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average topped its old record of 2722.42 set Aug. 25, 1987, by more than 12 points, closing up 56.53 to 2734.64.  It was the largest one-day gain in the average since May 12.  Trading activity was heavy, as well.  New York Stock Exchange volume of 225,520,000 shares was the highest since June 16.  Gaining stocks on the Big Board swamped declining issues by 1,180 to 359.  After weeks of bond-tagging and dollar-watching, the stock market shook off the influence of other markets and climbed on its own strength.  Bonds, whose decline during the past two weeks dragged stocks with them, rose slightly yesterday in light trading.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury issue closed up one-eighth point, or $1.25 for each $1,000 face amount, to yield 8.15%  Rumors out of the Chicago currency-futures pits that the Federal Reserve and the Bank of Japan would lower interest rates in a coordinated move knocked the dollar down against the yen and the mark.  But analysts said the market was thinly traded, and, later, the rumors were discounted and the dollar recovered.  Investors' appetite for stocks blended powerfully with rampant takeover speculation and a huge amount of computer-guided buy programs.  Though the economic scenario is vastly different now compared with 1987, New York Stock Exchange traders saw many of the same internal forces driving the market yesterday that were evident two years ago.  "Specialists told me that there were more programs than they've seen in months, perhaps more than they've seen in years," said veteran Big Board floor trader Arthur Cashin Jr.  Takeover speculation hit a frenetic pitch in stocks such as International Flavors & Fragrances, Phillips Petroleum, K mart, and Walt Disney, despite denials from most of those companies.  The aggressive speculation was yet another reminder of 1987 for many traders.  Many of the takeover names are in Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, which helped drive the stock-index futures markets up.  Starting at midday, stock-index-futures buying fed on the strongly surging underlying stocks, traders said.  In turn, arbitrage-related buy programs bulldozed the market through key technical levels that invited even more speculative buying.  "The market was building a momentum of its own," said Donald Selkin, head of stock-index-futures research at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  While the market lurched up during the lunch hour, rumors circulated of big asset-allocation programs, which switch rapidly between bonds, stocks, and cash, and foreign buying.  But the rumors were difficult to nail down.  "Our model has not changed; I don't know what is pushing stocks higher," said Brenda Oakley, executive vice president at Mellon Capital Management, an asset allocator.  Traders at foreign-oriented firms said their order books weren't heavy.  "The Japanese are not in this," said Thomas R. Walsh, vice president at Nikko Securities Co. Added Kenneth Ducey, head trader at S.G. Warburg & Co.: "Our clients were in this morning, but they were leaning to the sell side."  Though the takeover speculation was termed "scary" by some Big Board traders, others say the market is on a sound footing that should encourage additional investment.  Joseph Plocek, an economist with Xerox Corp.'s securities-research subsidiary, McCarthy, Crisanti, & Maffei Inc., said second-quarter economic data recently has been revised upward, which means the economy is stronger that first indicated.  "Second-quarter GNP growth is going to be revised up about a percentage point," predicted Mr. Plocek.  "That's mainly due to consumption and exports.  We're entering the third quarter with a head of steam and that's good for stocks."  Also, many investors are beginning to believe that U.S. stocks are one of the most profitable places to invest.  While the bond markets are getting buried under a huge amount of new supply, the amount of stock outstanding continues to dwindle.  "We do believe that equities are the best of the three principal assets," said Steven Einhorn, partner at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  He says he believes stock prices will yield 12% to 15% during the next year.  That's many percentage points above his projected returns on bonds.  Takeovers will continue to diminish the supply of stocks, Mr. Einhorn predicts.  In the first half of 1989, about 3% of the market's 14% gain was because of buy-outs and other kinds of stock retirement, Mr. Einhorn estimates.  Now many traders and analysts expect the market to move to even higher ground, if only on the enthusiasm of investors that the market has fully recuperated from the 1987 debacle.  "Today we broke a psychological barrier and finally allayed concerns about the crash," said James Maguire, chairman of the specialist firm Henderson Brothers Inc.  "The retail investor is with us, but he's gone to the money manager.  He's with us in a new form."  However, will investors maintain confidence in the market as it reaches into record ground day after day?  And what if they become frightened by the fact that the market is being driven upward -- reaching a record nearly two years later to the day -- by many of the same forces that propelled it higher in August 1987, and down that following October?  "It is my opinion that October 1987 will have difficulty repeating itself," said Stanley Shopkorn, head of equity trading at Salomon Brothers Inc.  "I still don't think the U.S. equity market is overvalued."  In individual stock activity, hotel and casino issues, a frequent focus of takeover speculation in recent months, took back that role after Holiday said it would sell Holiday Inns for $2.23 billion to Bass PLC of Britain.  Holiday rose 6 to 83 and traded as high as 88 7/8; several arbitragers contacted by Dow Jones Professional Investor Report valued the deal at $80 to $90 a share, while Montgomery Securities gave it a value of $90 to $100 a share.  Elsewhere in the group, Marriott gained 1 1/2 to 40 1/2, Caesars World went up 3/8 to 39, Golden Nugget climbed 1 1/2 to 29 7/8 and Ramada firmed 1/4 to 14 1/4.  Prime Motor Inns advanced 1 1/2 to 37; the company posted improved earnings for the June quarter.  The interest in the sector boosted ITT, which owns the Sheraton hotel chain; the stock rose 1 7/8 to 63 7/8.  But Hilton Hotels, which has already put itself up for sale, dropped 5/8 to 104 5/8.  International Flavors & Fragrances closed up 5 at 69 1/4 after soaring to a session high of 77 1/2 in early trading.  Traders said there were rumors that a West German company was interested in a takeover; the U.S. affiliates of Bayer AG and Hoechst AG, both cited as possible bidders, declined to comment.  The company said it hadn't been approached by any suitors.  Takeover speculation boosted three stocks that were among the Big Board's most active: K mart, which rose 2 3/8 to 43 7/8 in composite trading of 3.2 million shares; Phillips Petroleum, which advanced 2 7/8 to 28 1/8 on 3.6 million shares, and Maytag, which tacked on 1 1/2 to 26 1/2 on 2.8 million shares.  Other heavily traded Big Board issues included three new additions to the S&P 500: Cyprus Minerals, which gained 1 7/8 to 30 1/8; Carolina Power & Light, which climbed 1 3/8 to 42 5/8, and Greyhound, which rose 5/8 to 36 1/8.  Stocks added to the index typically draw buying at the outset from managers of so-called index funds, or portfolios designed to mirror the movements of a specified market measure.  Among the Dow Jones industry groups, precious-metals stocks fared the worst.  Hecla Mining fell 1/4 to 13 5/8, Battle Mountain Gold lost 1/4 to 13 1/2, Homestake Mining dipped 1/8 to 13 3/4 and American Barrick Resources eased 1/4 to 26.  Only two other groups included in the Dow equity index were lower: consumer services and water utilities.  The former reflected a drop in Service Corp. International, which said it holds a 9.5% stake in Diversified Energies.  Service Corp. fell 3/4 to 18 1/2; Diversified rose 1 3/4 to 34 1/4.  Monsanto surged 1/4 to 122 1/2.  The company said its NutraSweet unit is planning to nearly double production capacity over the next two years for NutraSweet brand sweetener.  Campbell Soup, which disclosed plans for a major restructuring, gained 1/2 to 53 1/2.  The company said it would take a $344 million charge this year for the restructuring, which calls for eliminating about 2,800 jobs and closing four U.S. plants.  Harnischfeger climbed 1 to 18 7/8.  The company posted net income of $19.5 million for the fiscal quarter ended in July, compared with a $14.5 million loss a year earlier.  The American Stock Exchange Index jumped 3.75 to 381.45, just below the alltime record of 382.24 set on Aug. 10.  Volume totaled 16,480,000 shares.  Texas Air dipped 1/4 to 20.  First Boston said investors should take profits in the stock, which has risen about 25% this month.  Harley-Davidson jumped 1 3/4 to 29 7/8.  Harris Associates, an investment advisory firm, increased its stake in the company to 12.9%.  (See related story: "Back From the Crash: Small Investors Are Getting Back Their Confidence Here and There" -- WSJ Aug. 25, 1989)  Two years ago, it seemed like a cowboy's dream: To cap Montana's centennial celebration, a band of 100 or so horsemen would drive 10,000 cattle down the 60-mile trail from Roundup into Billings.  But Montana's Centennial Cattle Drive is generating enough problems here to make even a John Wayne blanch.  For one thing, the first half of the planned route runs down heavily traveled U.S. Highway 87.  For another, the entourage expected to show up on Labor Day to join the five-day drive now includes 3,000 mounted celebrators (some on rented horses) from as far away as Japan, nearly 300 antique wagons, 400 reporters from around the world, a bunch of big-name country-music performers and a sponsor that plans to distribute beer along the way.  That's not to mention spectators -- 150,000 of them, according to some forecasts.  Around these parts, people have begun referring nervously to the drive as the "Cowboy Woodstock."  "This thing has begun to roll awfully fast," says Stan Lynde, a Billings cartoonist who dreamed up the event with a friend as a way to publicize the state's 100th anniversary this year.  The 58-year-old Mr. Lynde says the idea came from reading "Lonesome Dove," Larry McMurtry's best-seller about a fictional cattle drive from Texas to Montana.  Of course, in "Lonesome Dove" the cowboys are attacked by Indians.  Latigo Corp., the nonprofit concern that is staging the cattle drive here, hasn't encountered that problem yet.  But it has certainly run into a swarm of others.  The drive is being openly derided by some Billings residents, who see it as a throwback to the cow-town past of Montana's largest city.  Edgy ranchers have refused to let the drive cross their land after it leaves Highway 87, forcing last-minute route shifts.  The organizers also had to make a hasty change in their destination when they discovered that the cattle, cowboys and the rest would end up at the same park where a group of Montana Indians had a permit to conduct a tribal art show and business fair.  Latigo nearly scrubbed the whole event early this month when the project's hired director, Daniel Lee, who had been a White House staffer during the Carter administration, abruptly quit.  Mr. Lee's departure left the project's planning a shambles.  Latigo officials argue that Mr. Lee didn't understand "the cowboy mystique" of Montanans and tried to organize the drive as if it were a political campaign.  "He was a guy from Georgia trying to tell Montana ranchers how to handle cows," says Kim Kuzara, Mr. Lee's replacement. (Mr.  Lee was somewhere on the road between Billings and Georgia, according to his mother, and couldn't be reached for comment.)  So it has fallen to Mr. Kuzara, a 41-year-old reporter for the Roundup Record-Tribune, to press on doggedly with the project.  Groggy after a stretch of 18-hour days, Mr. Kuzara and his small volunteer staff have been laboring in Latigo's makeshift headquarters in a former department store here, trying to locate, among other items, 650 tons of hay and 200,000 gallons of water.  Such supplies will have to be trucked in for the drive's two- and four-legged participants, who will be traveling through near-desert conditions.  Mr. Kuzara is also struggling to get the event's finances under control.  The organizers estimate that the drive's cost, originally figured at under $500,000, has ballooned to more than $1 million.  "We're using a dynamic budget," says Mr. Kuzara.  "It changes from day to day."  Then there is the cattle problem.  Latigo officials scaled back the size of the herd to 3,500 to make it more manageable.  But Mr. Kuzara still isn't certain how much room it will take up on Highway 87, which is only 21 feet wide in some spots.  Punching a series of figures into his calculator, Mr. Kuzara figures that a single animal will occupy a space four feet by eight feet.  Multiplying that by 3,500, he arrives at an estimate that the herd will take up about eight-tenths of a mile of road.  "Obviously," he says, "those cows aren't going to line up like soldiers.  This would be humorous if it wasn't serious."  State and local officials say they expect the drive to stretch over seven miles or more -- that is, if the cattle don't stampede.  "We're dealing with a total unknown here; no one has ever done anything like this before," says Musselshell County Sheriff Brian Neidhardt.  The sheriff and his staff of six patrolmen are charged with policing the first half of the drive's route, where it traverses the rolling Bull Mountains and spills out onto flat, open range.  Sheriff Neidhardt has deputized 20 helpers and lined up empty jail space in surrounding counties in case trouble fills Musselshell County's 14 cells.  But he says that, while he worries about range fires and drunken crowds getting in the way of emergency vehicles, he is most leery of the drovers' plan to start the drive by running more than 100 longhorn cattle down Roundup's five-block main drag.  He shudders as he conjures up visions of skittish longhorns stampeding through the town's storefronts, with television crews from as far away as Moscow and Tokyo recording the chaos.  "People," he notes, "keep saying, 'It'll work out.  Just think of all the publicity.' Roundup will be known for years, all right, but maybe not the way we'd like to be."  Here in Billings, where the drive will finish up by coming down the city's busiest thoroughfare, officials are also bracing themselves.  "We haven't had a cattle drive here for 100 years," says the city's police chief, Ellis E. Kaiser, whose 100-member force will be on full alert for the drive's arrival.  "The only thing I know about cows is that you get milk and steaks from them."  Latigo officials dismiss the worries.  "I don't know of anybody who doesn't want this to happen," says James Scott, a Billings banker who heads Latigo's board.  "Like at Woodstock," he adds, "everybody will just have to work together."  Mr. Scott says Latigo has rounded up 100 professional cowboys from across the state to move the cattle and recently signed on several national sponsors to ease the project's cash crunch.  One of them, Anheuser-Busch Cos., will have a "beer wagon" rolling right next to the drive's chuck wagon and will distribute its brew from large tents at each night's campsite.  In the interest of safety, Latigo scrapped a plan to have the cattle ford the Yellowstone River, which is high for this time of year.  Officials also plan to hand out rules to riders (each of whom is paying $40 for the privilege of taking part), warning that they will be tossed off the trail for drinking before 5 p.m., using profanity or carrying guns.  Mr. Scott acknowledges, however, that his group won't have any control over spectators.  Nor, he concedes, does anyone really know how many people will show up for the extravaganza.  Out on the trail, William Kramer, who grazes a small herd of his own Angus cattle near Highway 87, snorts with laughter when a visitor stops to ask about the drive.  "It's one of the dumbest things I've ever heard of," says the 71-year-old stockman.  "Those cows ain't just going to pussyfoot down that highway.  They're going to run.  And I'm going to sit here and watch and laugh."  Nobody disputes the Customs Service's need for enough product information to apply proper tariff rates.  But now the service wants to know what part of the body is to be covered by imported panties.  And how imported spring water was manufactured.  And what kind of collar stiffener is used on imported shirts.  None of this information, sought in new rules under consideration at the agency, will change the tariff on an imported product.  Importer groups are protesting the rules as bureaucratic overkill.  "Many of the proposed requirements are so burdensome and unnecessary as to result in a paperwork nightmare," asserts Harvey Isaacs, counsel for the National Customs Brokers and Forwarders Association of America.  Because of these complaints, the Customs Service is contemplating a longer wait before deciding whether to put the rules into effect.  "This is simply our first cut," explains Betsy Durant, chief of the service's quality-assurance branch.  "We've no intention to be arbitrary or capricious in enforcing these standards."  Customs officials say they're just trying to improve the quality of invoicing and reduce the incidence of revenue loss caused by badly written entries.  Some of the invoices the service gets are "rotten," Mrs. Durant claims.  However, many importers charge that a number of the proposed additions are too complicated and just don't make much sense.  Alan Lebowitz, an attorney for many merchandising firms, says garment imports that require one or two pages of information would require as many as 13 under the proposal.  "Can you imagine trying to get a garment maker in China to fill in 13 pages of information like this?" he asks.  "Good luck."  Garment buyers would have to report whether imported briefs or panties are disposable as well as what parts of the body they are to cover.  Apparel importers also would have to report whether garments have buttons or zippers and whether they're water-resistant.  Cheese importers, accustomed to identifying products simply as Romano, Gouda, Parmesan or the like, would have to say whether the cheese is in the form of wheels, loaves or flakes.  Robert Leo, an attorney for the American Association of Exporters and Importers, says auto importers could be among those most seriously affected.  "Some of their invoices now go to 40 pages for each shipment of cars and their parts," he says.  "If the proposed standards go into effect, you'd have to multiply that by a factor of five."  The new standards were originally intended to go into effect in stages, starting Oct. 1.  But that timetable may slip a bit as the Customs Service mulls what it calls certain "refinements" to the original guidelines.  Service Corp. International said it has acquired a 9.5% stake in Diversified Energies Inc.'s common shares outstanding for investment purposes.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Service Corp. said it holds 1,514,300 shares, acquired in the open market from April 17 to Aug. 21 for about $44.7 million.  Service Corp., a funeral services concern based in Houston, said it "has no present intent to attempt to acquire control of the company."  Diversified Energies is a holding company based in Minneapolis.  East Germany apparently plans to stem a recent exodus of its citizens fleeing to the West by imposing tougher restrictions on travel to Hungary, diplomatic sources say.  But Western analysts warn that such restrictions could heighten tensions in East Germany and ultimately cause more popular unrest there.  The disclosure of stricter travel restrictions was made in the West German newspaper Die Welt.  Citing unnamed Western diplomatic sources in East Berlin, the paper reported that the East German government planned to restrict travel to Hungary drastically starting next Friday.  A spokesman for the East German Foreign Ministry, Denis Ruh, called that report "an outright lie," and said the government's policy in granting Hungarian travel visas hadn't changed.  "These lies are being spread in Cold War style to create confusion and to slander East Germany," Mr. Ruh was quoted as telling the East German news agency, ADN.  However, several Western diplomats confirmed the substance of the Welt report.  They noted, moreover, that according to their information, the East German government already has instituted stricter travel policies.  They said there has been a sharp reduction in the number of visas granted for Hungarian travel, although they declined to provide specific numbers.  "We have strong indications of more restrictive practices in granting travel permission to Hungary," said one adviser to West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl, speaking on the condition he not be named.  Some 200,000 East Germans currently are on vacation in Hungary.  East Berlin reckons that as many as 10,000 probably won't return once the vacation season ends this month, the adviser noted.  The sudden exodus this summer of refugees from East Germany has sparked a diplomatic crisis between Bonn and East Berlin.  More than 2,000 East Germans have fled to the West in the past four days alone in the largest wave of emigration since construction of the Berlin Wall in 1961.  Western analysts expect the emigre count to swell to more than 100,000 this year as East Germans flee a country whose leaders scorn the reforms now taking hold in neighboring Communist states such as Poland and Hungary.  Many of these refugees have poured through the recently dismantled border barriers between Hungary and Austria.  Others have sought refuge in West German diplomatic missions in Eastern Europe.  Just yesterday, for instance, 108 East Germans who occupied the West German Embassy in Budapest were allowed passage to the West at dawn.  The Hungarian state news agency said the government took the action "on the basis of humanitarian considerations."  Meanwhile, more than 250 East Germans continue to occupy West German missions in East Berlin and Prague, Czechoslovakia.  Whether the East German government can extricate itself from its current crisis is a question that confounds Western analysts.  However, most agree that East Germany is lurching toward crisis.  Above all, it is a crisis that the nation's aging leaders seem utterly confused by.  With the rest of the East bloc swept up in a tide of economic and political change, East Berlin has steadfastly stuck to its old ways.  Yet the government, led by 77-year-old Erich Honecker, appears almost incapable of governing at a time that demands new ideas.  Even the economy, which once clanked along in dependable fashion, seems to have turned against the leadership.  Although East Germany remains the East bloc's most successful economy, the nation is beginning to experience Polish-style shortages in many commodities, including fruits and vegetables.  As the nation's economic performance has slipped, so, too, has the relative value of its currency.  Fifteen East German marks now buy one Deutsche mark; as recently as two years ago, the black market exchange rate was five to one. (Officially, the two German states observe a one-to-one parity.)  The economic troubles, coupled with growing dissatisfaction at the government's stiff resistance to democratic reform, have greatly fueled discontent.  Western diplomats fear that further restrictions in travel will only add to the feelings of frustration.  Weintraub Entertainment Group said it made a $5.3 million interest payment that had been due July 30 on $81 million of 13% subordinated debentures.  The payment was made under the 30-day grace period allowed before the company could be declared in default.  The closely held entertainment concern based in Los Angeles, which has had a string of box office failures, had said it was working out a plan to make the payment.  Weintraub said earlier this month that it hired former Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. junk-bond chief Michael Milken to assist its investment banker, Bear, Stearns & Co., in devising a plan to pump in capital.  Chips & Technologies Inc., San Jose, Calif., adopted a plan to protect shareholder interests in the event of an attempt to acquire control of the producer of computer chips.  The plan gives shareholders certain rights under certain circumstances.  The rights will be issued on the basis of one right for each share of common stock to holders of record Sept. 6.  The company said the rights won't become exercisable until a group or individual has obtained or sought to obtain without board approval more than 20% of the company's shares outstanding.  Honda Motor Co. said pretax profit in the first quarter ended June 30 fell 40%, to 28.390 billion yen ($198.4 million) from 47.329 billion yen a year earlier, despite record revenue.  The Tokyo-based company said sales rose 3% to 919.491 billion yen, a record for a three-month period, from 894.242 billion yen.  "Although automobile sales increased in the U.S., fiercely competitive U.S. market conditions increased selling expenses, which adversely affected earnings," the company said.  It also cited higher depreciation expenses because of increased capital expenditures in the year ended March 31.  Capital expenditures last year rose, Honda said, because of an engine plant it built in Ohio.  It said earnings were also under pressure as motorcycle sales fell in Japan and North America.  These factors caused operating profit to drop 17% to 40.3 billion yen.  Net fell 42% to 15.195 billion yen, or 15.56 yen a share, from 26.028 billion yen, or 26.49 yen a share, a year earlier.  Net per U.S. share fell to 31.12 yen from 52.98 yen.  Earnings per U.S. share for the corresponding period a year earlier were restated to reflect a 5-for-1 split in April 1988.  Planetary scientist Reta Beebe smiles.  The Voyager 2 spacecraft, sailing toward Neptune, beams back to Earth a clear photograph of a bull's-eye-like object almost directly atop the blue planet's south pole.  The New Mexico State University researcher and her colleagues figure the bull's-eye is a sort of weird Neptunian weather -- maybe a vast cyclone unknown on Earth.  She allows herself a wild surmise: "Has it occurred to you that God favors the southern hemisphere?  She puts fierce weather patterns there throughout the solar system."  Voyager 2's flight through the solar system, one of science's greatest adventures, was rushing to a climax early this morning as the spacecraft was scheduled to brush past Neptune and its moon Triton, 2.8 billion miles from Earth.  Voyager 2 photographs so far reveal Neptune as a planet turbulent in its weather and delicate in the faint rings that encircle it.  Triton is an enigma -- a lumpy snowball of a moon, coated in parts with organic material that may be similar to the stuff from which life sprung long ago on Earth.  Each Voyager 2 finding makes headlines and the evening news.  But what doesn't make the evening news is the story behind the discoveries: How scientists labored for months to unravel the mysteries of Neptune and still remain baffled.  How discoveries announced one day were contradicted soon after by a new batch of photos.  How egos collided.  To learn more about discovery -- especially how science gets done amid a crush of media attention -- this reporter watched members of the spacecraft's imaging team, who analyze Voyager's thousands of photos, in the days leading to the Neptune fly-by.  "I used to think that the idea of space probes was to answer questions," says Andrew Ingersoll, a California Institute of Technology atmospheric physicist who leads the imaging team's efforts to analyze Neptune's atmosphere.  "That's hopeless.  You invariably raise more questions than you answer."  For space scientists, the Neptune fly-by is a time of great excitement, all-nighters, scientific breakthroughs, heady attention by the press and frayed tempers.  Taped to a wall in the imaging team's cramped offices is the so-called Neptune pledge: "We, the undersigned, hereby apologize for any sharp words, testiness or downright rudeness which might occur during the heat of the Neptune encounter."  Significantly, only half the 31 team members bothered to sign.  The Voyager workload is divided among 157 scientists and scads of graduate students, who work on 11 teams corresponding to the spacecraft's 11 main groups of instruments.  The imaging unit, with 31 scientists, is by far the largest team.  Their instruments -- two television cameras -- are the spacecraft's most important features.  The spacecraft's magnetometers, for instance, may make important measurements of Neptune's magnetic field, but the lovely pictures of the blue planet fire the imagination, dominate the news and draw appreciative "oohs" in meetings of Voyager scientists.  The imaging team consists of space-exploration veterans who have guided previous unmanned expeditions to Mars, Venus and the moon, and younger scientists who have devoted their careers to Voyager.  None is more enthusiastic than Richard Terrile, a boyish 38-year-old astronomer at the National Aeronautics and Space Administration's Jet Propulsion Laboratory here.  To Mr. Terrile, Voyager's discoveries show the fabulous diversity of nature and inspire hope that life exists elsewhere in the galaxy.  Before Neptune, Voyager 2 and its twin robot spacecraft, Voyager 1, explored Jupiter, Saturn, Uranus and their moons -- revealing worlds that are sometimes terrifying, sometimes tantalizing.  One Jovian moon, Io, rumbles with fierce geysers that spew hot sulfur gasses 190 miles into the atmosphere.  Another Jovian moon, Europa, houses an ocean beneath a thick shell of ice.  Seed Europa with microorganisms and it may sustain life, scientists say.  "Voyager has shown us we aren't using our imagination enough," Mr. Terrile says.  Approaching Neptune, Voyager 2's images outstrip the imagination.  Four months ago, Voyager 2 discovered a swirling cyclone on Neptune nearly the size of Earth, which imaging-team members grandly named the Great Dark Spot.  By all rights the storm shouldn't be there, says Mr. Ingersoll, staring at a Voyager photo of a dark oval on the southern half of Neptune surrounded by wispy white clouds.  But there it is anyhow, almost mocking him.  Storms are driven by energy from the sun and by heat from a planet's interior, he explains.  But Neptune hasn't much of either.  Indeed, the planet's energy output is 500 times weaker than Earth's.  Even so, the Great Dark Spot whips across the planet at 400 miles per hour and may never dissipate.  This paradox ties Mr. Ingersoll in knots.  Either Neptune is a kind of perpetual motion machine -- which is clearly impossible.  Or the planet is friction-free and has no way to slow the winds -- which is clearly implausible and which doesn't explain how the winds started blowing in the first place.  "The puzzle gets greater and greater the more turbulence we see," he says.  The tension increases as Voyager nears Neptune.  With only a week to sift through thousands of Voyager photos, atmospheric scientists on the imaging team can't possibly figure out why storms form on Neptune.  So they use Voyager's ever-crisper images to try to describe the storm precisely.  But even that runs into trouble.  Ms. Beebe, the New Mexico State scientist, complains that the clouds in the Great Dark Spot vanish from photo to photo, making it torturous to calculate how fast the winds swirl inside the storm system.  One small victory: A Voyager image on Wednesday morning shows cloud shadows for the first time, making it possible to calculate the elevation of the storm system from Neptune's gassy surface.  That should help explain how the storm works and how it differs from the titanic cyclone on Jupiter dubbed the Great Red Spot.  Imaging team scientists cheer when they see the shadows appear on the computer monitor displaying the newest Neptune photos.  With hundreds of reporters hungry for news, the pressure to announce discoveries is enormous -- and sometimes leads to errors.  At 1:30 in the morning of August 11, Mr. Terrile, the JPL astronomer, is wakened at home by an excited project technician.  He is told to rush to the laboratory to see the latest batch of pictures of Neptune's rings.  On his way out the door, he pauses to grab a bottle of champagne from his refrigerator, either to toast the discovery or clobber somebody.  A few hours later he breakfasts on champagne and popcorn.  In the photos is evidence of something entirely new in the solar system -- planetary rings that stretch only part way around a planet.  Mr. Terrile says these "ring arcs" may be a kind of cosmic tombstone marking the spot where a small moon smashed into an asteroid or comet, spreading debris partly around the planet.  JPL announces the discovery of ring arcs a few hours later.  But 10 days later (this past Monday) Voyager is about nine million miles closer to Neptune, and its photos begin to tell a different story.  A new ring, looking thinner than a cheap gold chain, encircles Neptune entirely, while Mr. Terrile's ring arc clearly spreads much farther around the planet than first believed, and may yet prove to be a full-fledged ring.  In public, imaging-team leader Bradford Smith, a University of Arizona astronomer, defends the ring-arc discovery by saying that the arcs -- if that's what they are -- are still significant because they are shaped different from other rings in the solar system.  But in private other team members wear smirks that say, "I told you so."  By the time Voyager's last photos of Neptune arrive this weekend, predicts Verner Suomi, a University of Wisconsin planetary scientist, the ring-arc discovery will collapse.  "The chance of a ring-arc is zero," he says, because there is no celestial mechanism to keep the space debris from spreading around the planet.  Mr. Terrile and his colleagues haven't yet conceded, and busily plot the arc, showing it inexplicably clumpy in one part, gossamer thin in another.  A combative spirit is a hallmark of the Voyager project.  The project was conceived in 1970 as a Grand Tour of the outer planets, including Pluto.  But NASA was forced by budget pressure to halve the number of spacecraft to two and to aim only for Jupiter and Saturn.  Nevertheless, it launched the spacecraft in 1977, when the planets were aligned so the probes could reach Uranus and Neptune -- if the one-ton spaceships worked properly for eight years longer than they were designed to operate.  Surprisingly, both craft held up.  Voyager 1, after visiting Jupiter and Saturn, now searches for the edge of the solar system.  Voyager 2, after completing its encounter with Neptune, will join its sister ship's search.  Both ships are outfitted with a gold-plated phonograph record inscribed with sounds of the Earth-birds warbling, thunder crackling and Chuck Berry wailing "Johnny B. Goode" -- for the edification of any alien that may someday intercept the craft.  Every day, Voyager soars about 900,000 miles closer to Neptune and its moon Triton, and every day the face of Torrence Johnson, the harried JPL scientist who leads the imaging-team's Triton group, grows more perplexed.  Triton is one of the solar system's great mysteries.  Seen from Earth, Triton -- as big as the Earth's moon -- is a point of light that emits signs of methane gas.  For planetary scientists, methane worlds hold clues to understanding how life forms.  Methane is nature's simplest hydrocarbon, a starting point for life.  Billions of years ago on Earth, scientists believe, simple hydrocarbons probably were bombarded by radiation, heat and solar energy, producing ever-more complex organic material.  At some point this chemistry yielded the material from which life formed.  Scientists hope that a chemical process similar to early Earth's occurs today on Triton. (No one expects life will form there, though.  Its temperature of about minus-350 degrees is almost certainly too frosty even for the hardiest species.)  A month ago, when Voyager was too far from Triton to take detailed pictures, Carl Sagan, the Cornell University astronomer and best-selling author who is a member of the imaging team, rhapsodized about Triton as a world with a liquid-nitrogen ocean and rich in primordial organic sludge.  He even named the red sludge "tholin," from the Greek word for "muddy."  "All the chemicals are elaborate poisons," he added, making Triton even more intriguing.  But Voyager 2's photos so far show a far different world.  Instead of oceans, there's ice colored pink by radiation, and maybe snowdrifts and glaciers.  Instead of vast fields of "tholin," there are small patches of reddish material and, unexpectedly, a region colored blue. (The only blue material in the solar system on a world like Triton is Earth's ocean -- but Triton is too cold for water.)  "Triton looks like a lovely Boston snow a few days after a snowstorm," marvels Mr. Johnson, the busy head of the imaging team's Triton group.  "You see piles of white snow and patches where the dirt shows through."  Maybe Triton is more like a huge comet than a model for early Earth, he speculates.  Early this morning, at about 5:10 EDT, Voyager 2 was scheduled to pass within 23,600 miles of Triton, snapping photos furiously as it sailed by.  Mr. Johnson and other members of the imaging team will crowd around the monitors displaying the photos, hoping crisper shots will untangle Triton's mysteries.  This will be Voyager's last performance -- one of the greatest finales in the history of science.  Hutchison Whampoa Ltd. said profit edged up 4% to 964 million Hong Kong dollars (US$123.5 million) in the first half from HK$931 million a year earlier.  The Hong Kong trading, property, shipping and investment group said per-share profit rose 7% to 32 Hong Kong cents from 30 Hong Kong cents a year ago.  Taking into account extraordinary gains of HK$2.454 billion (US$341.3 million), compared with HK$603 million a year earlier, per-share net more than doubled to HK$1.13 from 50 Hong Kong cents.  Hutchison's board proposed an interim dividend of 16 Hong Kong cents a share, up from 13 Hong Kong cents a year ago.  Nestle S.A., Vevey, Switzerland, and a group of dissident shareholders have agreed to take a dispute over a capital increase and proposed changes to the company's bylaws to the Swiss Supreme Court, a lawyer for the shareholders group disclosed Thursday.  Michel Renaud, a lawyer for Convention d'Actionnaires de Nestle (CANES), said the two sides agreed late last month to seek a ruling from the high court on a dispute over the food concern's plans to issue shares to be held in reserve by the board, as well as a bylaw change that would limit to 3% the number of registered shares that can be held by one person or legal entity.  Assets of money market mutual funds continued to climb in the week ended Wednesday, surpassing the previous week's record by $2.68 billion to reach $343.22 billion.  "The steady buildup of money market fund assets continued unabated last week, especially in individual accounts, even though the changes in yields and yield spreads were miniscule," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist at the institute.  "The yields . . . after trending down since mid-April, stabilized over the last four weeks, and given the uptick in rates on instruments comprising their portfolios, are likely to start edging up," Mr. Dreyer added.  The institute is a Washington-based organization of mutual funds that tracks 463 taxable funds.  Yields slipped a bit in the week ended Tuesday, according to Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass.-based newsletter that tracks 387 taxable funds.  The average seven-day yield was 8.66%, down from 8.68% the previous week, according to Donoghue's.  Total fund assets rose for the ninth consecutive week.  The institute said 141 institutional funds increased assets by $51 million to $85.58 billion; one institutional fund was added to the list in the recent week.  The 227 general purpose funds tracked by the institute added $1.04 billion to $109.78 billion, and the 95 broker/dealer funds added $1.59 billion to $147.85 billion.  Galactic Resources Ltd. said it is negotiating with Teck Corp. the sale of part of Galactic's 40% stake in Far Southeast Gold Resources Inc., the operating company of a gold and copper exploration project in the Philippines.  Galactic wouldn't disclose the size of the stake to be sold or the price the company is asking.  Teck said only that talks were continuing and declined to elaborate.  Galactic said it has discussed the possible sale with "a number" of other companies but considers Teck the front-runner.  Both mining companies are based in Vancouver, British Columbia.  The proposed Philippines project, in which Manila-based Lepanto Consolidated Mining Co. holds a 60% stake, is expected to cost about US$300 million to develop, a Galactic official said.  About 30% of the project costs would be covered by equity investment, of which Galactic is committed to put up 40%, or about US$36 million.  Galactic expects outside financing for the project to be arranged by year end.  The official indicated that funding the full 40% stake was more than Galactic could comfortably handle.  Swedish telecommunication group Telefon AB L.M. Ericsson's first-half pretax profit more than doubled to 1.67 billion kronor ($252.8 million) from 633 billion kronor for the same period last year.  Sales rose 31% to 17.89 billion kronor from 13.61 billion kronor a year ago.  The pretax profit is more than 20% better than the 1.35 billion to 1.47 billion kronor predicted by analysts.  Ericsson said it expects pretax profit for the year to exceed three billion kronor.  The company said per-share profit for the first half more than doubled to 22.84 kronor from 8.79 kronor.  Texaco Inc. said it will pay the second of two promised special dividends Sept. 18 to stock of record Sept. 5.  Shareholders will receive $3 in cash and $1 of Series C preferred stock for each common share owned.  The preferred will have a stated value of $50 a share, so a holder of 50 Texaco common shares will receive one full share of the preferred.  The company said holders will be allowed to buy or sell fractional shares to round to the nearest whole share.  Texaco will pay a quarterly dividend on the preferred starting Dec. 31 at an initial rate of at least 7.85%.  The rate will be reset quarterly, based on certain Treasury rates.  The oil company had paid the first of the two promised special dividends, $4 in cash, to holders June 19.  Standard & Poor's Corp. yesterday gave the new preferred stock a rating of single-A.  The agency also affirmed Texaco's senior unsecured debt at single-A, subordinated debt at single-A-minus and commercial paper at A-1.  Texaco currently has about $6.5 billion of long-term debt outstanding.  Canada's National Energy Board approved most of TransCanada PipeLines Ltd.'s plans to spend 593 million Canadian dollars (US$503.9 million) to expand its natural gas pipeline connecting Alberta with eastern Canada and U.S. export markets.  The expansion, planned to be completed by Nov. 1, 1990, would allow an additional 196 billion cubic feet of gas to reach customers in Canada and the U.S. in the 1990-91 contract year.  About 85% of the gas would go to U.S. buyers, TransCanada said.  TransCanada had applied for regulatory approval for a C$709 million expansion, C$42.6 million of which was approved during the course of a hearing.  The National Energy Board denied TransCanada's request to build a pipeline loop to protect certain customers from interruptions in supply, and postponed a decision on another extension in southwestern Ontario.  Last month, TransCanada filed plans with the National Energy Board to spend an additional C$1.2 billion on pipeline expansions in 1991 and 1992.  The bulk of the 897.5 million cubic feet of gas a day would go to two U.S. pipelines proposing to ship gas to the U.S. Northeast.  TransCanada plans to amend the 1991-92 expansion plan as a result of the rejection of several gas-supply contracts by Canadian producers earlier this month.  A spokesman said those revisions won't be made for several weeks.  TransCanada is 49.1%-owned by BCE Inc., a Montreal-based industrial holding company.  The Transportation Department warned consumers who want ticket refunds because of canceled flights due to the Eastern Airlines strike that they must file claims with the bankruptcy court in New York by Thursday.  Eastern filed a plan on July 21 for cash refunds to people holding unused tickets bought before the airline filed for reorganization under bankruptcy-law proceedings on March 9 and trimmed flight schedules.  The department said many ticketholders may not know about the deadline next week because the Texas Air Corp. unit and the court had advised consumers to wait to file claims until a procedure for doing so was established.  The refund plan must still be approved by the bankruptcy court.  But Eastern ticketholders, as well as people with unresolved baggage or cargo claims for flights before the bankruptcy-law filing, should mail a claim form to the court by midnight Thursday, the department said.  A county-wide appraisal review board has ruled that Sematech isn't entitled to tax-exempt status and will have to pay an estimated $2.3 million in local property taxes.  The Travis Central Appraisal District review board earlier this week concluded that the semiconductor consortium's member companies hope to use the research generated by Sematech to bring in commercial prfits.  The board said Sematech thus operates for businesses rather than acting as a public agency.  By an 8-4 vote, the board rejected Sematech's claim that it operates primarily for the public good.  Sematech was set up as a non-profit group to make U.S. semiconductor companies more competitive with their Japanese counterparts.  Half of Sematech's $200 million funding comes from Congress and the remainder comes from its 14-member companies.  Because of the ruling, Sematech must pay property taxes on leased land, buildings and personal property valued at about $120 million.  The company can appeal the review board's decision to a state court.  Peter Miller, Sematech chief administrative officer, said the group is studying its options and hopes to make a decision next week.  Micro-electronics and Computer Technology Corp., another high-technology research consortium based in Austin, operates as a for-profit company and already pays local taxes, a county official said.  A federal grand jury here indicted Sealed Air Corp. on charges of violating a U.S. ban on exports to Libya, according to the local federal prosecutor.  The U.S. attorney for Minnesota said the indictment charges a former Sealed Air unit with illegally exporting 434 drums of an anti-corrosion chemical to Libya in April 1986, in violation of an executive order issued earlier that year.  The order, which is still in effect, prohibits U.S. concerns from sending any exports to Libya.  The prosecutor's office said the indictments charge Sealed Air's former Cortec Corp. unit -- which was sold to private investors in 1988 -- with concealing the destination of the shipment by having a U.K.-based subsidiary act as the purchaser, with proceeds then channeled back to Sealed Air in the U.S.  Cortec, now closely held, is based in St. Paul.  Sealed Air, a Saddle Brook, N.J., maker of protective packaging, owned Cortec from 1985 to 1988.  It faces total fines of as much as $2 million on the four counts in the indictment.  Sealed Air said in a statement that no criminal law had been violated.  It said the product involved in the 1986 shipment "has no military use, involves no technology that could harm U.S. interests and is commercially available outside the U.S. from any number of suppliers."  Attorneys for the company called the indictment "outrageous" and said they will fight the charges.  Why didn't history repeat itself?  In the months immediately after the October 1987 crash, some investors were alarmed that the stock market seemed to be following the pattern of the great crash of 1929.  If the aftermath of the 1987 crash followed the 1929 pattern, they worried, the market was in for a long, painful descent, because after a brief "suckers' rally" in 1930, the Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 86% by 1932.  The new crash, they feared, could help generate a severe recession or worse.  But the market has departed decisively from the 1929-30 chart since mid-1988, rising steadily during the period and yesterday bursting through its record high of 2722.42 to close up 56.53 points at 2734.64.  The reason, says David Dreman, a New York money manager: "The economic circumstances couldn't have been more dramatically opposite."  Elaine Garzarelli, director of sector analysis at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., cites four major economic differences between now and 1929-31.  Back then, the money supply was shrinking, industrial production and wholesale prices were falling, and protectionism was cutting into U.S. exports.  In the 1987 crash, by contrast, the Federal Reserve quickly began pumping up the money supply, easing credit and lowering interest rates to steady the economy.  Another reason the economy hasn't fallen into a recession is that the 1987 crash was far less traumatic for the national psyche.  Paul Tudor Jones, chairman of Tudor Investment Corp., says the 1929 crash "had a much greater impact on Main Street than this crash."  During the 1920s, almost the entire nation seemed to be captivated by the bull market.  Looser margin rules allowed individual investors to play the market with borrowed funds.  During the bull market of the 1980s, the action has been dominated by institutional investors and pension funds.  "The average investor is now a much smaller part of the market," says Dennis Jarrett, chief market strategist at Kidder, Peabody & Co. "When you had a major debacle with so few participating, people didn't feel the loss of wealth, which in itself can cause a recession."  In contrast, it was the institutions' own dabbling in leveraged instruments, such as stock-index futures, that helped precipitate the 1987 crash.  The futures were part of a hedging strategy called portfolio insurance.  This trading strategy was intended to protect pension funds' stock portfolios against market declines, but instead it seemed to increase selling pressure during the 1987 crash.  The resilience of the U.S. economy has been the main reason for the stock market's recovery since October 1987.  One of the reasons the stock market rose as high as it did during 1987 was that it was anticipating an enormous increase in the level of corporate earnings.  Some say the market's recovery simply reflects the fact that earnings gains materialized without any major increase in inflation.  Between 1986 and 1989, earnings for the 500 companies whose stocks are in Standard & Poor's Corp.'s index have risen 62%.  At its 1987 peak, Mr. Dreman says, the market was trading at 22 times earnings for the previous 12 months.  After the crash, that ratio had shrunk to about 12.  Now, even though the market has rebounded by more than 50% from its 1987 lows, the ratio remains close to its post-crash level, and slightly below the historical average.  The market's resilience suggests the limitations of technical analysis.  On Wall Street, such analysis attempts to predict future stock price movements based on a close comparison with past stock charts.  "This is one of the oldest kinds of things that people do," says Mr. Dreman.  "They think if you've got one crash and then you have a second crash, the circumstances afterward should be very similar.  But there's really no reason for circumstances to be similar."  After the 1987 crash, he says, "the charts looked similar for three months -- and then they totally blew out on the upside."  Philippine Airlines' 15-year domestic monopoly is over, but its new rival is facing a tough task establishing itself as a creditable challenger.  Aerolift Philippines won government approval this month to fly scheduled routes to 23 Philippine cities, including routes serviced by Philippine Air.  But the license is provisional and, industry analysts say, largely dependent on Aerolift's obtaining adequate aircraft.  Indeed, the fledgling carrier is in desperate need of aircraft -- it has five planes that among them can carry only 83 passengers.  Until late last year, the airline's terminal amounted to no more than a wooden counter, a few plastic chairs and a scale, tucked into a remote hanger at Manila's huge airport complex.  The carrier has set up a departure lounge in a small building rented from the government.  But the bare-bones approach is unlikely to be abandoned soon.  "There has been no money," says majority stockholder and President Benjamin Solis, who shares an office with a computer operator.  The Philippine government frequently voices its commitment to increase competition.  But the Aerolift saga shows how difficult it is in the Philippines to break business monopolies.  Mr. Solis founded Aerolift as a charter operation in 1983.  His initial capitalization was five million pesos ($241,000).  In February 1988, Aerolift won government approval to serve a few scheduled routes, which weren't being served by Philippine Air, between Manila and smaller cities.  Those routes were mostly to resorts, but they included a small airstrip in Cebu, the second-largest Philippine city.  Since then, the new carrier has been given the right to use Cebu's main airport.  With fares generally higher than Philippine Air's and with its largest plane seating just 19 passengers, Aerolift has appealed mostly to business executives, expatriates and tourists rather than ordinary Filipinos, travel agents say.  The carrier projects sales this year of 114 million pesos, about 5% of Philippine Air's domestic revenue in the year ended March 31, 1988, the latest figure available.  A Philippine Air spokesman says the carrier "welcomes competition," although he concedes the larger airline opposed opening up the domestic market unless Aerolift "shares in unprofitabile routes."  The spokesman says 60% of Philippine Air's domestic routes are unprofitable.  With the government's approval, Aerolift hopes to expand rapidly.  It plans to lease three Boeing 737s by April, says Mr. Solis, a former Philippine Air pilot.  He cautions, though, that the new airline can't afford to "go up against PAL on a one-to-one basis."  He maintains that studies show a "hidden potential of at least 30%" more air traffic, which he hopes to tap.  Mr. Solis is searching for additional equity partners to join him and a few other businessmen with a stake in the airline to help finance its expansion.  The carrier is also negotiating with several airlines, including Air France and Saudi Arabian Airlines, for possible marketing links.  Meanwhile, discussions are being held with the Philippine venture-capital fund of Hambrecht & Quist of San Francisco.  Mr. Solis says Hambrecht & Quist Philippine Ventures Inc. could take an equity stake of slightly less than 10% in the carrier.  Eduardo David, director of Hambrecht & Quist's Philippine unit, says the airline has a fighting chance of surviving.  "All things being equal, Aerolift can do extremely, extremely well," he says.  However, several industry analysts aren't convinced that Aerolift can raise enough cash to mount a major campaign against state-owned Philippine Air.  Another question mark is the domestic airfare structure, which Mr. David describes as being "among the lowest in the world."  But Sen. John Osmena, who heads the Philippine Senate's transportation committee and has been an outspoken critic of the larger airline's monopoly, says Philippine Air has asked for rate increases.  If they are granted, they would give Aerolift's operations a critical boost.  But Mr. Solis fears that Philippine Air will in fact attempt to undercut the new carrier with lower fares.  News Corp., Rupert Murdoch's Australian-based media company, reported operating profit rose 6.9% to 496.5 million Australian dollars (US$380.6 million) in the year ended June 30 from A$464.5 million a year earlier.  It said operating profit before interest was "very strong" in the U.S., Australia and Hong Kong, and partly reflected inclusion of results from acquisitions.  But increases largely were offset by higher interest expense, preference dividends and lower foreign-exchange trading gains.  Per-share earnings rose to A$1.58 from A$1.50.  After accounting for extraordinary earnings from asset sales, News Corp.'s overall profit jumped 147% to A$1.16 billion from A$471.7 million.  Revenue rose 30.9% to A$7.88 billion from A$6.02 billion.  Operating profit before interest and tax expenses rose 47.3% to A$1.45 billion, with U.S. operations contributing the equivalent of A$608.6 million.  Extraordinary earnings rose to A$667.1 million from A$7.2 million.  Directors said the Fox Broadcasting Co. programming unit in the U.S. incurred a "very small loss" -- a "substantial improvement" -- and proved its viability.  Richard Dortch, former PTL vice president, was sentenced to eight years in prison and fined $200,000 yesterday for helping to bilk millions of dollars out of the television ministry's followers.  Mr. Dortch's sentence was part of a plea agreement made in exchange for testimony against his former employer, PTL founder Jim Bakker.  Mr. Bakker's trial on the same fraud and conspiracy charges is scheduled to open Monday.  The prosecution charged that one building project alone generated $74.2 million but only $11.4 million was spent on construction at the uncompleted facility.  Despite the Dow Jones Industrial Average's rise to a record close yesterday, a question that has dogged the market for two years -- whether individual investors have regained confidence -- remains far from answered, interviews with scores of small investors show.  Some individual investors exulted at yesterday's record and said they expect further big gains.  But many said they remain wary about the outlook and haven't been active in the rally or plan to take profits soon.  Anthony Zorovic, an investor in the downtown San Francisco offices of Charles Schwab & Co., was one of the optimists.  Shortly after the market closed, he uncorked a bottle of champagne and began filling a dozen Styrofoam cups.  Lifting one, he shouted, "To another all-time high soon]"  A native of Yugoslavia who now lives in San Francisco, Mr. Zorovic said the market is headed higher, and he admonished the small crowd gathered around him: "For those who have to run back to work, forget your work -- we make more money here."  Not everyone was convinced.  Many of these part-time investors said they remain leery about the market.  "This is no place for an individual investor," said Robert Hoover, a retired oil executive.  "It's great for crapshooters, but I can't afford to gamble."  Mr. Hoover stopped in to check on his stable of stocks, he said, but he hasn't added to his holdings during this rally.  Some others who have been buying plan to take profits.  "Tomorrow the market will go down," said Fernand Rosset, a 62-year-old San Francisco resident.  "Profit-taking, that's what I plan to do."  Bruce Whitaker, who works for a leasing company, entered the market after the 1987 crash.  He doesn't expect the rally to last.  "The next way to make significant money is on the down side," he said.  In Chicago, many investors stopped in to the Fidelity Investments' storefront brokerage on LaSalle Street to check on their holdings and see if they could figure out why the market was up.  Wayne Geschke, a bank employee, was typical.  "I just want to know what caused" the rally, he said.  Mr. Geschke added that he plans to hold his "small" diversified stake of stocks.  Oliver Landreth, an elevator mechanic, also plans to "just sit by and watch."  Mr. Landreth "sold utilities high" in 1970 and has watched two mutual funds and some gas stocks ride the market roller coaster since then.  He's making no additional purchases now, he said.  The new high was "a long time coming," according to Jack Purdy, a senior broker at the Fidelity office.  But business was no heavier than usual at the Fidelity window.  "The small investor is still not back," Mr. Purdy said.  "And when he returns, it'll be time to sell."  Outside, however, Charles E. Wilcox, a financial manager, was exuberant, shouting, "The market's back]" Mr. Wilcox is "definitely" back in the market himself, but his investments are "hedged with 40% in Treasury notes."  A block away on Clark Street, business was good at Harlan J. Berk Ltd., dealers in rare coins and antiquities.  Mr. Berk, who said his customers "buy what isn't being chased," said he has seen market "joy rides" before and isn't optimistic about the upturn.  "As junk-bond issuers can't make their interest payments, there will be a reckoning," he said.  Elsewhere downtown, big lines formed for tickets to the Illinois Lottery's Saturday Lotto drawing.  The jackpot was raised yesterday to $42 million.  At the Charles Schwab office in Dallas, the day was routine, according to the manager, Molly Dickson.  Many customers who visited the office weren't even aware that a record had been set.  Schwab's local office managers were surprised at the scanty reaction.  When the market was setting records in 1987, they recalled, a throng of ticker-tape watchers gathered.  Ms. Dickson offered this explanation for the lack of activity: "What we're seeing is the return of the individual investor.  But they're playing it cautious, and they're playing it smart."  Yesterday's big gains were significant for Billy Duff, a 56-year-old Dallas investor and victim of the oil slump.  His company was liquidated two years ago; since then, he's been a full-time investor, and his energy holdings surged yesterday.  "It's nice that energy stocks have turned around," he said.  "I feel fortunate that I've stayed with it all these years.  I've never lost hope."  Now he spends most of his day scanning the tape and talking to brokers at the local office.  "I can't wait for the alarm tomorrow," he said.  At the New York Stock Exchange, traders were hopeful that the record would bring back the small investor, but their optimism was guarded.  "It was a day like any other day -- no big deal," said Peter Mancuso, a specialist with Albert Fried & Co.  "There was no question in anyone's mind that the market would go back to this."  Many of the investors huddled around two Quotron machines in New York's World Trade Center said they had seen market records before and were skeptical that the latest level could be sustained.  As they stood in the Charles Schwab office late yesterday, the investors, many of them elderly, stayed near the machines.  They took turns punching in their stocks, then headed to the back of the line.  They speculated on whether the market would set a record but were quiet about it, seeming more concerned with their own holdings.  Few headed to the phone banks to make trades.  "There are not enough indicators that warrant this type of market.  It's tenuous.  It's fragile," said Jack Ennis, who nonetheless said he has some "highfliers."  "But, of course, I'm happy it's up," Mr. Ennis added.  He says he watches companies individually and, in general, discounts the movement of the market averages.  The record has "no significance whatsoever," said Ray Patel.  Broader indexes, he said, "repeatedly ran over" their highs earlier this year with little hoopla because they aren't so well-known.  Willie Humphrey said he holds only one stock, but had some interest in the index anyway and predicted that it would drop today.  "It's an up-and-down market, a very funny market," he said.  "They sucker you in.  For the index to mean anything, it's got to stay level."  Bob Schmidt, another New York investor, said he is holding on to what stocks he has -- even though he has some big paper gains and hasn't been "terribly bullish" since the summer of 1982 -- because he's waiting for a drop in the capital-gains tax.  "I'm really neutral at this point," he said.  "I don't think the values exist right now."  (See related story: "Thursday's Markets: Programs Also Have Big Effect"-- WSJ Aug. 25, 1989)  General Electric Co. agreed to a minority role in a mobile communications joint venture with Telefon AB L.M. Ericsson of Sweden, the world's largest supplier of cellular phone system equipment.  In doing so, GE hopes to reduce its risks and share Ericsson's technological developments in the booming cellular phone market, a business in which GE has failed to win a leading position after five years of trying.  "We thought this was the most effective way to strengthen the business," a GE spokesman said.  The partnership will provide Ericsson immediate footholds in the U.S. mobile cellular phone and radio markets.  GE says it has between 15% and 20% shares of each market.  Ericsson also gains access to GE's production capacity for cellular phone handsets, which the Swedish company will need in order to expand in the U.S. and keep up with mushrooming sales elsewhere.  Ericsson also will benefit from associating with a company that has a household name in the U.S.  "Combining resources will provide the financial depth and resources to compete in the future," said Lars Ramqvist, an Ericsson executive vice president and chairman of the new venture.  By reducing the risks of expanding into the U.S. cellular phone market, analysts said Ericsson will be better able to afford the cost of trying to penetrate America's conventional telephone switching equipment business.  Fairfield, Conn.-based GE is a technology, services and manufacturing company.  Stockholm-based Ericsson is a telecommunications concern.  The joint venture, Ericsson-GE Mobile Communications, will be owned 60% by Ericsson and 40% by GE, with headquarters in the New York metropolitan area, the partners said.  The companies predicted that the unit, comprising existing operations, will log $1 billion of sales in 1990.  Ericsson products will generate 60% of the venture's sales, GE said.  The companies wouldn't disclose current sales of the merged businesses, either separately or combined.  The merged units include 2,300 GE employees and 2,200 Ericsson employees.  Ericsson units included in the joint venture are in Richardson, Texas; Montreal, Sweden and sales companies in other European countries.  GE units involved include a cellular phone plant in Lynchburg, Va.  The transaction is subject to regulatory approval.  Divi Hotels N.V., said its board agreed to sell two Aruban hotels for $30 million in cash and a $32 million subordinated note.  The buyer of the hotels -- the Divi Divi Beach Resort and the Tamarijn Beach Resort -- is Palmer Group, a newly formed New York investor group led by Frank Palmer.  Mr. Palmer was formerly a senior vice president at VMS Realty Partners, Chicago.  Included with the hotels are $7.5 million in timeshare receivables.  Divi said under the proposed agreement, which is conditioned on its receiving a fairness opinion, it would manage the two hotels under long-term contracts.  Divi said Palmer has a conditional commitment letter from Security Pacific Merchant Bank, London, to obtain funding for the proposed deal.  Divi plans to use proceeds for working capital and to fund completion of projects under construction.  Divi said the parties also agreed that Palmer will be responsible for helping Divi sell its interests in its remaining nine hotel properties, which it intends to continue managing.  "We're hoping in the long run to de-leverage the company and pay down its debt by selling its hotel real estate," Mr. Palmer said.  The proposed agreement calls for Palmer to receive five-year warrants exercisable into 25% of the common stock of Divi and the granting of stock options for an additional 5%.  In addition, Palmer will designate two nominees to Divi's board and designate a chief financial officer and a director of construction.  Mannesmann AG said net income jumped 28% in the first half from a year earlier, bolstered by strong demand for West German capital goods.  The West German engineering concern said net climbed to 179 million Deutsche marks ($92.3 million) from 140 million marks a year earlier.  Sales advanced 9% to 10.263 billion marks from 9.374 billion marks, Mannesmann said in an interim report.  Seven out of Mannesmann's nine divisions posted higher profit.  In the plant engineering unit, earnings were down because the year-earlier profit was bloated by the booking of a major order.  In the Kienzle computer subsidiary, earnings were depressed by sharp price competition and high outlays for development and distribution efforts, Mannesmann said.  Japan's main government spokesman hinted he might resign as he apologized publicly for trying to pay off a woman with whom he had an affair.  The admission was yet another major embarrassment for the long-ruling Liberal Democratic Party and its latest leader, Prime Minister Toshiki Kaifu.  His government was cobbled together only two weeks ago after the party took a pounding in the July 23 elections for the upper house of Japan's parliament, the Diet.  A series of scandals over the past year already has severely eroded public confidence in the LDP and cost the party two governments in the past three months.  Mr. Kaifu had been billed as a "clean" leader two weeks ago when he replaced Sosuke Uno, himself the victim of a sex scandal.  "The Kaifu government was starting to promote clean politics and I was in the position to promote it, too," Tokuo Yamashita, the chief cabinet secretary and Mr. Kaifu's top lieutenant, said at a news conference.  "I am very sorry . . . and apologize to the people."  He said he was "seriously considering" resigning, adding that "a decision has to come before too long."  His remarks came after a weekly magazine, Shukan Shincho, reported that Mr. Yamashita, 69 years old and married for 40 years, early this month offered three million yen ($21,000) to a 26-year-old woman with whom he had an affair.  The magazine said the affair lasted for three years, ending in 1987.  Shukan Shincho suggested the payment, which the woman returned, was meant as hush money to prevent her from disclosing their liaison once Mr. Yamashita became a top government leader.  In the article, Mr. Yamashita was quoted as disputing that claim, saying that he had heard the young woman was in difficult straits and he wanted to help her.  Until recently, though, he said he had been unable to locate the woman.  The circumstances of Mr. Yamashita's affair echo the details of Mr. Uno's sex scandal.  However, some senior Diet members -- alarmed by the idea that they could be hurt politically by their own payments to mistresses -- may have urged Mr. Yamashita to hang onto his job.  "Everybody does it," one legislative aide said.  "Nobody in the LDP would be fit to govern if that were a prohibitive criterion for a cabinet job."  The opposition Japan Socialist Party has been saying otherwise, though.  Led by a woman, Takako Doi, the party scored big gains in last month's election, appealing heavily to women for support.  Until now, Mr. Kaifu has taken steps to bolster his government's credibility.  He required members of his cabinet to renounce affiliations with rival LDP factions.  He promised to provide more details about political funding.  He even tried to appease women voters by appointing two women to the cabinet.  But Mr. Yamashita's uncertainty about pulling out of the cabinet could hurt the party at the polls.  A crucial election for the lower house of the Diet must be held by next July, and the country's major opposition parties already are making plans to assemble a coalition government if the LDP loses its absolute majority.  BASF AG's second-quarter pretax operating profit jumped 31% to 1.29 billion marks ($660 million) from 985 million marks a year earlier on retreating raw-material prices and improving results from its petroleum and agro-chemical divisions.  The world's largest chemical group appeared to be leading the pace in a West German chemical industry that continues to prosper from uninterrupted global economic expansion and currency-related advantages in foreign markets.  BASF's results were up 42% from 905 million marks in the first quarter.  The result brought BASF's first-half operating profit to 2.19 billion marks, up 28% from 1.71 billion marks a year earlier.  "So far, 1989 has not disappointed us at all," BASF executive-board member Ronaldo H. Schmitz said in a speech to London analysts yesterday.  Copies of his remarks were made available here with BASF's interim report.  In trading on the Frankfurt stock exchange yesterday, BASF shares rose three marks ($1.54) to close at 301 marks.  Though brisk BASF profit growth had been widely expected, confirmation of the results was seen as increasing prospects for a 1989 dividend increase, analysts said.  First-half sales rose 13% to 24.46 billion marks from 21.57 billion marks a year earlier.  An increasing share of volume was attributed to the U.S. and other overseas markets, which for the first time exceeded BASF's sales in Germany.  Exports by BASF's German operations rose 14.5% in the first half, to 7.79 billion marks from 6.8 billion marks a year earlier, outpacing a 10.3% rise in domestic sales to 3.9 billion marks from 3.54 billion marks.  The export emphasis is typical of most of Germany's chemical industry, which also includes Bayer AG and Hoechst AG, respectively the world's No. 2 and No. 3 chemical groups in terms of sales.  A recent analysis of the nations's booming chemical sector by the German Economic Research Institute observed that the export share of total German chemical output had climbed to 56% in 1988 from 46% in the mid-1970s.  With an 8% share of the global chemical market last year, Germany still lagged behind a 22% share for the U.S. and 15% for Japan.  Holiday Corp.'s plans to sell much of its hotel business to Bass PLC is only the latest of high-priced hotel purchases by foreign investors that have boosted stock prices and Wall Street expectations as the lodgings business becomes fashionable.  The roster of major domestic and foreign hotel chains that have changed hands in the past two years reads like an industry Who's Who list: Inter-Continental Hotels, Hilton International Hotels, Westin Hotels, and Omni Hotels.  The prices are equally impressive: $2.15 billion for Inter-Continental by Japan's Seibu/Saison Group; $1.07 billion for Hilton International by Ladbroke Group PLC of Britain; an agreement for $540 million for Ramada Inc.'s lodging unit by New World Development Co., a big Hong Kong real-estate developer.  And at least one more big transaction is likely to follow as Hilton Hotels Corp. talks to potential buyers.  Yesterday, Hilton's stock closed at $104.625, off 62.5 cents, in composite New York Stock Exchange trading, which some experts attributed to the structure of the Holiday deal.  "It's putting an element of reason into the valuation of Hilton," said Joseph Doyle of Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. Mr. Doyle said the Holiday deal underscores the possibility that Hilton will hang onto its casinos, which would result in a lower immediate return to shareholders than a sale of the entire company.  John J. Rohs of Wertheim Schroder & Co. said the $2.2 billion Holiday Inn pricetag reaffirms the possibility that Hilton can, indeed, command as much as $120 a share, or about $5.84 billion, for sale of the whole company to an Asian buyer.  Others believe the price could go to $130 a share, or $6.3 billion.  The foreign appetite for big hotel chains stems from the dollar's continuing weakness, a fondness for real estate or well-known properties, more favorable foreign accounting rules concerning goodwill and amortization, and other issues.  But, as Daniel Lee of Drexel Burnham Lambert notes, "there really aren't many other hotel companies around" to buy.  Still, the swarm of high-priced purchases probably will continue to boost lodging stocks whether or not the companies can be sold.  Most remaining U.S.-owned chains such as Marriott Corp., La Quinta Motor Inns and ITT Corp.'s Sheraton Corp. aren't likely to come up for sale.  Some analysts suggest that Motel 6 L.P. of Dallas may be an eventual candidate because of its underlying value.  John Uphoff of Raymond James & Associates says that by cashing in on their pedestrian lodging businesses to concentrate on gambling, Holiday, Ramada, and possibly Hilton may spark a re-evaluation of casino stocks.  Holiday's casinos generated $160.1 million in operating earnings and $781.1 million in revenue last year; Hilton's Nevada casinos produced more than half of its $130.9 million net income and $953.6 million of revenue.  After two rejections, Exxon Corp. received permission from federal and state authorities to try a kerosene-based solvent in the oil cleanup of one area within Alaska's Prince William Sound.  Permission for broad use of Corexit 9580 had been denied because of concern over possible environmental damage.  However, the company said it got approval for limited use by one work crew on Smith Island, an area hit especially hard by oil spilled last spring by a grounded Exxon tanker.  State officials decided any risk posed by the cleaner is offset by the potential cleaning benefit for that area, the Associated Press reported.  Exxon said that if the solvent works well there, it will ask to expand its use to other heavily oiled beaches.  An Exxon official said that Corexit acts twice as fast as current cleaning methods.  Following application of the solvent, workers will spread a fertilizer that speeds up the growth of oil-eating microbes, a process called bioremediation already used at six other sites.  Exxon has purchased 500 tons of material for that process from the French national oil company Societe Nationale Elf Aquitaine.  TJ International Inc. revised a plan aimed at thwarting hostile takeovers.  In adopting a new shareholder rights plan, the company said in a statement that holders of record Sept. 22 may redeem existing rights at five cents each, Oct. 18.  Holders receive new rights immediately.  The new plan guards against partial tender offers, open market accumulations and other ways of gaining control of TJ without negotiating with the board.  The company, which makes specialty building products, couldn't be reached to explain the difference between the old and new rights.  It said the change isn't being made in response to any takeover effort.  The U.S. will impose penalty duties on imports of steel rails from Canada as a result of rulings by the U.S. International Trade Commission and the Commerce Department.  The ITC, on a 3-3 vote, ruled yesterday that the imports are injuring domestic manufacturers.  That was the final step in U.S. consideration of trade complaints that Bethlehem Steel Corp. filed against the imports last year on behalf of U.S. steel producers.  An ITC spokesman said that in such cases, a tie vote results in the imposition of penalties.  Earlier, the Commerce Department ruled that some of the imports were being "dumped" -- that is, sold in the U.S. at prices below the cost of production or the prices in the home market.  The department also found they were being subsidized by the Canadian government, making them subject to U.S. countervailing duties in addition to the anti-dumping duties.  The department said that Algoma Steel Corp. and other Canadian producers have sold steel rails to U.S. railroads, subway systems and other buyers at prices averaging 38.79% below "fair value."  Such "dumping margins" will be the amount of extra import duties to be assessed on the imports.  An ITC official said extra tariffs will be collected on new steel rails supplied by Sydney Steel Corp. to offset Canadian government subsidies.  The Commerce Department concluded earlier that Algoma Steel should be excluded from the countervailing-duty case because its estimated subsidies have amounted to only about 0.24% of the price of its rail exports.  According to the ITC, steel-rail imports from Canada totaled about $10.7 million in 1987 and increased to more than $12 million in 1988.  The Commerce Department had indicated that the imports totaled more than that, but its figures included imports of other products that weren't covered in the two steel-rail trade cases.  A federal judge here will hear arguments Tuesday on how large a bond the state of California must put up while it pursues its effort to halt the merger of the Lucky and Alpha Beta supermarket chains.  For the past year, California Attorney General John Van de Kamp has attempted to block the merger of the chains, which are both owned by American Stores Co., Salt Lake City.  On Monday, U.S. Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O'Connor agreed to block the grocery store merger, but in an amended opinion she required that the state put up a bond to continue the case.  American Stores requested Tuesday's hearing, saying the bond is intended to compensate the firm (if the merger is ultimately approved) for the costs of continuing to operate the two chains independently.  Originally, the judge asked the state to post a $16 million bond, but Justice O'Connor's decision made a new hearing on the matter necessary.  The ruling was a setback for Mr. Van de Kamp who has said he won't pursue the case unless the bond is lifted.  He has argued that the merger will prove costly to California consumers, raising food prices.  A spokesman declined to say whether Mr. Van de Kamp would drop the case if he fails to convince the court to rescind the bond requirement.  The Nevada Casino Control Commission voted unanimously to approve Ramada Inc.'s plan to sell its lodging business to New World Development Co. of Hong Kong for $540 million and change the name of the remaining casino company to Aztar Inc.  The restructuring, which has received shareholder approval, still requires approval of the New Jersey Casino Control Commission.  Hearings are scheduled to continue today, and the agency is expected to render a decision by next week.  Ramada hopes to complete the restructuring by the end of September.  Bay Financial Corp., Boston, said it expects to report a loss for the fiscal fourth quarter, ended June 30, "substantially in excess" of the $12 million loss posted in the third quarter.  The announcement indicated that the company was expecting a loss of more than $37.8 million for the year.  In the first nine months, it had a loss of $25.8 million, on revenue of $31.3 million.  Bay Financial, a real estate investment trust, gave no explanation for the expected loss, and officials weren't available for comment.  Results will be released in September.  The company posted a loss of $10.8 million in its fiscal 1988 fourth quarter, and a loss for the year of $22.5 million.  Bay also said it completed the previously reported sale of its Waltham, Mass., office park for $126 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Bay closed at $8.625, up 12.5 cents.  THE DOW JONES Industrial Average climbed 56.53 points to close at a record high of 2734.64, more than 12 points above the previous high set two years ago today.  Takeover speculation and program trading fueled the rise.  Some individual investors exulted at the record, but many expressed wariness about the outlook.  The forces behind yesterday's high differ from those two years ago, but there are some disquieting similarities.  Analysts, meanwhile, said the new record underscores contrasts between the 1929 and 1987 crashes.  ---  Holiday Corp. agreed to sell its Holiday Inn division to Bass of Britain, which will pay $125 million in stock and assume $2.1 billion of debt.  The remaining Holiday will focus on its faster-growing hotel chains.  The U.S. firm's shares surged $6 to $83.  Analysts said the British brewer was taking a risky and expensive step.  ---  Texas Air said it may consider selling a minority or controlling stake in Continental Airlines, and disclosed talks with potential buyers.  Rumors of such a move had pushed Texas Air's stock up in recent weeks.  ---  Campbell Soup is closing four U.S. plants and consolidating operations overseas.  The move will eliminate about 2,800 jobs and result in a $344 million charge against earnings.  ---  Comex brought its biggest-ever disciplinary action, fining a gold and silver broker and his firm $550,000.  ---  The Energy Department was barred from awarding a $1 billion contract to a Bechtel-led group.  A court ruled that the work as solicited can be awarded only to a TRW unit.  ---  One of Ernst & Young's two Canadian firms agreed to break away and merge with Peat Marwick.  With the move, Peat would displace Ernst as the world's largest accounting firm.  ---  Integrated Resources signed a letter of intent to sell its sales force, a money management unit and a life insurance concern for $310 million.  --- General Electric agreed to form a cellular-phone venture with Sweden's Ericsson.  GE hopes to reduce its risks and share Ericsson's technological strength in the booming market.  ---  AT&T chose General Electric to build its next series of satellites in a contract valued at up to $250 million.  ---  Short interest in OTC stocks rose 4.2% in the month ended Aug. 15, reflecting a growing pessimism about the market's larger issues.  ---  Brierley Investments' founder is stepping down as chairman to devote himself to finding investment opportunities for the New Zealand firm.  ---  The plan of OPEC ministers to turn their meeting next month into an in-depth discussion on how to overhaul the group's entire quota system seems to be unraveling.  ---  Kodak's cost-cutting plan received an unenthusiastic reaction on Wall Street.  The company's shares fell 12.5 cents to close at $50.625.  Analysts said deeper sacrifices are needed.  ---  Nikko Securities of Japan named Hideo Suzuki chairman of its U.S. subsidiary, succeeding Toshio Mori, who is returning to Tokyo.  ---  BASF's operating profit jumped 31% to $660 million as prices of raw materials retreated and results improved in the chemical company's petroleum and agrochemical divisions.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 225,520,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2734.64, up 56.53; transportation 1448.79, up 11.02; utilities 219.32, up 3.02.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3294.90, up 6.86.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 131.30, off 0.38; spot index 129.85, up 0.35.  Dollar: 143.30 yen, up 0.15; 1.9575 marks, up 0.0045.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Abiomed Inc., offering of 1.4 million common shares, of which, 1,275,000 will be sold by the company and 125,000 by holders.  Bruno's Inc., offering of $125 million of convertible debentures, via Robinson-Humphrey Co.  Communication Cable Inc., offering of 533,500 common shares, of which, 450,000 shares are being sold by the company and 83,500 by holders, via Scott & Stringfellow Inc. and Interstate/Johnson Lane Corp.  Enron Oil & Gas Co., a unit of Enron Corp., an offering of about a 12% equity stake through a proposed initial offering of about eight million common shares, via: First Boston Corp.; Goldman, Sachs & Co.; and Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.  General Chemical Corp., offering of $150 million of senior secured first priority floating rate notes and $200 million of senior secured second priority notes, via: Merrill Lynch Capital Markets; and First Boston.  The company is privately held by two officers of Henley Group Inc.  Sears, Roebuck & Co., offering of $500 million of debt securities.  Tokyo stocks fell for the third consecutive day in thin trading, although prices managed a moderate recovery from their worst levels toward the end of the day.  Share prices ended higher in London, although sharply below intraday peaks.  Every other major European market also showed gains.  Traders in Tokyo said buying was discouraged by a stronger dollar and by yet another sex scandal involving Japan's governing Liberal Democratic Party.  Chief Cabinet Secretary Tokuo Yamashita apologized at a news conference for an affair with a young office worker.  Press reports early in the day said he had decided to resign, but Mr. Yamashita only said he was considering resigning.  Tadao Nishioka, general manager of the stock investment department of Nippon Life Insurance Co., said the Japanese market is headed for a technical correction before gathering strength for a rebound in September.  The Nikkei index of 225 issues, a 221.07-point loser Wednesday, was down 106.73 to close at 34786.55.  But like Mr. Nishioka, many brokers and investors expressed optimism that the Nikkei won't fall much further.  An official at Nikko Securities said the index is still near its 25-day moving average and will continue to find support at this level.  In early trading in Tokyo Friday, the Nikkei index rose 21.50 points to 34808.05.  Thursday's volume on the first section was estimated at a light 380 million shares, down from 544.6 million Wednesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues 536-348, while 215 remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 9.43 Wednesday, was down 13.05, or 0.49%, at 2630.97.  The Second Section Index, which gained 8.76 points Wednesday, was down 5.98, or 0.18%, to close at 3282.59, ending its string of 23 consecutive advances and preserving its record of a 26-day advance made in 1975.  Volume on the second section was estimated at 25 million shares, compared with 34.9 million Wednesday.  Traders said a rumor that Honda Motor's consolidated first-quarter profit had fallen discouraged buying of Honda and other car makers' shares.  Some of the other car makers were stronger earlier in the session but fell back.  Traders also said some other stocks that had been riding high on earnings prospects also were affected by the disappointment over Honda.  Honda announced after the close of trading that consolidated pretax profit in the quarter ended June 30 was down 40% from a year earlier to 28.39 billion yen ($198.3 million) from 47.33 billion yen despite a gain in revenue.  The company cited fierce competition in the U.S. market.  Honda lost 80 to close the day at 2,040 yen a share.  Dealers and institutional investors stayed mainly on the sidelines throughout the session, and losses were spread broadly among blue-chip stocks, export-related issues and many other sectors.  Fanuc was down 120 at 6,750, TDK fell 110 to 5,990, and Nintendo was down 800 to close at 18,200.  A press report that U.S. steel manufacturers, hurt by weak domestic demand, will try to survive by increasing exports to Japan drove down prices of medium-sized Japanese steel makers, traders said.  Tokyo Steel lost 120 to 4,900, Nisshin Steel was down 30 at 1,610, and Yamato Kogyo fell 60 to 1,990.  In London, severe weakening of early buying interest encouraged the market to drift toward the close.  Prices shot higher in early trading as a shortage of stock among market-makers in blue-chip issues squeezed prices.  But a mild opening on Wall Street and the wilting of buying interest triggered a technical correction.  Prices did perk up slightly just before the London close, as Wall Street started its climb toward a record close on the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended 10.7 points higher at 2393.1, compared with an intraday high of 2404.5.  Dealers said the index spent much of the day hovering around 2400, seemingly searching for fresh inspiration to propel it convincingly through that level.  The Financial Times 30-share index rose 2.0 to 1977.9.  Volume was 475.7 million shares, up from 439 million Wednesday.  Despite its lackluster afternoon, traders remain convinced that the market is poised to move higher in the near term.  "The market's proving remarkably resilient at these levels," one trader said.  "Rare outbreaks of selling by some players just prompt other people to start rubbing their hands, anticipating a bargain."  Banking shares rallied as traders decided that the sector, which has underperformed the market for some time, is reasonably priced.  Dealers said the rise was accentuated by shortages of stock and aggressive U.S. investor interest.  Among the major clearing banks, Barclays rose 18 pence to 552 pence ($8.68) a share, Lloyds rose 8 to 416, Midland gained 10 to 369, and National Westminster advanced 10 to 355.  Insurance stocks rose in sympathy, with Royal Insurance climbing 15 to 455 and General Accident jumping 19 to #10.35.  "With the market at these (high) levels, people see financial shares as a cheap option," one trader said.  "The strong yields on these stocks also help provide a cushion on the down side."  B.A.T Industries rallied 23 to 866 in response to news late Wednesday that the Hoylake consortium bidding #13.4 billion for the U.K. conglomerate has conditionally lined up Axa Midi, a French-based insurance group, to buy B.A.T's Farmers Group for $4.5 billion.  Dealers figured the accord would improve Hoylake's chances of clearing U.S. regulatory hurdles.  Wellcome also encountered selling pressure after its recent phenomenal rise, closing 16 lower at 720.  Shares also closed higher in Paris, Frankfurt, Zurich, Brussels, Amsterdam, Stockholm and Milan, with the Milan stock index reaching a 1989 high.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  In other Asian and Pacific markets, prices were higher in Sydney, Taipei and Seoul, mixed in Manila and lower in Hong Kong, Wellington and Singapore.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 23 Aug 22 Year  @ U.S. ................... 317.2 314.2 +23.9  @ Britain ................ 715.3 711.2 +31.0  @ Canada ................. 428.4 427.1 +16.7  @ Japan .................. 1562.7 1568.7 +10.0  @ France ................. 522.8 520.1 +18.1  @ Germany ................ 251.3 251.9 +20.9  @ Hong Kong .............. 1882.2 1898.8 - 7.3  @ Switzerland ............ 238.7 236.4 +38.0  @ Australia .............. 348.0 344.5 +19.9  @ World index ............ 537.2 535.5 + 8.7  The Food and Drug Administration let stand its decision to shorten the approval process for marketing of absorbable surgical catgut sutures.  The move came in response to a petition by Johnson & Johnson, which says it is the leader in the "wound-closure market," and American Cyanamid Co. that the FDA reconsider its decision last September to reclassify absorbable surgical gut suture from the most stringent category, Class III, to Class II.  A spokeswoman for United States Surgical Corp., which had petitioned the FDA to reclassify six types of sutures, including absorbable catgut, said the reclassification significantly shortens the time it typically takes to gain FDA approval to market a product, from several years to 90 days.  She added U.S. Surgical expects to market its sutures in the first half of 1990; it already makes surgical staples.  Catgut sutures represent about 15% of the market, while synthetic absorbables represent about one-third of the market, according to the United States Surgical spokeswoman.  She estimated the suture market world-wide in 1988 was about $1.1 billion.  A spokesman for Johnson & Johnson, a health-care products concern based in New Brunswick, N.J., said the company disagrees with the agency's decision.  He said the company doesn't break out suture sales.  A spokeswoman for American Cynamid, a Wayne, N.J., biotechnology and chemicals company, said catgut sutures are basically a commodity suture that many companies make and that Cyanamid has "no significant competitive advantage."  United States Surgical, based in Norwalk, Conn., said it hopes to gain reclassification of the other sutures soon.  Lone Star Technologies Inc., Dallas, citing a cash shortage, said it will postpone a $4 million annual-interest payment due Aug. 28 on its $50 million in 8% convertible subordinated debentures due 2002.  The company said it hasn't any significant sources of cash other than from its operating companies, but none of those companies can pay a dividend right now.  Its steel company is operating under bankruptcy-law protection, its environmental systems and services unit needs its cash for growth, and the company's savings and loan is currently restricted from paying dividends.  Lone Star said it has until Sept. 26 to make the interest payment before it is in default.  A spokeswoman said the company's intention is to make the payment.  She said it is hopeful that efforts to sell assets and negotiations to resolve the steel subsidiary's bankruptcy-law status will proceed enough in 30 days to allow the payment to be made.  The Federal Communications Commission started enforcement proceedings against three radio stations for allegedly broadcasting indecent programs.  The FCC's first major action under the agency's new chairman, Alfred Sikes, signals his commitment to enforcing the congressional ban on broadcasting indecent material.  The action drew immediate praise from Sen. Jesse Helms (R., N.C.), and the commission is certain to gain the favor of many lawmakers who made it clear during Mr. Sikes's confirmation that Congress wants tough enforcement of sexually-explicit and violent programming.  At the same time, the commission and the Justice Department filed a motion asking the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit to send back to the commission a case involving a rule banning indecent and obscene broadcasts 24-hours a day.  The agencies argued that the court shouldn't decide the case until the FCC has had time to collect and review information concerning the matter.  Yesterday, the commission's enforcement division sent letters to Evergreen Media Corp. of Chicago AM, the licensee for WLUP-AM, concerning the "Steve and Garry Show"; Narragansett Broadcasting Co. of California, licensee of KSJO-FM, San Jose, about the "Perry Stone Show"; and Great American TV & Radio Co., licensee of WFBQ-FM, Indianapolis, concerning the "Bob and Tom Show."  The commission gave the three broadcasters 30 days to respond to its letters before it will decide whether a violation has occurred.  The agency defined indecent material as "clear and capable of a specific, sexual meaning and patently offensive."  In the court case, the appeals court has upheld the FCC's authority to take enforcement action against indecent broadcasts during daytime hours, when children presumably are in the audience.  But it has reversed FCC rulings on two night-time broadcasts.  Broadcasts of obscene material are banned at all times.  Meantime, Congress passed a law banning indecent broadcasts at any time, and the FCC followed by adopting a rule to that effect in December 1988.  The appeals court stayed the rule and is reviewing the matter.  In its motion yesterday, the agency said it believes the Supreme Court, in a June decision, left open the possibility for a complete ban if it can prove that any less-restrictive step wouldn't be effective.  Lincoln Financial Corp. said it agreed in principal to acquire Signal Bancorp., a closely held Monticello, Ind., bank holding company, in a transaction "valued at about $15 million."  Specific financial terms weren't disclosed.  Lincoln is a multibank holding company with interests in other financial services.  It had assets at June 30 of $2.2 billion.  Lincoln said Signal is the holding company for State & Savings Bank, which has four branches and total assets of about $126 million.  The tentative transaction is expected to close early next year.  Lincoln said the planned acquisition will give it a total of 63 banking branches in operation throughout Indiana, southwestern Michigan and western Ohio.  MAZOWIECKI WAS APPROVED as prime minister of Poland by a huge vote.  The Solidarity leader became the nation's first non-Communist prime minister in 45 years by a vote of 378-4, with 41 abstentions, including 130 votes from Communist Party members.  In his acceptance speech, Mazowiecki pledged to be the "prime minister of all Poles."  He also urged everyone to "make it normal" for governments of different hues to come in and out of power.  The Communists are certain to retain control of the Interior and Defense ministries, but Solidarity is likely to take control of the judicial system and has pledged to open up the state media to dissent.  The U.S. is working on programs to plant the seeds of capitalism in Poland, focusing on banks and farming and seeking help from the World Bank.  ---  DRUG LORDS RESPONDED to Colombia's crackdown by declaring "total war."  A communique signed by the "Extraditables," or drug traffickers sought by the U.S., threatened the government, "the industrial and political oligarchy," journalists, judges and business and union leaders.  It arrived after bombings in Medellin damaged Conservative and Liberal party offices and destroyed the summer homes of two politicians.  Police also defused bombs at two radio networks.  Meanwhile, Israel sought information about Israeli mercenaries who are reported to have trained assassins for the Medellin cartel.  The U.S. said that it has no immediate plans to evacuate its personnel but acknowledged that the Bogota government faces "a very concrete threat."  ---  Pete Rose was banned from baseball for life but continued to deny betting on baseball games.  Commissioner Giamatti said the Cincinnati Reds manager had accepted a settlement under which he didn't admit or deny the charges.  Giamatti noted that baseball rules permit Rose to seek reinstatement after a year.  ---  Voyager 2 found two new moons, a possible second ring of debris and supersonic winds in the last hours of its 4.4 billion-mile voyage to Neptune.  The new moons brought to six the number spotted by the spacecraft.  Voyager left Cape Canaveral, Fla., in 1977 and has also flown by Jupiter, Saturn and Uranus. ---  Savimbi said the truce in Angola's 14-year civil war is over and urged his rebel forces to resume fighting.  The leader of UNITA, which receives U.S. military aid, accused Angola of launching a military offensive and criticized other African states for meddling.  The truce was reached in June in Zaire at a summit of 18 African leaders.  ---  Shiite leaders threatened to attack French warships if they approach the Lebanese coast, and the radical Hezbollah faction added that its response would "horrify everybody."  The warnings demonstrated new unity between Lebanon's two major Shiite Moslem militias.  So far, though, the French ships have stayed far out to sea.  ---  Japan's top spokesman hinted he may resign as he apologized for trying to pay off a woman with whom he had an affair.  His admission was another embarrassment for the Liberal Democratic Party, which put together a government only two weeks ago after a poor showing in July 23 parliamentary elections.  ---  South African police used whips and tear gas to disperse hundreds of students at the University of Cape Town in a crackdown on supporters of a nationwide defiance campaign.  Police also arrested 22 white women staging an anti-apartheid demonstration and reported unrest in 10 townships near Cape Town.  ---  East Germany apparently plans to stem the flow of refugees to the West by curbing travel to Hungary, sources said.  A report in the West German newspaper Die Welt said travel to Hungary would be restricted drastically starting next Friday.  The East German Foreign Ministry called the report "an outright lie."  ---  A pain-killing drug holds promise of relieving an addiction to cocaine, researchers said.  The drug, buprenorphine, successfully suppressed a craving for cocaine in addicted monkeys.  It will be tested on human cocaine addicts this fall by the National Institute on Drug Abuse.  ---  Vietnam and Cambodia rejected any role for the Khmer Rouge in a Cambodian settlement.  Peace talks, which are scheduled to begin their final round in Paris next week, are deadlocked over the conflicting demands of the Phnom Penh government and the Khmer Rouge, the most powerful partner in a three-pronged guerrilla coalition.  ---  Died: R.D. Laing, 61, British psychiatrist, in St. Tropez, France.  Lorillard Inc., the tobacco subsidiary of Loews Corp., named 40-year-old Andrew H. Tisch chairman and chief executive officer.  As chief executive, Mr. Tisch succeeds J. Robert Ave, 57, who remains president.  The chairman's post is new.  Mr. Tisch, the son of Laurence Tisch, who is chairman and co-chief executive of the parent company, previously had been president of Bulova Corp., Loews's jewelry and industrial and defense products segment.  He continues as a director of both Bulova and Loews, and as vice president of strategic planning for the parent company.  Analysts said the appointment appeared to be designed to give Mr. Tisch an opportunity to run other aspects of Loews.  "He's getting more responsibility," said Michael Bunyaner, analyst at Oppenheimer & Co.  "He knows the goals at Loews."  Mr. Ave, a 16-year veteran at Lorillard, had been president and chief executive since June 1985.  Mr. Ave "has done an exemplary job in terms of maximizing profitability," said Diana K. Temple of Salomon Brothers Inc., who calls Lorillard "the most cost-conscious" of the cigarette companies.  "I think Larry Tisch wants to involve some of the younger generation more deeply in the business," she added.  Lorillard makes cigarettes under, among other brands, Kent, Newport, True, Max and Old Gold.  In 1988, the company accounted for $351 million, or 39%, of Loews's net income of $908.5 million, and $1.82 billion, or 17%, of the parent's $10.87 billion of revenue.  Succeeding Andrew Tisch at Bulova will be Herbert C. Hofmann, who takes the title of president and the new post of chief executive.  The 46-year-old Mr. Hofmann had been chief operating officer of Bulova since 1981.  Mr. Hofmann also remains vice president of operations planning for the parent.  Bulova distributes jewelry, clocks and watches and makes fuses and electromechanical devices for the government.  The subsidiary posted earnings of nearly $1.1 million on revenue of $153.9 million for 1988.  Daewoo Telecom Ltd., Canton, Mass., received approval from a U.S. Bankruptcy Court in Boston to take over management responsibilities for Leading Edge Products Inc., the companies said.  Earlier this week, Leading Edge distributed a reorganization plan to its creditors that provides for purchase of the company by Daewoo.  The plan requires creditor approval and court confirmation.  Leading Edge, a popular maker of computers similar to those of International Business Machines Corp., plans to introduce nine new computers by year end.  Daewoo manufactures computers for Leading Edge, which filed in April for protection under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Under Chapter 11, a company is protected from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to repay its debt.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Bally's Park Place Funding Inc. -- $350 million of first-mortgage, notes, due Aug. 15, 1999, was priced at par to yield 11.875%.  Rated Ba-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Bear Stearns & Co.  @ MUNICIPALS  State of Texas -- $450 million of tax and revenue anticipation notes, via three groups: Merrill Lynch Capital Markets with $200 million of issue; a BT Securities Corp. group with $200 million, and Dillon Read & Co., with $50 million.  The notes are Series 1989 notes, dated Sept. 1, 1989, and due Aug. 31, 1990.  The Merrill Lynch and BT Securities groups formally priced their notes to investors as 6 1/2% notes to yield 6.20%.  Dillon Read didn't reoffer its share of the issue.  The notes carry a rating of MIG-1 by Moody's and SP1-plus by S&P.  Detroit, Mich. -- $71 million of 10% taxable tax increment bonds, priced late Wednesday by a PaineWebber Inc. group at par.  The issue, due in 2010, was formally priced at 178 basis points over the 10-year Treasury note.  The bonds are rated single-A-minus by S&P.  @ MORTGAGE  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $750 million of 10-year noncallable debentures due Aug. 30, 1999 to be offered Friday, priced at 99 3/4 with a 8.55 coupon to yield 8.588%.  The issues yield spread is 38 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 11 classes by Salomon Brothers Inc.  The offering, Series 87, is backed by Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities.  For classes on which details are available from the underwriter, initial yields range from 9.10% to 9.98%.  @ EUROBONDS  Tokio Marine & Fire Insurance Co. Ltd. (Japan) -- $500 million of bonds due Sept. 21, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4% coupon at par, via Nikko Securities Co Europe Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 5, 1989 through Sept. 9, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 30.  Nissan Diesel Motor Co. (Japan) -- $200 million of bonds with equity-purchase warrants due Sept. 21, 1993, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Daiwa Europe Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 5, 1989 through Sept. 7, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 30.  Rhythm Watch Co. Ltd. (Japan) -- 100 million Deutsche marks of bonds with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 1 5/8% coupon due Sept. 21, 1993 at par, via Dresdner Bank.  Guaranteed by Saitama Bank.  Each 1,000 mark bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 31, 1989 to Sept. 7, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% above the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 30, 1989.  Deutsche Bank Luxembourg S.A. (W.  German parent) -- 400 million Swedish kroner of 11% bonds due Dec. 15, 1994, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 11% less full fees, via Deutsche Bank Capital Markets.  Fees 1 7/8.  Electricite de France (France) -- 75 million European currency units of 8 3/4% bonds due May 5, 1992, and priced at 102 to yield 8.51% after full fees, via BNP Capital Markets Ltd. Fungible with outstanding 100 million ECU bond issued last May.  Guaranteed by the Republic of France.  Fees 1 3/8.  Commerzbank Overseas Finance NV (W.  German parent) -- 75 million European currency units of 8 3/4% bonds due Sept 15, 1994, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 8.81% less full fees, via Commerzbank.  Guaranteed by Commerzbank AG. Fees 1 7/8.  Leeds Permanent Building Society (U.K.) -- #200 million variable rate note program, consisting initially of #50 million of five-year senior variable rate notes and #50 million of 12-year subordinated variable rate notes.  The senior variable rate notes pay an initial margin of three-month Libor (London Interbank Offered Rate) plus 0.10.  Puttable on every interest payment date, unless the issuer and the lead manager fail to agree on a new margin, in which case there is a fall-back margin of 0.50.  The subordinated variable rate notes pay an initial margin of Libor plus 0.25, with a fall-back rate of 0.70.  The borrower may add further portions of senior and subordinated variable rate notes in minimum amounts of 25 million pounds, up to the programme maximum.  All senior variable rate notes in issue are convertible, at the borrower's option, upon agreeing an initial margin, into 12-year subordinated variable rate notes.  Sole underwriter Merrill Lynch International.  Bristol & West Building Society (U.K.) -- #150 million of five-year senior variable rate notes, with an option to convert, upon agreeing an initial margin, the notes into 12-year subordinated variable rate notes in minimum amounts of #25 million.  The senior notes pay an initial margin of three-month Libor plus 0.10, with a fall-back margin of 0.50.  The fall-back margin if the notes are converted is 0.70.  Sole underwriter Merrill Lynch International.  British Telecom Finance BV (UK parent) -- 150 million European currency units of 8 1/2% bonds due Sept. 1, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 8.5% less full fees, via Deutsche Bank Capital Markets.  Guaranteed by British Telecom PLC. Fees 1 7/8.  Nordic Investment Bank (agency) -- 100 million European currency units of 8 3/4% bonds due Sept 22, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 8.75% less full fees, via Credit Commercial de France said.  Fees 1 7/8.  Live Entertainment Inc. announced a series of executive appointments yesterday, a move designed to restore stability following the murder of the company's chairman and chief executive officer, Jose E. Menendez.  The company named three of its senior executives to its board and upgraded some responsibilities.  The executives are: Devendra Mishra, newly appointed executive vice president, operations for Live; David A. Mount, newly appointed president and chief operating officer of the company's International Video Entertainment unit; and Gilbert L. Wachsman, president and chief executive of the company's Lieberman Enterprises unit.  Earlier this week, the company announced that Peter M. Hoffman, president and chief executive of Carolco Pictures Inc., was named acting chairman and chief executive of Live.  Carolco holds 49% of Live and played a large role in shaping the company.  The earlier announcement also said Roger R. Smith, formerly senior vice president and chief financial officer of Live was named acting president and chief operating officer of Live.  The company also said it has begun a search for a successor to Mr. Menendez.  MCorp said Peter B. Bartholow, chief financial officer and group chairman for finance and planning, will be named chief executive officer of the banking company.  The appointment has been approved by MCorp's directors and its creditors committee, and is subject to bankruptcy court approval.  Mr. Bartholow, 40 years old, will succeed Gene H. Bishop, chairman and chief executive officer, and will assume the day-to-day responsibilities of Mr. Bishop and John T. Cater, president and chief operating officer.  Mr. Bartholow also may assume the titles of president and chairman.  Both Mr. Bishop and Mr. Cater will remain directors of MCorp and consultants to the company, MCorp said.  Once one of Texas's biggest banking companies, MCorp has been operating with protection from creditors' lawsuits under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code since regulators seized 20 of its banks in late March.  The company still owns five Texas banks and has about $3 billion in assets.  Under Chapter 11, a company continues to operate while it works on a plan to pay its debts.  Eastman Kodak Co.'s latest cost-cutting effort has left its hometown reeling and Wall Street yawning.  News that the company plans to slash employment by 4,500 threatens to shatter loyalty among Kodak employees.  This is the fourth restructuring since 1983, and many employees, analysts and investors don't believe it is the last.  Division managers, who met with their staffs yesterday, have been ordered to generate a certain level of increased earnings by 1990.  Moreover, the company plans to either sell, restructure or make joint ventures of as many as 20 business units representing $1.25 billion in annual revenue.  Most of the cuts are expected to affect Rochester operations.  "There's bound to be a deep morale problem," said Robert Kelley, a business professor at Carnegie Mellon University.  "No one thinks this will be the last restructuring, and everyone is trying to cover his tracks."  On Wall Street, news of the restructuring hardly rippled Kodak's stock.  In trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Kodak closed at $50.625, down 12.5 cents.  And that lackluster reaction comes in spite of the fact that Kodak's plan was triggered partly by disgruntled institutional investors.  "We haven't seen improvements, and the company has felt our pressure," said Amy Ryan, portfolio analyst at Fred Alger Management.  She wasn't impressed by the scope of the restructuring and said "they could have taken the same steps years ago."  Among the businesses that Kodak will likely target for big cost cuts are its copier division, which just a few years ago was an up-and-comer.  In addition, a myriad of smaller businesses involved in videocassettes and wafer inspection may be sold.  About half the employment cuts will stem from selling or closing businesses, analysts expect.  The analysts, while applauding cuts in marginal businesses, insist Kodak must make deeper sacrifices and pare core businesses.  "This isn't aggressively addressing operating problems in major divisions" like imaging, contends Alex Henderson, an analyst with Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  "They're trimming their toenails."  It is a strategy Kodak has followed in past restructurings, when it has also given division heads earnings targets, but this time top management has "upped the ante," said a Kodak manager.  The company's current plan to freeze wages for remaining employees and overhaul what has become a holy grail benefit -- an annual bonus tied to the company's stock dividend -- may be tough to swallow.  "The company is doing the right thing, but I kind of wonder if there haven't been mistakes made at the top," said James Sullivan, an hourly employee in the construction division.  The sheer number of restructurings managers have endured in the past five years causes confusion in addition to damping morale.  "They don't know what it takes to be successful," asserted Mike Hyde, a partner at Egon Zehndor International, a New York recruiting firm.  "The ground rules change so frequently, people get frustrated, angry or give up."  In Rochester, news of the restructuring was the talk of downtown yesterday.  "It will have an effect on the whole community," said John Ferraro, owner of a jewelry store.  Indeed, local merchants typically run "bonus-day" sales tied exclusively to the annual wage-dividend bonus and also offer Kodak employees interest-free loans based on projected bonuses.  "Sales pick up from January to March" in anticipation of the bonuses, said Ronnie Levine, sales manager of Mt. Read VW-BMW Inc.  He expects "some impact but we don't know by how much."  Karen Paul, a management professor at Rochester Institute of Technology, noted that "the community is already distrustful" of Kodak because of controversy about toxic chemicals being emitted from company plants.  And the restructuring could deepen that, she contends.  Regarding your July 31 story about superconductors: There were several misleading or inaccurate statements.  The article says, "Resolution of radar antennas is related to their size, and shrinking an antenna could theoretically improve its ability to see small objects."  Making an antenna smaller (at a fixed frequency of operation) reduces its ability to see small objects.  Making an antenna smaller reduces its gain and increases its diffraction angle (which is related to its physical size), both of which have an effect opposite to that desired.  Perhaps you meant that superconductors would allow higher frequencies of operation, thus allowing an appropriately scaled antenna to duplicate the performance of a physically larger antenna operating at a lower frequency.  Also, the statement "Superconductors conduct electricity with no resistance and therefore with no loss of power" is incorrect.  Superconductors have no loss at DC, but they do have effective resistance at AC and associated power loss.  Arnold Frish  Chief Engineer  Tektronix Laboratories  Beaverton, Ore.  Tasty Baking Co. expects to benefit from a campaign to repackage its pastry products, Carl Watts, vice president, sales and marketing, said.  In an effort to project a fresher look to consumers, the company undertook the project about 18 months ago, hiring a research consultant to develop a new package design.  Tasty's traditional blue-and-white motif was dropped in favor of a bright yellow color scheme, accented by the blue-and-white Tastykake logo.  Although sales for the pastry industry have been generally flat, company officials are encouraged by results so far.  Sales of the company's Tastykake pastry and snacks division, which contributes about 53% of total revenue, rose 4% in the second quarter ended July 1.  "Our sales growth for this year has not been as good as we've seen in some past years," Mr. Watts acknowledged in an interview.  "But compared with other pastry companies, we're doing well."  Gary Kyle, director of marketing, said Tasty expects further gains by year end, "especially in September, when children go back to school."  First-half net income was $5.1 million, or 80 cents a share, on sales of $137.4 million, compared with $4.6 million, or 74 cents share, on sales of $129.7 million in the 1988 first half.  The company hopes the repackaging effort, supplemented by an advertising campaign, will boost sales, strengthen consumer loyalty in established areas and help Tasty build brand awareness in new territories.  Tasty commands a large share of the snack market in metropolitan Philadelphia, Baltimore, Washington and Pittsburgh.  For expansion, Mr. Watts said the company is concentrating on areas in Florida, including Orlando, Ft.  Lauderdale and Clearwater.  In the near future, the company also intends to expand its business into New England and the New York metropolitan area.  Repackaging isn't the only way the company hopes to win more customers.  "We continue to look for ways to improve our products by updating them, offering a more-modern look and introducing new products" said Mr. Kyle.  For example, the company has begun promoting a new line of cakes and pies in flavors that change monthly.  In addition, he said a line of honey-graham cookies called Tasty Bears, aimed at children aged six to 12, has been well received since its debut in May.  Marketing strategy for the company includes new television commercials, primarily targeted toward parents aged 18 to 49.  "We're mainly after households with children," said Mr. Watts.  "Children influence Mom and Dad's decision on buying."  Recent events in Colombia have once again thrown into dramatic focus the danger posed to the world by drugs and its trafficking.  It is clear today that criminal drug cartels represent a global threat that may be without precedent.  We are dealing with the most brutal and complete international criminal conspiracy the world has ever known, which can overwhelm us if we do not deal imaginatively and multilaterally with this threat.  It is like a dagger at the throat of civilization.  In a small island in the Caribbean, like Jamaica, we are trying to do what we can to combat the growing menace caused by drug traffickers using Jamaica as an exporter of marijuana and more recently as a cocaine trans-shipment point.  We have already introduced extraordinary security measures at our seaports and airports to try to stem the drug tide, and are working closely with the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration to improve our interdiction and intelligence efforts.  New laws mandate 24-hour surveillance by security forces and customs officials of all planes and ships, and place greater responsibility on exporters and transport operators to police their cargo.  We are going to be one of the first small countries to introduce a formal program of drug education in our school system; next month we start in our primary schools in major urban areas to teach young children about drug abuse.  But I do not fool myself into thinking we -- or any country -- can solve this problem alone.  We are dealing with people to whom the world is just a single canvas of opportunity.  They are so skillful that if we, for instance, begin to block our airports or seaports, there are dozens of others they can use.  That is why we must internationalize the response to this problem.  The drug problem cannot be solved by individual nations or even bilateral arrangements.  It is a global problem that demands a multilateral response.  This is not unusual.  Multinational, coordinated intelligence efforts have proved effective in the past against specific terrorist and criminal targets -- in Italy, for example.  And when hijacking was reaching epidemic proportions, the international community eventually agreed upon a United Nations convention against hijacking to bring together international resources.  The specially trained forces acted effectively under U.N. sponsorship.  Similarly, we have U.N. conventions against drug trafficking and drug abuse.  But there is no means of implementation.  We are proposing an international anti-narcotics force that could help countries struggling against drug cartels to train agents and catch smugglers, to act as a global intelligence clearinghouse and, if needed -- and by invitation only -- provide trained operatives and even paramilitary muscle against traffickers.  Like the U.N. peace-keeping force, this multilateral drug strike force could be called in at a time of need in a manner entirely consistent with perceptions in relation to sovereignty.  At this very moment Colombia needs military help but dare not call for it because of the implications for its sovereignty.  With a U.N. force, no such problems would arise.  Finally, an internationalized response could not only dramatically increase the anti-drug capabilities of all nations, but would inevitably increase the level of awareness of the problem as well.  The very fact that a multilateral drug force existed would increase the chances that many countries who have their own antidrug effort on the "back burner" -- or not on the "stove" at all -- would tend to become more conscious of the dangers and possible responses.  There are a variety of institutions that could undertake such an international drug trafficking organization.  It could operate under the auspices of the U.N., funded by contributing nations.  Or, perhaps, an initial effort could be mounted by the Commonwealth countries, or by the Organization of American States.  We in Jamaica intend to approach all these multilateral entities with this idea and have already had discussions with the Secretariat of the Commonwealth.  The solution to the supply side of the international drug crisis is international.  But I believe the solution to the demand side is equally critical and requires an equally international response.  The most stubborn aspect of the problem with drugs is to be found in that hard, brutal territory of poverty.  Although experience tells us that many drug users are located in other socioeconomic groups, it is the poor who hurt most from the effects of drug abuse.  Poverty brings a pain that is unique.  Drugs bring a temporary release from that pain.  When people are trapped in poverty, community outreach programs do not get to them easily.  When countries are poor, their capacity to resist is low.  The ability to corrupt is great.  We do not know how to build a society in Jamaica worth having on the basis of a drug culture.  We fear that our capacity to avoid becoming corrupted in our judicial system and security forces by the massive resources and utter ruthlessness of the drug barons is limited.  We believe that a multilateral anti-narcotics force that can begin to match wits and resources with the drug cartels threatening us all is a vital step to be taken now.  There is no time to lose.  ---  Mr. Manley was recently re-elected prime minister of Jamaica.  Blue Cross/Blue Shield of Massachusetts threatened to stop payments to a group of hospitals that it accused of overcharging patients.  The big insurer, which has about half of the Massachusetts health-insurance market, declined to name the hospitals or say how many it was concerned with.  It said the threat was made in a letter to the state's Rate Setting Commission, a hospital regulator, last week.  Blue Cross/Blue Shield of Massachusetts pays about $2.8 billion in health claims a year.  In June and July, the Rate Setting Commission identified about 30 institutions that it believed to be potentially exceeding annual revenue maximums established by the commission.  A spokesman said the hospitals Blue Cross is threatening with a cutoff roughly coincide with the list of 30.  Blue Cross said the overcharges -- prices set at levels that would generate revenue in excess of the state caps -- amounted to $25 million in the first quarter of 1989.  The threat is another sign of turmoil in health care in the state.  Last week, a group of hospitals sued the state, alleging unlawful withholding of state funds.  Hit by a revenue shortage, Massachusetts has been slashing budgets in many areas in recent months.  The state portrayed the Blue Cross complaint as superfluous to its regular monitoring of hospital charges and revenue, saying it was already dealing with the 30 hospitals and has ordered adjustments in some cases.  But a Blue Cross spokesman said the insurer believed financially pressed hospitals were intentionally charging patients at rates that would produce revenue above the state maximums.  He said this was more serious than past discrepancies, which resulted from "accidental" overcharges.  Blue Cross wouldn't say when it would begin cutting off payments if it wasn't satisified with the regulators' actions.  A federal judge here denied a petition by Los Angeles-based insurer Farmers Group Inc. to intervene in a lawsuit filed against Illinois regulators by Sir James Goldsmith, who is in hostile pursuit of Farmers' parent, B.A.T Industries PLC.  Sir James, through his bidding consortium Hoylake Investments Ltd., is challenging the constitutionality of insurance laws in the nine states where Farmers operates, including Illinois.  Those laws give the regulators in each state the power to approve or deny Hoylake's #13.35 billion ($21.19 billion) bid for B.A.T, a London-based tobacco, retailing, paper and financial services conglomerate.  Illinois is the only state to deny Farmers' petition and, as a result, Farmers won't be allowed to present evidence at the hearings for a preliminary injunction that have been set for Sept. 18 in federal court here, Sir James's group said.  A spokesman for Farmers said the company will, however, be able to participate in preliminary briefing conferences and oral arguments.  Federal courts in the other eight states -- Arizona, California, Oregon, Washington, Idaho, Texas, Kansas and Ohio -- have approved Farmers's petitions.  Earlier this week, Sir James reached an agreement to sell Farmers -- if his group is successful in acquiring B.A.T -- to France's Axa Midi Assurances for $4.5 billion.  The agreement is designed to win the approval of insurance regulators, thus eliminating a major roadblock to Sir James's attempts to acquire B.A.T.  Even as cash-strapped Integrated Resources signs a deal to sell its crown jewels, management is paying itself fat salaries and concocting a poison pill to help maintain control of Integrated's remaining real estate assets.  This raises a $2 billion question for Integrated creditors, who stand to forfeit 30% or more of their total claims exceeding $2 billion: Are Integrated managers trying to entrench themselves at creditors' expense?  Yesterday, after a lengthy board meeting, Integrated signed a letter of intent to sell a big chunk of its financial assets for about $310 million, mostly in cash.  The buyer is Whitehall Financial Group, a 50% partnership between a branch of the Bronfman family and Mandy Moros, a London investor.  The assets to be sold include Integrated's big sales force, together with a money management unit and one of its life insurance companies.  The sale price is about $20 million less than the company's recent estimates of the assets' value.  Integrated, which is trying to restructure its debts, has been struggling since June to stay out of bankruptcy court.  It badly needs to raise cash to make partial payments to creditors, who have been growing more anxious as each day passes.  Yesterday's accord "marks an important step in our restructuring," Arthur Goldberg, Integrated's co-chief executive, said in an interview.  If a higher bidder comes in, Integrated is free to consider the offer, he says.  The assets Whitehall will buy are part of a bigger package that Integrated recently valued at around $500 million.  Mr. Goldberg says Integrated still is pursuing the sale of its remaining financial assets, including a big life insurance company.  Several parties, including Kaufman & Broad and the Texas investor Robert Bass have apparently shown interest in buying pieces of Integrated.  Proceeds from the sale of these financial assets would go to senior Integrated creditors, who hold claims of about $1 billion.  Later, they and other creditors would get a stake in the company's remaining real estate and other partnership assets, valued by the company recently at about $700 million.  Integrated announced the signed agreement with Whitehall after the market's close.  But yesterday, Integrated's common shares jumped 1/2 to 2 1/8.  Its junior junk bonds, after trading as low as eight cents on the dollar, edged up to around nine cents, according to R.D. Smith, which trades troubled companies' securities.  More senior Integrated bonds are skulking at about 38 cents on the dollar.  Meanwhile, Integrated managers are taking care of themselves.  They recently adopted golden parachutes, entitling them to a full year's salary if they get booted out of the company.  Also, as they won't be getting big bonuses in the future, to compensate, they have jacked up their salaries.  The annual salary for Mr. Goldberg, the co-chief executive, will be $625,000.  In 1988, he was paid $270,000 in salaries and fees, plus $775,000 in bonuses and $79,000 for serving as general partner in the company's limited partnerships.  Integrated's other co-chief executive, Stephen Weinroth, who recently took a leave from Drexel Burnham Lambert, also will be paid $625,000 a year, only a fraction of the amount he received while at Drexel.  He also is said to be abolishing company contributions to charities, and management perks.  No more company-paid flights for executives who take their families on vacation.  At a board meeting about two weeks ago, Mr. Weinroth pushed for adoption of a poison pill, to deter any unwanted takeover attempts.  Some directors balked.  A decision wasn't reached, and now Integrated is seeking creditors' assent for the plan.  While many people think Integrated is headed for bankruptcy court, others believe Mr. Weinroth sees buried treasure in the once highflying real estate syndicator.  American Real Estate Partners is on the books for $21 million; Integrated recently rejected a $34 million bid for it.  Dean Witter is trying to auction the property at a higher price.  Eventually, people speculate, Mr. Weinroth and other managers will take a chunk of equity in the company's partnership assets, which would gradually be liquidated.  One Integrated insider says there will be an incentive program, which he thinks will be well deserved.  Management works very long hours.  "The question for our group," Robert Miller, a lawyer for Integrated's bondholders, says, "is if they want a poison pill to prevent third parties from putting a more attractive deal on the table."  Integrated common shares could be bought now for about $16 million, though an acquirer would have to assume big debts and the burden of negotiating with quarrelsome creditors.  With the pill, Integrated might double its shares outstanding, raising the cost of a takeover.  But that would be only "a modest deterrent" if anyone really wanted to buy the company, Mr. Weinroth says.  He says a takeover assault would disrupt the company's restructuring program.  Mr. Weinroth has quickly seized control of Integrated's board since he became chairman on Aug. 1, succeeding company founder Selig Zises.  Two weeks ago, two dissident directors resigned.  Integrated's current plan, which is expected to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission after Labor Day, apparently offers senior creditors a little more than 70 cents on the dollar for their claims.  Junior creditors might get half as much.  But with junior Integrated bonds at eight cents on the dollar, some creditors believe they might do better by forcing the company into bankruptcy court.  "How much more can you lose?" a bondholder says.  Integrated has been struggling to hang onto its sales force of 3,978 brokers and financial planners.  The sales force is saying that "they want to stay but they can't stay for long," says Gerard M. Lavin, an Integrated senior executive vice president for administration and systems.  Total registered representatives are down about 600 since year end.  Mr. Goldberg says sales of Integrated mutual funds are down about 50%, to about $4 million a week from $8 million a week before June.  Integrated annuities are down about one-third, to $13 million a week.  Foreign-exchange traders in Asia ignored intervention from the Bank of Japan and bid the U.S. currency to the day's highs, but profit-taking in Europe and in New York scalped the early gains, leaving the dollar mixed.  Traders said this "early hop, late drop" pattern for the dollar in the past three trading days reflects a thin market that is short on new fundamentals and fearful of central-bank intervention if the U.S. currency moves above its current range.  Despite enthusiasm in Asia, for example, traders shied away from testing the 1.9700 mark and 144 yen levels, which are viewed as key short-term lines of defense for the U.S. Federal Reserve and other monetary authorities that want to stall a runaway dollar rally.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9575 marks, up from 1.9530 marks late Wednesday, and at 143.30 yen, up from 143.15 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5723, up from $1.5717.  In Tokyo Friday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 143.38 yen, down a bit from Thursday's Tokyo close of 143.65 yen.  Thursday, Lynn Tierney, a vice president in foreign exchange at Shawmut Bank of Boston, said the pound, beleaguered by disappointing British trade figures Wednesday, drew some support when Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson repeated the government's commitment to fighting inflation and warned that interest rates would remain high until he is convinced price pressures have been substantially reduced.  Though Mr. Lawson has said he believes inflation has peaked, he declined to indicate when the government might feel it has slowed enough to allow a relaxation in interest rates.  A new government sex scandal brewing in Japan and growing confidence that the West German Bundesbank wasn't planning to boost interest rates kept Tokyo dealers particularly dollar-hungry.  The Bundesbank fulfilled expectations when it was announced that the central bank hadn't altered its monetary policy at the meeting of its Central Bank Council.  The discount rate remains at 5% and the Lombard rate at 7%.  Meanwhile, the possible resignation of Japan's Chief Cabinet Secretary, Tokuo Yamashita, amid reports of an alleged affair with an office worker, started the "safe-haven" move to dollars in Asia.  Another sex scandal forced Prime Minister Sosuke Uno to resign earlier this year.  The Bank of Japan was said to have intervened twice in an effort to halt the dollar's rise, but the moves had little impact.  What slowed the U.S. currency toward the end of the Tokyo session were newswire summaries of yesterday's New York Times that included a report of a proposed bill in a U.S. congressional committee aimed at increasing congressional and administration influence over Fed decisionmaking.  The bill was interpreted as an attempt to force a softer credit policy on the Fed at a time when the U.S. central bank is trying to cap inflation while preserving a moderate growth rate.  Later, in New York, the dollar's retreat gained speed on rumors that a forthcoming report from a U.S. consulting firm, which wasn't identified, says the Fed -- following Tuesday's meeting of the Federal Open Market Committee -- plans to target monetary policy for lower interest rates.  Other versions of the rumor mentioned a FedBank of Japan plan whereby the U.S. central bank would ease and the Japanese central bank would tighten to fend off further dollar gains.  The Fed declined to comment on the rumors.  Most traders discounted the news and views.  The bill in Congress to corral the Fed isn't expected to pass the full House and Senate, and talk of Fed plans to ease interest rates were viewed as premature.  The Bank of Italy, meanwhile, intervened for the fourth day in a row to buy $11 million at the Milan foreign-exchange fixing, during which a total of $53.3 million and 42 million marks changed hands.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $364.50 an ounce, down $1.30.  Estimated volume was a light 2.3 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Friday, gold was quoted at $362.35 an ounce.  The inspector general of the Department of Health and Human Services said the Food and Drug Administration must beef up its internal safeguards to prevent fraud and favoritism in the approval of generic drugs.  The department's investigators uncovered numerous flaws and irregularities in the drug-approval system that allowed preferential treatment to certain generic-drug makers as companies competed for early approval of their generic products, according to a report by Inspector General Richard P. Kusserow.  The first company to market the generic version of a brand-name drug on which the patents have expired can count on capturing and holding a significant part of the market.  "The FDA lacks a quality-control system that assures the fundamental integrity and fairness of the (generic) review process," Mr. Kusserow said.  The current system depends largely on an honor system, he added, but in light of the current generic-drug scandal "increased surveillance and independent testing is necessary."  The inspector general's report was requested by FDA Commissioner Frank Young after the U.S. Attorney's office in Baltimore and investigators for a House subcommittee headed by Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.) uncovered evidence of chicanery and fraud in the generic industry and in the FDA's ranks.  So far, three FDA officials, three drug company executives and two generic drug makers have pleaded guilty to corruption charges.  Preferential treatment was shown in the assignment of new drug applications to FDA reviewers, according to the report.  "A branch chief could favor a particular company by consistently assigning the company's (applications) to slow reviewers."  Also, a company could be put at a disadvantage if its application was reassigned halfway through the review process to another reviewer, the report said.  The performance of chemists who review applications was found to vary widely.  From October 1988 through May 1989, one chemist handled 226 applications while another handled only 21, according to the report.  One chemist said a branch chief expedited certain applications by reassigning them to chemists who could do the work faster, according to Mr. Kusserow.  He said the agency should set uniform review standards and assign applications to chemists randomly.  Branch chiefs should have to justify any reassignments and document the reasons for reviewing any application out of the usual first-come, first-served basis.  The report also urged the FDA to require companies to submit samples of their products to prove that they are the biological equivalent of brand-name drugs they mimic.  As previously reported, two generic-drug makers have acknowledged hoodwinking FDA officials with falsified information.  The Environmental Protection Agency released a study on acid rain that both proponents and opponents of stiff control measures are using to bolster their positions.  The report, the final research in a 10-year acid rain study that will be released in its final form next year, found that reducing emissions of sulfur dioxide would improve the quality of lakes in the Northeast and that failure to reduce emissions would hurt streams in the South.  The study looked at scenarios under which sulfur emissions and acidic deposits increased, decreased and stayed the same.  Environmentalists and others will point to those findings as evidence that sharp cuts in utilities' sulfur emissions would be beneficial.  Henry Habicht, deputy EPA administrator said, "The scientific data reinforce President Bush's proposal to reduce annual sulfur dioxide emissions by 10 million tons."  That proposal is considered the stiffest portion of the president's clean-air legislation, which was released last month.  Industry groups, however, focused on findings that indicated there wouldn't be rapid, significant deterioration if emissions are unchanged.  In the South, the number of damaged streams would rise significantly, but only over a 50-year period.  In the Northeast, water quality would hardly change.  The National Coal Association continued to insist that it is premature to take action to control acid rain until the final report is out.  A spokesman said the latest research supports the group's view that "the acid rain situation is not an ecological emergency that we need to act on today."  Similarly, the Edison Electric Institute said the report indicates "no environmental crisis exists" and said sulfur emission cuts should be made in "in the most cost-effective manner possible."  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. said it chose General Electric Co. to build its next series of satellites, signing a contract valued at as much as $250 million.  AT&T also said Capital Cities/ABC Inc. agreed to buy a total of nine transponders on the two new satellites, which will be launched in 1993 and 1994.  AT&T said television networks normally lease transponder space for transmission.  An ABC spokesman wouldn't disclose the value of the contract or say why ABC chose to buy, rather than lease.  All three companies are listed on the New York Stock Exchange and in composite trading yesterday AT&T common closed at $40.125, up $1.50, on volume of 2.7 million shares; GE closed at $58.125, up $1.125, as 1.9 million shares changed hands and Capital Cities stock closed at $507.50, up $4, on volume of 43,800 shares.  Unlike existing satellites, AT&T said each of the two Telstar 4 satellites will have transponders operating at C-band and Ku-band radio frequencies.  Customers will be able to transmit in one frequency and receive in another.  That ability is particularly useful for television networks.  The new satellites also will increase AT&T's ability to get into the market for business transmission.  Businesses are increasingly putting together satellite networks to send data on Ku-band, which, because of its higher frequency, allows the use of small, inexpensive earth stations.  AT&T said each satellite will have 24 C-band transponders and 20 Ku-band transponders.  The satellites also will be able to vary power on the transponders, giving them the ability to provide services that haven't been successful in the past, such as direct broadcast television.  Besides competition from cable television, direct broadcast television hasn't sold because existing satellites aren't powerful enough to be paired with cheap earth stations.  The telephone giant said it eventually will build a third satellite in the Telstar 4 series.  Each satellite will be designed to last 12 years.  AT&T hasn't yet selected a launch vehicle.  Pension-Fund Money  Goes to Small Business  SMALL BUSINESS has found a new angel.  The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority says its retirement fund plans to lend $20 million to small businesses within its area of operations.  Historically, states and their agencies shun such lending because small business is too risky.  The Massachusetts Industrial Finance Agency, a state agency that works exclusively with small businesses, will help companies apply for letters of credit from local banks, then issue bonds to cover the borrowed amounts.  The retirement fund then will buy the bonds, which have a reduced risk because of those letters of credit.  A trend may be in the making.  On Monday, the New York City police pension fund said it would set aside $50 million for lending to small businesses.  But unlike the Massachusetts plan, the loans will be guaranteed by the Small Business Administration.  Jack Gallahue, executive director of the Massachusetts fund, says the interest rates will be as much as two percentage points lower than the rates small businesses currently pay for loans.  Yet the official expects the fund to earn as much on the bonds as on most other investments, such as Treasury bills.  "Here's one way that pension funds can directly participate in local economic development without sacrificing returns," he says.  Getting U.S. Contracts  To Women in Business WOMEN MAY GET more business if a bill being proposed in the House goes through.  Rep. John LaFalce (D., N.Y.) is sponsoring a bill that would require all federal agencies to develop annual goals for awarding contracts to small businesses owned by women.  The bill, which is in hearings, also would require agencies to actively solicit bids from such businesses for all competitive contracts.  Even though women own more than 25% of all U.S. small businesses, they receive less than 1% of the approximately $177 billion in federal contracts awarded each year, Rep. LaFalce says.  The same legislation had been proposed earlier as a late addition to the Women Business Ownership Act.  But because the proposal hadn't gone through hearings, Mr. LaFalce withdrew it so as not to hold up the entire legislation.  Wackier Entertainment  Invites Entrepreneurs  LIVE ENTERTAINMENT is the latest in corporate functions, causing a boom for small businesses that supply talking martinis, "live" Christmas trees and other characters.  Entrepreneurs in the field say the trend is away from the laser shows and video programs that were the rage in recent years.  "Clients are getting tired of high-tech gimmicks; they want a human touch," says Michael Meth, vice president of Caribiner Inc., a New York concern that produces company meetings.  Nationwide, the number of companies arranging live entertainment for companies has "at least doubled" in the past five years, says Mickey Harmon, president of Mickey Harmon Products Inc., a growing, eight-month-old New York company.  The companies generally charge a few hundred dollars per performer and try to customize the performance.  For a party at a historical building, Pastiche Inc. of New York provided an investment firm with a George and Martha Washington.  For an art-gallery gala, it sent a marbleized human "statue."  Ventures in Software:  Prestarted Start-Ups  INSTEAD OF STARTING software companies from scratch, some venture capitalists are acquiring software projects shed by larger concerns.  The practice "allows venture investors to move quickly into an area they are interested in," explains John Grillos, a partner at the venture arm of Robertson, Stephens & Co., a San Francisco investment banking firm.  Robertson Stephens recently invested $3 million for a 50% stake in Visix Software, an Arlington, Va., computer-software producer.  Visix started as a research project at American Management Systems of Arlington.  Robertson Stephens took part in a buy-out of the project.  "We prefer to invest in software companies with $2 million to $5 million in revenue instead of starting them from scratch," says Andrew Rachleff, a partner in Merrill, Pickard, Anderson & Eyre.  The Palo Alto, Calif., venture firm recently led a $4 million financing to buy software lines for a newly formed company.  Software companies typically take five to eight years to reach sales of $5 million, Mr. Rachleff notes.  At that pace, he says, it would be difficult to achieve desired rates of return.  Odds and Ends  BANK OF AMERICA is launching a small-business network, aiming to reach more than 340,000 of its small-business clients.  A potential rival to American Express Co.'s card for small businesses, the network provides discounts on banking services and car rentals, among other things.  Big banks have "begun to realize there are only so many Fortune 500 companies," says a spokesman for the American Bankers Association. . . .  Livestock offerings: Transgenic Sciences Inc. of Worcester, Mass., has raised $3.7 million in an initial stock offering and plans to produce drugs through research with genetically treated animals such as mice, rabbits and goats.  Another start-up, Genpharm International Inc., which works with genetically treated cows and mice, just received over $6 million from venture capitalists.  The Illinois Commerce Commission ordered Commonwealth Edison Co. to refund to its customers at least $200 million for construction cost overruns at the utility's Byron 1 nuclear plant.  The commission telegraphed its decision earlier this month by telling a hearing examiner to prepare the order.  If the ruling stands up to expected challenges by both Commonwealth Edison and consumer advocates, it will require the utility to refund between $190 million and $195 million, plus about $10 million in interest.  Commonwealth Edison has said the ruling could force it to slash its 1989 earnings by $1.40 a share.  For 1988 Commonwealth Edison reported earnings of $737.5 million, or $3.01 a share.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Commonwealth Edison closed at $37.25, down 25 cents.  The $2.5 billion Byron 1 plant was completed in 1985.  In a disputed 1985 ruling, the Commerce Commission said Commonwealth Edison could raise its electricity rates by $495 million to pay for the plant.  The utility has been collecting for the plant's construction cost from its 2.8 million customers since 1986.  But state courts upheld a challenge by consumer groups to the commission's rate increase.  The Illinois Supreme Court ordered the seven-member commission to audit Commonwealth Edison's construction expenses and refund any unreasonable expenses.  In its ruling yesterday, the commission voted 4-2 that between $190 million and $195 million of the plant's construction cost was unreasonable and should be refunded, plus interest.  One commissioner didn't vote because he represented one of the parties in the case.  The Byron 1 rate case has been bitterly contested by consumer groups, some of whom hope it may set a precedent for a second nuclear rate case involving Commonwealth Edison's Braidwood 2 plant.  Commonwealth Edison is seeking about $245 million in rate increases to pay for Braidwood 2.  The commission is expected to rule on the Braidwood 2 case by the end of this year.  Commonwealth Edison declined to comment on the commission's order, saying it wanted to examine the ruling first.  But both the utility and consumer groups have said they plan to challenge the commission's ruling.  National Starch & Chemical Corp., a unit of Netherlands-based Unilever N.V., said it acquired the assets of the New Zealand-based Adhesives division of Davis Gelatine Ltd.  The adhesive and chemical concern will acquire the Australia-based Goodman Fielder Wattie Ltd. unit, which has sales of more than $3 million.  Terms were not disclosed.  Liposome Technology Inc., a biomedical company, said it received a patent covering a process the company believes can improve drugs used to fight cancer, acquired immune deficiency syndrome and viral diseases.  Currently, the company is investigating the process, called long-circulating "stealth" liposomes.  ERC International said its W.J. Schafer Associates Inc. subsidiary was awarded two contracts valued at as much as $13.4 million by the U.S. Strategic Defense Initiative Organization.  The two contracts, both valued at up to $6.7 million over three years, are for technical and analytical support at the organization's Key Technologies Office.  Trade between West Germany and East Germany rose 7% in the first half of 1989 to 7.22 billion marks ($3.72 billion) from 6.751 billion marks a year ago, the Bonn Economics Ministry said.  The boost reversed a declining trend that has characterized trade between the Germanys since 1986, the ministry said.  Exports to East Germany rose 8.6% to 3.41 billion marks from 3.14 billion marks, while imports grew 5.6% to 3.81 billion marks from 3.61 billion marks.  East Germany's trade surplus with West Germany dropped slightly to 402.5 million marks in the first half of 1989 from 469.4 million marks a year earlier.  Contel Corp. said it signed a definitive agreement to sell Contel Credit Corp., its leasing and financial-services subsidiary, to General Electric Co.'s GE Capital unit.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The transaction is expected to be completed in the third quarter and isn't anticipated to significantly affect Contel's financial results for this year.  Texaco Canada Inc., recently acquired by Imperial Oil Ltd., said it has changed its name to McColl-Frontenac Inc.  The company said the name change is part of an agreement with Texaco Inc. of the U.S. to phase out the use by the Canadian company of the Texaco trade name.  McColl-Frontenac said it will continue using the Texaco trademark to market its petroleum products until 1991.  Toronto-based Imperial, which is 70%-owned by Exxon Corp., purchased Texaco Canada in February for $4.15 billion.  McColl-Frontenac was the company's former identity before it changed its name to Texaco Canada in 1959.  Armco Steel Co. said that fire caused extensive damage to a steel cleaning line at its Ashland Works, but that shipments won't be affected.  Armco Steel, a partnership between Armco Inc., Parsippany, N.J., and Kawasaki Steel Corp., Tokyo, said acid tank covers were damaged in the fire but acid wasn't released.  Hydrochloric acid is used to clean the surface of flat rolled carbon steel.  The company said an investigation of the cause of the fire and the extent of damages was continuing.  Officials said production will be shifted to three remaining lines while repairs are made.  Canadian wheat stocks totaled 5,121,000 metric tons at July 31, down 29.9% from 7,305,000 tons a year earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The stocks included 792,000 tons on farms, down from 2,535,000 tons a year earlier and 4,329,000 tons at terminals and other commercial locations, down from 4,770,000 tons a year earlier.  Statistics Canada said it was the lowest year-end stock level since 1950.  Canada's crop year ends July 31.  Rockwell International Corp. received a $45.6 million Air Force contract for communications equipment.  Boeing Co. won a $15.1 million Navy contract for helicopter parts.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. was awarded a $15 million Air Force contract for aircraft maintenance.  Honeywell Inc. received a $12.9 million Army contract for mine parts.  Edward H. Meyer, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Grey Advertising Inc., was elected a director of this apparel and jewelry maker, expanding board membership to five.  Canadian manufacturers registered a 0.3% decline in new orders in June from May and a 0.6% decline in shipments, Statistics Canada said.  New orders fell to a seasonally adjusted 24.27 billion Canadian dollars (US$20.68 billion) from C$24.34 billion.  Shipments fell to C$24.83 billion from C$24.97 billion, after two consecutive increases.  Transportation equipment and electrical and electronic products industries accounted for most of the decline.  Unfilled orders totaled C$30.25 billion, down 1.8% from C$30.80 billion in May and the third consecutive monthly decrease.  The last period observed with a similar decline was between March and June 1986.  Decreases in the transportation-equipment and primary-metal industries accounted for most of the June decline.  Before adjustment for seasonal factors, manufacturers' June shipments totaled C$26.59 billion, up 2.4% from C$25.96 billion a year ago.  John Whicker, 54 years old, was named a director of overseas operations at this banking and financial services concern, succeeding Huw Manton, who is retiring.  Mr. Whicker also will remain regional director for Africa and the Caribbean.  Triton Group Ltd. and two investors, Harvey W. Rosen and Lewis H. Silverberg, said they have agreed to acquire for $40 million most of the assets of Liquor Barn, a specialty liquor retailer operating under federal bankruptcy-law protection.  Triton, a holding company with interests in turbine-engine overhauling and construction industry products, will own a "significant" equity portion of the 68-store chain, the company said.  The transaction, which is subject to the execution of a definitive agreement and regulatory and other approvals, is scheduled to be completed by the end of September.  Liquor Barn, of San Leandro, Calif., was formed by closely-held Safeway Stores of Oakland, Calif., in 1979 as a discount liquor retailer and had grown to 104 stores with sales of more than $300 million by 1986.  In June 1987, Majestic Wine Warehouse Ltd. of London bought the chain for a reported $110 million, but problems stemming from a heavy debt load and change in marketing strategy forced Liquor Barn to seek bankruptcy-law protection in November 1988.  Mr. Rosen, 52 years old, most recently served as president and chief executive officer of the Handyman home-improvement retail chain.  Mr. Silverberg, 54, is a San Diego lawyer.  Triton's controlling shareholder is Intermark Inc., a holding company.  Anacomp Inc. said its Xidex unit will manufacture a line of floppy-disk products for Hewlett-Packard Co.  The Indianapolis-based computer-services concern, which didn't disclose the contract's value, said Hewlett, Palo Alto, Calif., will market the products world-wide.  Wayne R. Sanders, president of this paper and personal-care products maker's personal care sector, and Phala A. Helm, chairman of the physical medicine and rehabilitation department at Southwestern Medical School, were elected directors, increasing board membership to 17.  M. Joel Kosheff was named a director of this electronic-parts maker, succeeding Nathan Cohn who resigned in February for health reasons.  Mr. Kosheff is president of M.J. Kosheff Associates, a financial-consulting service.  Your July 28 article about tax-free exchanges of appreciated real estate says, "Investors can exchange property indefinitely and never pay any taxes even when it's passed on to offspring."  You have bought into the argument frequently and loosely bandied about the halls of Congress.  But you are wrong.  When it is passed along to offspring by death, the Federal Estate Tax neatly skims off 55% of the entire value, not simply the previously untaxed gain.  Wendell B.  Will  Glendale, Calif.  Douglas E. Olesen, president and chief executive officer of Battelle Memorial Institute, Columbus, Ohio, was elected a director, succeeding Daniel M. Galbreath, president of John W. Galbreath & Co., who resigned because of business commitments.  Mr. Olesen's term expires Dec. 31, 1991.  Joseph F. Knott, 53 years old, formerly vice president, strategic planning and technical services, was named executive vice president at this hazardous-waste-fluid recycler, a new position with responsibility for legal, environmental, operational and technical areas.  Your July 25 article about Switzerland mixes up two separate issues:  The story says Switzerland suffers from AIDS, drugs and other social ailments common to the industrial countries.  This is true.  On this score, Switzerland is no better or worse off than its neighbors.  The story also tells us Switzerland is affected by economic trends beyond its borders, and will suffer from not being part of the European Community.  At the moment, Switzerland has a higher per-capita income, lower inflation and lower unemployment than any member of the EC. Switzerland plans to keep it that way, not by joining the EC -- which has had its fill of new members for a while -- but by the major Swiss companies' maintaining and expanding their plants in the EC countries.  My guess is that the Swiss will make this strategy (EC membership by Swiss companies, rather than by the Swiss Confederation) work well enough to maintain their economic lead over their neighbors.  This is not only because they work harder and are more efficient (compare profits of Swiss companies in, say, pharmaceuticals or airlines, with those of other European companies), but also because they take a dim view of the economic role of central governments.  Switzerland insists, as it has since the beginning of the confederation, that its economic problems be addressed mainly at the local level as far as government is concerned, and mainly in the private sector as far as resources are involved.  Other West European countries are now coming around to this view, but they're still way behind the Swiss.  So don't weep premature tears over the confederation's economic prospects, in or out of the European Community.  Henry Owen  Washington  Jonathan P. Gabriel was named to the post of chief operating officer, which had been vacant, and to the new post of senior executive vice president at the City Federal Savings Bank unit.  Mr. Gabriel, 35 years old, was previously executive vice president for retail banking.  Elmer D. Gates, president and chief executive officer of Bethlehem, Pa.-based Fuller Co., has been named a director of this utility concern, increasing the number of board members to 14.  Your Aug. 3 article on the recently released General Accounting Office study on cable-TV retail price increases should have emphasized the fact that while retail prices have risen, so has the number of channels provided to most subscribers.  I agree with National Cable Television Association's Jim Mooney on this issue: On a per-channel, per-month basis, cable retail rates have remained essentially flat.  According to an Associated Press account in the Kansas City Times, Sen. Albert Gore Jr. (D., Tenn.) called the study "virtually useless to Congress" because it was out of date and incomplete.  Bullfeathers] Sen. Gore didn't like the results because they detail an average rise of only 4% a year (counting inflation) in overall cable bills -- and that's not enough to make a compelling argument for re-regulating the cable industry.  Cable television continues to be one of the best entertainment values around.  I hope Washington is listening.  Michael L. Pandzik  Executive Director  National Cable Television Cooperative  Lenexa, Kan.  Your Aug. 11 article on "Facing Off Over Health-Care Benefits" dramatizes the basic fallacy undermining most attempts to deal with rapidly rising medical-care costs: that we somehow can defer having to deal with the overall problem by finding yet another way to shift costs around.  The risk-sharing premise of life insurance has metamorphosed over the years into a cost-sharing principle embodied in most health-insurance plans.  When the government joined the fray via Medicare and Medicaid, cost sharing became an entitlement for a large part of our population.  Now we find ourselves expending a stupendous amount of national energy and generating a lot of acrimony arguing how the costs will be shared.  This cost-reallocation game obfuscates a fundamental issue: The only way to reduce medical-care costs, short of national health insurance is a classic free-market approach -- reduce the demand for medical care.  Employers and unions in this country can take steps to educate their people on the economics of staying healthy.  Wellness programs are gaining recognition as cost-containment tools.  Company-paid health-insurance premiums or HMO fees can be structured to reward employees who get serious about staying physically and mentally healthy.  The costs of medical care will come down only when we reduce our buying level.  James P. Mooney  Old Dominion Associates  Charlottesville, Va.  Regarding your Aug. 2 article "Japanese Fear New Juvenile Violence Is Sign of Spreading 'American Disease'": Juvenile violence in Japan is deplorable.  It is deplorable in America or anywhere else.  Adult violence is also lacking any virtue.  America may have inspired some of this behavior but it cannot properly be characterized as an "American Disease."  If the young men of Japan are using Americans as role models, it is also reasonable to suspect that they may be emulating their grandfathers' and fathers' conduct during the Japanese occupation of the Philippines in World War II.  The difficulty is widespread and serious, and should have been treated with greater insight.  Edward Barran  Lancaster, Pa.  Lisa Ann Jones, a former runaway who became a $100,000-a-year trader's assistant at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., was sentenced to 18 months in prison and $50,000 in fines for lying to a grand jury.  At a hearing yesterday, the 26-year-old Ms. Jones wiped away tears as U.S. District Judge Leonard Sand delivered the sentence.  The judge said Ms. Jones "had made a very conscious and deliberate decision to lie on three separate occasions to a grand jury and to persist in a pattern of lying."  Ms. Jones, who is on paid leave from Drexel, was the first individual convicted in connection with the government's three-year probe of Wall Street trading practices.  On March 22, after four hours of deliberations, a federal jury found Ms. Jones guilty of five counts of perjury and two counts of obstruction of justice for lying to a grand jury looking into allegedly illegal trading involving Drexel.  The trial sparked considerable attention on Wall Street largely because Ms. Jones had worked for former Drexel trader Bruce Lee Newberg, who was later convicted along with five partners of Princeton/Newport L.P. for engaging in a trading scheme with Drexel aimed at generating bogus tax losses.  Mr. Newberg reported directly to Drexel's high-yield bond chief, Michael R. Milken.  In court yesterday, Ms. Jones's attorney, Daniel Bookin of San Francisco, tried to persuade the judge that a jail term would be harmful to his client's mental health.  He referred to a psychiatrist's report that said Ms. Jones had "substantial reduced mental capacity" at the time of her grand jury appearance in January 1988.  Seeking leniency, Mr. Bookin also reminded Judge Sand that Ms. Jones had gotten a job after running away at age 14 instead of turning to prostitution or drugs.  She had lied about her age and background, creating a whole new persona so that she could start fresh and support herself, the lawyer said.  And when she later landed a job with Drexel, "in her mind she had finally found the decent family she never had," said Mr. Bookin.  Then, he said, "at the age of 24, Ms. Jones, with her psychological vulnerability, was thrust into the center of the biggest white-collar crime investigation in history."  Assistant U.S. Attorney Mark Hansen agreed that "this is a sad story."  But Ms. Jones, he said, had "understood what she was doing" when she lied.  He also said that her lack of cooperation and her lies had impeded the government's investigation of Princeton/Newport.  Judge Sand said Ms. Jones would serve her prison term at a minimum-security women's "camp" in Phoenix, Ariz., where she would have access to psychological treatment.  He also ordered 2 1/2 years of supervised work release after her 18-month term, with continued mental therapy.  The $50,000 that she must pay consists of $25,000 in fines plus the cost of her incarceration and supervised release.  The judge also said he would decide in three weeks whether Ms. Jones could remain free on bail pending an appeal.  The government opposed her release.  Mr. Bookin has said he intends to appeal the verdict.  Commenting on the case, Judge Sand said, "What is sad is that Ms. Jones's motivation for perjury was duty, not greed."  Air France says its strategy for 1992 is to "occupy the terrain."  Others might call it "Fortress France."  As Europe's third-largest passenger airline, Air France seems destined to grow even larger and more lumbering as the European Community's dismantling of internal trade barriers approaches.  Aided by gifts of air routes from its owner, the French state, Air France seems to be trying to seize control of its home market before European competitors are allowed in.  Smaller French rivals fear they will be gobbled up.  "It's the dream of the French government to create a {French} Aeroflot," charges Rene de Laportaliere, a Paris lobbyist and consultant.  Critics say Air France's strategy is robbing travelers of lower fares and only postpones the slimming exercises it needs to grow more competitive.  Bernard Attali, a political appointee who became Air France's chairman in October, disagrees.  "We are not protecting ourselves; we're preparing ourselves" for the post-1992 open EC market, he says.  The strategy isn't unique to France.  Even in the United Kingdom, which prides itself in having the most airline competition in Europe, No. 1 British Airways was permitted to swallow No. 2 British Caledonian Airways last year.  But the French government seems determined to keep homegrown competition down.  For years it has limited carrier Air Inter to domestic routes and given Air France exclusive rights to most of the world, except Africa and a few Pacific routes.  Now that Air Inter is starting to look beyond France, Air France feels threatened.  So the state is backing Air France's expansion efforts at home.  "Occupying the terrain isn't a strategy," argues Rene Lapautre, president of the independent French carrier Union de Transports Aeriens, known as UTA.  He insists that Air France has "the wrong targets and the wrong enemies."  He says it should quit worrying about what happens in France and concentrate on competing with aggressive, lower-cost outsiders like British Airways and American Airlines.  Perhaps.  But for the moment, Air France is casting an acquisitive eye on some of the shares of domestic Air Inter that it doesn't already own. (Air France holds 36.5% of Air Inter and UTA, 35.8%.) Furthermore, Air France just bought part of a French regional airline.  It is gaining control of ticket distribution in France through its stake in the Amadeus computerized reservation system, and of the sale of tickets through the French Minitel computer system.  And it has linked its tour-operating unit with two French rivals.  On one level, critics say, all this may be sound strategy.  But they argue that it isn't doing much to get Air France into fighting trim for the more freewheeling skies expected in the 1990s, when domestic competition may increase no matter what France does today.  While other airlines are looking at the "far-reaching, European dimensions" of the 1992 program, "Air France wants to squeeze the last drops out of the fruits of protectionism," charges Christian Pinot, director of international relations for the French tour operator Nouvelles Frontieres.  In many important ways, Air France already has the French international market sewn up.  It has vastly expanded its European route network and now serves more European destinations -- 108 -- than any other carrier.  And Air France excels in some cutthroat sectors.  Analysts say Air France's yields -- revenue per mile traveled -- in the competitive North Atlantic market are among the best in the industry.  It achieves that, the analysts say, by keeping fares high, restricting the number of seats available and avoiding bulk sales to ticket discounters.  The company is a world leader in international air freight, which is unregulated.  Air France derives 16% of revenue from air freight in the face of heavyweight competition from Lufthansa, Flying Tiger and Japan Air Lines.  "Air France has more resources . . . than it thinks," says a former official.  "It has tremendous resilience. . . .  But it's just a bloody conservative airline.  It's a company that lacks self-confidence."  In its insecurity, Air France turns time and again to its best friend and owner -- the state.  So it isn't any surprise that Air France often gets what it wants.  But the carrier often advances at the expense of others.  Last autumn, for example, Transport Minister Michel Delebarre decided that Air Inter, the low-cost, no-frills carrier of more than 13 million passengers last year, must cooperate more closely with Air France rather than compete with it.  He told the two airlines to swap some routes, giving Air France access to some of the most heavily traveled domestic routes.  Air Inter got some European routes but not necessarily the authority to serve them from its home base at Paris's Orly Airport or to cut fares.  Mr. Delebarre also denied European traffic rights to UTA.  The government for years has limited UTA, which is 82% owned by the industrial group Chargeurs S.A., to serving Africa and a few Asian destinations, although it recently was awarded routes to San Francisco and Newark, N.J.  But it has no European or domestic traffic rights.  "France is a medium-sized country," explains Daniel Tenenbaum, director general of the French Civil Aviation Authority.  "When there is a big Franco-French competition, it's not in our best interests.  It is a constant policy to avoid this."  Mr. Tenenbaum says Air France must react to the "quasi-monopolies" already forming in Europe.  He points specifically to the British Airways-British Caledonian combination.  He then ticks off the size of the biggest French airlines: Air France has more than 120 planes; Air Inter, 50 and UTA, 11 -- "a micro airline that doesn't weigh a lot," he says.  "When we look at the national flag, we cannot build on a micro airline."  But the Fortress France strategy may yet be challenged.  The EC Commission could force the French government to let UTA compete in Europe.  It could disallow the route swaps with Air Inter.  Pending EC airline deregulation proposals, if approved, would limit France's freedom to starve other domestic airlines for the glory of Air France.  In any case, competition from revved-up European airlines will be hard for Air France to avoid.  Total Loss  My old adding machine makes a friendly noise  And warms up to tabulating,  Unlike this thing on a micro chip,  Which is cool and calculating.  -- Richard F. Barrett.  ---  Endless Simmer  Letting bygones be bygones  Is very hard indeed,  Particularly when  New bygones keep taking seed.  -- Arnold J. Zarett.  ---  Daffynition  Era of frayed denim: garbage.  -- Antoni Tabak.  White House budget director Richard Darman has initiated a review of ways to raise billions of dollars by taxing Medicare, military disability pay and other government benefits and increasing taxes on Social Security benefits.  The review won't necessarily result in a Bush administration proposal, but one administration official noted that Mr. Darman doesn't waste time analyzing ideas that haven't any chance of success.  Any such proposals could run into substantial political opposition.  In asking his staff to examine the alternatives, Mr. Darman told them not to discuss the project with other government agencies.  Yesterday, he wouldn't talk about the matter.  Mr. Darman is beginning to prepare the administration's fiscal 1991 budget proposal, which President Bush will submit to Congress early next year.  The budget director also is plotting strategy for talks with Congress that he hopes will produce an agreement to reduce the deficit significantly.  He has said that restraining costly and popular entitlement programs, such as Medicare, must be part of any solution to the deficit problem.  Taxing those benefits, many of which now are largely tax-exempt, would reduce the cost of those programs.  The concept has the added appeal of taking less from poor taxpayers than from richer ones, who pay a higher tax rate.  For all the political risks of touching Social Security and Medicare -- and they are substantial -- the programs would be obvious targets for any broad deficit-reduction plan.  They account for 28% of all federal outlays.  They also are aimed almost exclusively at the elderly, who claim a growing share of federal social programs.  Peter Peterson, an outspoken investment banker and former commerce secretary, figures the federal budget "allocates 11 times more benefit dollars per capita to Americans over age 65 than it does to children under age 18."  Mr. Darman's request to his staff was first reported in Investor's Daily.  The budget office staff hasn't completed estimates of how much money could be reached by broadening the tax base, but the potential is enormous.  The Congressional Budget Office estimates, for instance, that taxing employees for the employer-financed portion of their Medicare hospital insurance would raise $9.8 billion over five years -- even if the tax applied only to couples with income above $32,000 and to individuals with income above $25,000.  Medicare's hospital insurance is financed by payroll taxes, half of which are paid by employees out of after-tax income and half of which are paid by employers.  Currently, employees aren't taxed on the employer contribution.  The federal government currently taxes 50% of the Social Security benefits paid to upper-income taxpayers.  The CBO says that taxing 85% of such benefits would raise an additional $18.4 billion over five years.  Mr. Darman's review also extends to food stamps and welfare, but taxing those benefits probably wouldn't raise much revenue because few of the beneficiaries of those programs pay substantial income taxes.  The federal government already taxes unemployment benefits.  It isn't clear whether Mr. Darman is willing to consider taxing health insurance and other benefits that private employers provide tax-free to their employees.  The CBO says that the government could raise $40 billion over five years by taxing employer-provided health insurance worth more than $250 per month per family, or $100 per month per individual.  A drug-therapy test, in which some women were helped to stop pulling out their hair, hints at a new market for drugs that treat obsessive-compulsive disorders.  Ciba-Geigy Ltd.'s clomipramine damped an irresistible self-depilation urge in a clinical study of 13 women who had compulsively plucked out their eyebrows, eyelashes and scalp hair.  The drug's apparent success suggests that the hair-pulling urge, believed to afflict several million Americans, may be similar to compulsive hand washing and amenable to drug treatment.  Psychiatrists have been uncertain about the causes of the hair-pulling urge, known as trichotillomania, and have tended to treat it with psychoanalysis, psychotherapy, hypnosis or behavior modification.  Clomipramine and similar drugs act on serotonin, one of the brain's chemical nerve transmitters.  The U.S. subsidiary of Switzerland-based Ciba-Geigy is awaiting approval by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to market clomipramine under the brand name Anafranil as a treatment for obsessive-compulsive disorders.  The study may add several million people to the estimated five million people with obsessive-compulsive disorders who might benefit from such drugs.  The FDA has already put clomipramine in a special pre-marketing status under which Ciba-Geigy would provide the drug free if a psychiatrist believes it might help a patient with an obsessive-compulsive disorder, a company spokeswoman said.  Two other drugs that have the same effect on nerve chemistry as clomipramine are also being tested in cases of obsessive-compulsive disorders, said Wayne Goodman, chief of the clinic for obsessive-compulsive disorders at the Connecticut Mental Health Center in New Haven.  One is the anti-depressant, fluvoxamine, which is being supplied to U.S. researchers by Reid-Rowell Inc., Marietta, Ga., a subsidiary of a Belgian chemical company, Solvay & Cie.  The other drug is Eli Lilly & Co.'s fluoxetine (brand name Prozac), which is already on the market for depression.  Until recently, clomipramine, which has been available in Europe for several years, was used only to treat depression.  But over the past five years, several studies showed that, unlike most anti-depressant drugs, clomipramine was effective in obsessive-compulsive disorders, bringing partial or total relief to more than half of patients.  Obsessions are persistent, unwanted thoughts that often are illogical, while compulsions are insistent, unwanted and repetitive urges to perform rituals.  The rituals vary widely, such as checking a stove dozens of times a day to make sure it's turned off and meticulous, and often irrational, housecleaning.  "About 85% of patients, at one time or another, evidence compulsive washing," often spending several hours a day washing their hands, explained Judith L. Rapoport, head of the child-psychiatry branch of the National Institute of Mental Health and author of a recent book, "The Boy Who Couldn't Stop Washing," on obsessive-compulsive disorders.  The urge to pluck one's hair hasn't been considered an obsessive-compulsive disorder.  Instead, it was classed as a "disturbance of impulse control" and was thought to have links to tics and such habit disorders as thumb sucking.  The hair pulling begins in childhood, affecting females almost exclusively, whereas most obsessive-compulsive disorders afflict both sexes.  Because it can be hidden by wigs and makeup, it isn't known how common trichotillomania is; however, a 1978 book on habits estimated that eight million Americans had a hair-pulling compulsion.  The new study, hinting that hair pulling may be an obsession-compulsion, was carried out by Drs.  Rapoport, Susan E. Swedo and their colleagues in child psychiatry at the National Institute of Mental Health.  They recruited 14 women, aged 16 to 44 years, whose hair pulling was severe enough to interfere with daily life "because of the time lost to hair-pulling episodes, embarrassment about personal appearance, social isolation, or money spent on wigs, cosmetics or treatment," Dr. Swedo and colleagues explained in this week's New England Journal of Medicine.  All the women had denuded their eyebrows and eyelashes, and their scalps were partially or totally bald.  One woman lost all of her hair-pulling urges while the women, without realizing it, were taking a placebo or inert pill; this patient was dropped from the study.  The remaining 13 women were given clomipramine for five weeks and then another antidepressant drug, desipramine, for an additional five weeks.  The second drug has a different effect on nerve chemistry from clomipramine and has been found ineffective in obsessive-compulsive disorders.  "The patients reported a reduction in the frequency and intensity of the hair-pulling urge and an increased ability to resist this compulsion during clomipramine treatment, but not during desipramine treatment," the researchers reported.  "Three patients had a complete remission of hair pulling, and nine had a reduction of 50% or more in the severity of symptoms," they wrote.  The women "were able to complete routine tasks, such as dressing or putting on makeup, without ritual behavior and reported a significant reduction in the amount of time spent pulling out or thinking about pulling out their hair," they explained.  The fact that the women responded to clomipramine but not to the other anti-depressant drug suggests that trichotillomania may be related to the obsessive-compulsive disorders, Michael A. Jenike of Massachusetts General Hospital's clinic for obsessive-compulsive disorders in Boston wrote in an accompanying editorial.  Dr. Jenike noted that bowel and urinary obsessions, eating disorders, compulsive gambling and compulsive sexual behavior similarly may be related to the obsessive-compulsive disorders.  The fact that many of these disorders respond to drugs like clomipramine, which affect the serotonin chemistry of the nerves, but not to other anti-depressant drugs, suggest these disorders have similar mechanisms, Dr. Jenike said.  "Whether such habits as nail biting, face picking and smoking will respond to {serotonin-affecting} agents remains to be seen," he wrote.  A designer antibody, produced by genetic engineering, has entered the ranks of AIDS drug trials in a test that doctors hope will fuse antiviral and immune benefits in a single drug.  An AIDS patient at the National Institutes of Health began receiving the first infusions of the novel treatment, being developed by Genentech Inc. of South San Francisco in collaboration with researchers at the National Cancer Institute, a unit of NIH.  The drug uses a synthetic copy of the protein CD4, which forms the binding site used by the AIDS virus when it attacks human cells.  CD4 is stitched to an all-purpose human antibody, called immunoglobulin-G, or IgG, to form what scientists call a fusion protein or "chimera" -- a reference to the mythological beast that was part lion and part goat.  Synthetic CD4 was created on the theory that it could act as a false target for the AIDS virus, attracting and binding the virus so it cannot infect human cells -- a feat it successfully performed in the test tube.  But so far human tests of the drug, while safe, haven't brought about any clear improvement in patients' health.  Now, scientists hope that by linking CD4 and IgG, they can both sop up the virus and spark immune defenses against it.  Researchers also hope to overcome the problem of CD4's short half-life in the blood stream.  "Because IgG stays in the body longer than CD4 alone, we hope to attain higher blood levels of the drug and give it less frequently," said Robert Yarchoan, the cancer institute reseacher who administered the first dose.  "There's also the hope that IgG can contribute to an immunologic defense," he added.  Dr. Yarchoan said about 15 patients will get the new drug at NIH and about 50 patients will participate in a multicenter study that includes the University of Washington, Seattle; Stanford University in Palo Alto, Calif.; New England Deaconess Hospital in Boston and San Francisco General Hospital.  The first phase of the study will weigh the safety of combined CD4-IgG.  Potential risks, scientists say, include the possibility that patients could develop antibodies against the drug, curbing its effectiveness or provoking toxic reactions.  A second risk is that the agent could stick to human antibodies, forming clumps called "immune complexes" that get stuck in human organs causing respiratory distress or kidney ailments.  "All the drugs we use in AIDS today must be treated with respect," said Samuel Broder, director of the National Cancer Institute.  "But what is really exciting is that we've launched the age of designer antibodies in human disease.  By taking the AIDS virus binding site, stitching it to the backbone of IgG, you've created an antibody that never existed in nature before."  Earlier this week, Genentech said it raised $72 million in a limited partnership to fund the development of CD4 products.  Genentech Limited Partners IV is the largest such partnership in the biotechnology company's history.  According to Stephen A. Sherwin, vice president of clinical research, this shows that "Genentech is 100% committed to the development of a CD4-based product against AIDS. We've even committed ourselves to a second-generation product before the first generation is completed.  We think this will be an important product."  A Texas superconductor consortium said it agreed to share research information on superconductivity with three U.S. Department of Energy national laboratories.  The agreement may lead to joint research projects by the national laboratories and the consortium, which was formed earlier this year by two other consortia: the Microelectronics & Computer Technology Corp. in Austin and the Texas Center for Superconductivity at the University of Houston.  The federal laboratories involved are Argonne National Laboratory near Chicago, Los Alamos National Laboratory in New Mexico and Oak Ridge National Laboratory in Tennessee.  The agreement follows several other pacts aimed at increasing collaboration among U.S. businesses, universities and government agencies in developing superconductor technology.  In May, for example, American Telephone & Telegraph Co., International Business Machines Corp. and Massachusetts Institute of Technology formed a superconductor consortium.  Such consortia are aimed, in part, at increasing U.S. competitiveness in the face of Japanese industry-government collaboration on new superconductors, which conduct electricity without resistance and promise a host of new technologies.  Several major supermarket chains have decided against selling milk and other dairy products from cows treated with a genetically engineered growth hormone.  The policies of the big food retailers regarding bovine growth hormone, or BGH, became public yesterday as a coalition of 40 consumer, environmental and farm groups petitioned the Food and Drug Administration to halt the sale of dairy products containing BGH until the long-term health and economic effects of the hormone are fully studied.  The FDA hasn't yet approved BGH -- also known as bovine somatotropin -- for commercial use, but it has been allowing the sale of milk from BGH-treated herds on the ground that it doesn't pose a health hazard.  One FDA official estimated the amount of BGH-tested milk on the market at less than 1% of the total supply.  The decision of the major chains to hold off to see whether the FDA gives its final approval, conceivably as early as January, was hailed as a breakthrough by the Foundation on Economic Trends, a Washington-based group that opposes many applications of biotechnology.  Jeremy Rifkin, president of the group, identified the chains as Safeway Stores Inc., Oakland, Calif.; Stop & Shop Cos., Boston; Kroger Co., Cincinnati; Supermarkets General Corp., Woodbridge, N.J.; and Vons Cos., El Monte, Calif.  "We aren't anti-BST {bovine somatotropin}," said Jack Partridge, a Kroger spokesman.  "But if we're going to make any mistakes on this, we're going to make them on the side of safety."  A Safeway spokesman said that the chain requires assurances from its suppliers for Safeway's Lucerne brand that the milk is free of BGH.  "It was in 1986 that we first took this position," he said.  Tests show that BGH boosts milk production as much 25%, and many dairy groups fear widespread use of the hormone would cause a price-depressing glut of milk that would drive family farmers out of business.  The groups also fear a consumer backlash at a time when so-called natural foods are in growing demand.  Four companies are working on versions of BGH -- Monsanto Co., American Cyanamid Co., Upjohn Co. and Eli Lilly Co.  They have spent more than $100 million on research and development, each hopeful of capturing a large share of the $500 million-a-year market predicted for the growth hormone.  Opponents of BGH, in their petition to the FDA, cited scientific evidence that the hormone reduces the fertility of cows and increases their susceptibility to infectious diseases.  They also said several questions about human health effects have yet to be answered.  In a position paper issued Aug. 4, the FDA said that BGH is safe in milk because it is a protein that breaks down into "inactive fragments" when consumed.  BGH, the agency added, "has always been present in milk . . . because it is produced naturally in the cows' pituitary."  The agency plans to publish early next year the research findings that will figure in whatever decision it makes on commercial marketing of BGH-treated milk.  BACK-TO-SCHOOL sales may mean back-to-better profits for retailers.  Early-August sales are running about 7% ahead of last year, says Elizabeth A. Armstrong, retail analyst with Prescott, Ball & Turben.  Brisk sales mean that markdowns could be slim and slow in coming this fall -- unlike last year, says Margo McGlade, PaineWebber retail analyst.  Less torrid weather this year is helping to motivate shoppers, particularly in the Midwest, where farmer families were hard-hit by last year's drought.  Another plus: Consumer confidence continues to be high.  So what is the Class of '90 wearing?  Color them neon -- chartreuse, orange, pink and yellow -- in everything from lunch boxes to socks.  New offerings include "skeggings": combination mini-skirts and attached leggings.  Boys favor bomber jackets and pants with lots of doodads like extra zippers, big pockets and leather trim.  Bloomingdale's says girls want vests, vests, vests and, like, "boyfriend" jackets -- oversized sport coats worn with rolled-up sleeves.  Frilly dresses are out; Chanel knockoffs are in.  Catholic school boys in Chicago leave Sears with this outfit: navy blue pants and sweater, powder blue shirt, crew socks.  POOR PUTTERS win a victory as a proposed "long putter" ban is dropped.  The U.S. Golf Association this week decided the putter needn't be barred from competition after all.  The association was considering outlawing the putters, as long as 52 inches, compared with the standard 35.  Golf Week editor Charlie Stine, who opposed the ban, notes "it would have been attacking an already distressed group."  The move by the often-stuffy USGA is lauded as refreshingly sympathetic to the common player.  Now if only they could do something about those fees.  Annual golf-course maintenance is at a record of $24,744 a hole, on average, says a national survey of 1988 country and city club costs by Pannell Kerr Forster, Houston.  In the far West, costs soar to $31,139 a hole.  Overall golfer expenses rose an average 8.7% this year; East and Midwest costs-of-golfing jumped 9.3%.  GOING PUBLIC presents its own particular agony and ecstasy, CEOs say.  Drew Osterman, head of International CMOS Technology Inc., a San Jose semiconductor firm, says the biggest headache is meeting each state's "blue sky" rules on new offerings.  The regulations are "a mind-boggling rat race," he says.  Investor relations are among top concerns.  Mr. Osterman hit 19 cities in three weeks during the firm's road show.  And Timothy Martin of Country Lake Foods Inc., St. Paul, observes: "Timing is everything in life."  The company's public offering was planned near the time of the 1987 stock market crash.  Country Lake pulled back, waited six months and raised $14 million, thank you.  Separately, a study of 150 newly public firms by Carter Valin Pollen, New York, finds that half those surveyed say the offering price met their hopes, but 45% say it didn't.  CEOs say the most difficult part of going public is controlling expenses while financial men say market conditions pose the biggest challenge.  Two-thirds say the offering process took under 12 months.  Venture capital, while often easier, "comes with too many strings," says Mr. Osterman.  MARVIN COLLECTS $5.50: There are only nine private toll roads in the U.S., and one of them is 17 Mile Drive through Pebble Beach Resort in California.  Tolls (for road maintenance) are paid to a firm co-owned by investor Marvin Davis.  Guests at the resort are exempt.  AREN'T 21 ENOUGH?  On average, American men own 22 ties (many blue), says a status report from the Tie Rack.  Bow-tie ownership is meager, but a third of those surveyed say they could knot one.  OLD BURIAL insurance policies, sold decades ago, are the target of a Metropolitan Life search.  A $999 policy could be worth $4,000 today, including interest.  The insurer would rather pay the individuals than let the money go to the states by default.  OUT-OF-WORK executives are tough to place in '89.  More take short stints.  Executives in their 50s -- particularly those with nice early-retirement benefits and golden parachutes -- warm to the idea of temporary stewardship, says John Thompson of Interim Management.  "It gives them latitude to generate income" while deciding on a permanent path, he says.  Mr. Thompson, who founded the New York firm after he took early retirement, adds that salaries for the high-level posts start around $75,000.  Commitments are for at least three months, and many require relocating.  Displaced executives have a harder time finding jobs this year than last, says an outplacement survey by Drake Beam Morin, New York.  But those who do find positions earn more money: The average compensation package is up 9% from a year ago.  The study finds that the average age of the displaced executive is 44 and that "networking" remains the most effective way to find a job.  General management, finance and accounting posts decline this year, but marketing and sales positions are plentiful.  Women find jobs 13% faster than men, but they earn 31% less, according to the study.  BRIEFS: A video game watch brings Nintendo's "Super Mario Bros." to little wrists for $29.95, from P.W. Pony Express, New York. . . .  Smack in the middle of Manhattan at the corner of 57th Street and Lexington Avenue, a city manhole cover admits it was "Made in China."  The U.K. Monopolies and Mergers Commission conditionally approved Grand Metropolitan PLC's purchase of the William Hill betting office chain.  However, the commission said Grand Met should be required to dispose of some overlapping betting offices.  The British food, drink and leisure concern owns the 800-unit Mecca betting shop chain and its acquisition of William Hill, with its 900 offices in the U.K., more than doubles the size of its betting operations.  The commission concluded that the merger wouldn't put Grand Met in a position to exert undue market power on an industrywide basis, except in a "small number of local areas" where the sole competitors are William Hill and Mecca.  Grand Met bought the William Hill chain last April from Sears PLC. Britain's Sears is unrelated to the U.S. company of a similar name.  Landis & Gyr AG, a Swiss electronics and machinery group, said it plans to cut 1,000 jobs between now and the spring of 1990 as part of its restructuring plan.  Willy Kissling, the group's managing director, said the cuts would be made through attrition and early retirements.  The move was criticized by the Swiss Metal and Watchworkers Union and by the Christian Metalworkers Union of Switzerland.  Landis & Gyr's profit in 1988 declined to 65.5 million Swiss francs ($39.2 million) from 66.3 million francs in 1987, despite a 25.6% sales rise to 2.008 billion francs from 1.598 billion francs.  The restructuring plan, dubbed "Concept 2000," envisions defining more sharply three autonomous product groups -- comfort control (air conditioning andheating), energy and communications -- and is scheduled to be implemented Oct. 1, Mr. Kissling said.  He said the group's head office and service functions will be under Landis & Gyr Management AG.  Asko Deutsche Kaufhaus AG confirmed it has acquired a 14% holding in Koninklijke Ahold, a Dutch retailer, but said it has no "hostile intentions."  The West German retailing group said it regrets the decision by Ahold and several other European companies to cut off talks on its participation in a European retailing alliance because of the purchase of the Ahold stake.  Asko said it informed Ahold about the move well ahead of the public announcement.  The stake "wasn't acquired in any hostile intention, and should be seen as a measure in the spirit of the planned cooperation," Asko said.  Last Oct. 10, Standard & Poor's issued an extraordinary testimony to the creditworthiness of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.  It expressed confidence that the state would "continue to achieve sound financial results," that its capital improvement program was "affordable and manageable" and that its admittedly "aggressive" revenue projections nonetheless "seem reasonable."  The rating agency confirmed the state's AA-plus rating; at that point Moody's also confirmed its Aa rating for the state's bonds.  By today, less than a year later, Standard & Poor's has dropped Massachusetts' rating three times, and Moody's has dropped its rating twice.  Rated A by both S&P and Moody's, Massachusetts now has a lower bond rating than any state save Louisiana.  Few investors, we would guess, were foolish enough to put any credence in last year's bond ratings.  By October, everyone in Massachusetts understood the state's finances were chaotic.  It was discussed in the legislature, in the Boston newspapers, by all the local bankers and economists, by the lieutenant governor.  The nation's biggest newspaper, we are proud to say, had broadcast the facts to national investors.  Those supposed guardians of financial probity, Standard & Poor's and Moody's, were the last to know.  While paradoxical, this is no surprise to anyone familiar with the record.  In late 1974, S&P unaccountably upgraded its rating for New York City bonds from BBB to A, even though the city was clearly in financial peril.  Only four months later, Moody's confirmed the city's crucial A rating even while the market was rejecting its bonds.  Only days later, S&P suddenly withdrew all of the city's ratings.  Still, Moody's didn't lower its A rating to Ba until October 1975.  Senator Thomas Eagleton (D., Mo.) claimed the city's problems would "never have reached the crisis stage" were it not for overly optimistic bond ratings.  "If the facts had been known . . . no one would have invested a dime."  The rating agencies were caught napping again in the Washington Public Power Supply System fiasco, or WHOOPS.  By January 1983, utility experts were calling a default on $2.25 billion of WHOOPS bonds "inevitable."  Yet S&P didn't suspend its ratings for WHOOPS until May, only two months before the actual default.  Moody's did not reduce its A-1 rating by three notches until May.  Jim Cusser, who graded Massachusetts bond issues for S&P until 1982, says the agencies' recent treatment of Massachusetts has also clearly been in error.  Mr. Cusser says many bond analysts are prejudiced in favor of liberal, big-spending governments.  For years the agencies withheld their highest ratings from New Hampshire, largely because it routinely balances its budget by cutting spending instead of raising taxes.  Thomas Gamello, an analyst for the brokerage firm of Prescott Ball & Turben Inc., says of Massachusetts: "It's been clear for eight to 10 months nothing good was coming out of that state.  The reasons they give now for dropping the rating applied last year."  He finds widespread agreement among bond dealers that "political factors" played a role in the state keeping its top rating so long.  Both rating agencies deny any political motivation in their decisions.  Cathy L. Daicoff, managing director at S&P, says: "It only recently became clear how much disarray Massachusetts was in."  In fact, we tend to agree that something deeper is involved.  The basic problem is not partisan politics, but the bond agencies' fundamental conceit: that they are smarter than the marketplace.  If S&P and Moody's really knew which bonds were better than others, they would logically keep the information to themselves and make a fortune trading.  But in fact no bunch of analysts can concoct ratings that will outperform, let alone guide, the diversified decisions of the market.  To find out which bonds are safe and which ones risky, don't look at the ratings, look at the interest rate.  This, we've always assumed, is what the rating agencies actually do, at least in their more sober moments.  Last fall wasn't one of those moments; politics and cowardice intruded.  By refusing to act, the agencies did not avoid politics but immersed themselves in it.  Dukakis budget chief Frank Keefe seized on S&P's favorable report, saying it proved "Massachusetts is in indisputably great shape."  S&P and Moody's concurred right up until this spring, and bear their own share of blame for today's Massachusetts budget mess.  The lesson is: When it comes to opinions of rating agencies, let the buyer beware.  And the voter too.  Charles E. Shultz was appointed president and chief operating officer of this oil and natural gas producer, based here.  Mr. Shultz, 50 years old, was formerly at Tenneco Oil Co. in Houston, where he served as senior vice president, responsible for international exploration and production, and product marketing and business development.  The company's previous president, Stuart K. McWalter, 64, will continue as chairman and chief executive officer.  Infants born to parents without health insurance are 30% more likely to suffer adverse health effects or death than those born to insured parents, a study says.  For uninsured minority newborns, the risk is much greater.  While previous research has shown that the uninsured receive less health care, this study is the first to demonstrate that "a lack of health insurance is resulting in serious illness and death," said Paula Braveman, of the University of California at San Francisco Medical School and lead author of the study.  Thus it adds a new element to the national debate over whether and how to extend health insurance to the nation's 31 million to 37 million uninsured.  Major corporations are particularly worried about the problem because their health-care costs reflect the added expense that hospitals and other providers bear to care for uninsured patients.  Legislation that would mandate universal health coverage is pending in Congress.  The uninsured are, for the most part, working in service-industry jobs where employers don't provide medical insurance.  Welfare recipients are generally covered by federal and state Medicaid programs.  "What we're talking about are not the chronically unemployed," Dr. Braveman said.  "We're talking about demonstrated serious health consequences for a population that is working and falling through increasingly large holes in {society's} safety net."  The findings, published in today's New England Journal of Medicine, are based on a review of hospital-discharge records for births in eight Northern California counties for 1982, 1984 and 1986.  The researchers found that uninsured-black newborns face four times the risk of adverse outcomes than insured-white infants; for Hispanics, the risk is nearly twice that of insured whites.  For these minorities, socioeconomic factors -- some related to cutbacks in government funding of social services in the 1980s -- exacerbated the impact of their lack of health insurance, the researchers concluded.  Low birth weight and fetal malnutrition -- indicators of poor prenatal care -- were also more prevalent among uninsured newborns, the study found.  In addition, the overall rate of uninsured newborns jumped 45%, to 8% of total newborns covered by the study in 1986 from 5.5% in 1982, the researchers found.  The study also disclosed severe financial consequences related to infants with adverse health problems.  Mean hospital charges for newborns discharged within five days of birth were $827 in 1986.  For infants staying in the hospital six days or longer, the mean charges soared to $14,411.  The review covered 28,345 births in the last half of 1982, 57,492 births in 1984 and 60,631 births in 1986 -- all told, about 12% of the births in California in those periods.  Newborns were considered to have had adverse hospital outcomes if they remained in the hospital for more than five days, if they were transferred to another hospital or long-term-care facility, or if they died.  Pacific Enterprises said its Pacific Enterprises Oil Co. unit discovered oil in Campbell County, Wyo.  The well, called Louis Federal No. 1334, was completed in the Upper "B" zone of the Minnelusa formation, pumping 505 barrels of oil a day from depths between 8,584 and 8,610 feet.  Pacific Enterprises, a utility and retail holding company, has a 45% working interest in the well.  The remaining interests are held by Dallas-based Pathfinder Exploration Inc., Minnoco Inc. and a third company that Pacific Enterprises didn't identify.  Pacific Enterprises said there is the potential for as many as eight development locations on the prospect, in which the company would have interests ranging from 45.5% to 66.5%.  Nine environmental groups sued Exxon Corp., charging that its plans to clean up Prince William Sound this winter are inadequate and asking that it develop a better plan before spring.  "Exxon has demonstrated that it won't clean up Alaska's coastline unless it is compelled to do so," said Randall Weiner, executive director of Trustees for Alaska, one of the groups.  "So we feel it is necessary for a court to oversee cleanup operations and enforce an adequate plan."  In the federal suit, the groups charge that the company has ignored the problem of oil that has soaked into some beaches or settled at the bottom of offshore waters.  The suit also alleges that, in some cases, Exxon's activities have worsened the environmental damage.  Unlike the more than 150 lawsuits already filed against Exxon in connection with the March 24 Exxon Valdez super-tanker oil spill, the latest suit doesn't seek monetary damages but attempts to transfer control over the cleanup from Exxon to a court.  The action follows a suit this month by the National Wildlife Federation that seeks to require Exxon to establish an independent fund to pay for studies of environmental effects of the spill.  A spokesman for Exxon withheld comment, saying the company hadn't yet seen the latest suit.  The environmentalists' suit is part of a larger effort to press Exxon into more vigorous actions as the onset of winter next month in Alaska threatens to bring cleanup activities to a halt.  Exxon contends that rough winter weather makes cleanup attempts too hazardous.  But the company has said it will keep a small force in Prince William Sound and the Gulf of Alaska to help protect fish hatcheries from drifting oil.  Besides Trustees for Alaska, plaintiffs in the suit include Sierra Club, Defenders of Wildlife, National Audubon Society, Natural Resources Defense Council, and Greenpeace U.S.A.  Now we know how our ancestors felt when someone finally solved the riddle of the Sphinx.  The riddle of Washington this decade has been how Legal Services Corp. fought off President Reagan's efforts to shut it down.  It remains untouched even by reforms intended to get it out of politics and back to its intended role, providing legal services for the poor.  The riddle has a simple answer.  The legislators who created LSC deliberately placed it out of the reach of the executive branch, and, hence, outside the Constitution.  It is accountable only to the clique of "public interest" lawyers who get the $300 million it hands out annually.  President Bush dare not surrender on this issue if he is to protect his office.  He right now is choosing LSC Board nominees and should be looking for men and women who will fight to restore executive control.  They will be armed with a legal analysis by former Justice Department official Charles Cooper, requested by the outgoing LSC Board.  It says the law creating LSC violates the Constitution's separation of powers doctrine.  Congress created LSC 15 years ago after President Nixon impounded funds appropriated for its predecessor organization because it had spent money on left-wing causes.  Congress decided to make LSC independent of the President by creating it as a "private non-membership non-profit organization."  The LSC Board is nominated by the President and subject to Senate confirmation, but the President has no power to remove its members -- in direct violation of a long string of Supreme Court cases.  In upholding independent counsel, for example, the Supreme Court emphasized that the President can fire these prosecutors at any time for good cause.  The President has no leverage at all over LSC once board members are approved.  LSC can thus best be described as a quasi-autonomous, non-governmental organization -- neither fish nor fowl.  This quango, as the British call their own similar aberrations, has no place in our three-branch system.  The refusal of LSC to reform itself or in any way be held accountable for its abuses is precisely why President Reagan used the only power left him -- trying to veto the entire LSC budget.  He surely had ample reason.  Instead of helping the poor with legal assistance in landlord-tenant cases or child-custody fights, here's how LSC has spent your money:  LSC staffers funded one lobbying group that bragged of holding meetings "indicting Reagan for his crimes" and another that promised to "fight the Reagan budget cuts."  LSC urged "muckraking kinds of research" and intimidation under the precept "whenever possible go outside the experience of the enemy to cause confusion, frustration and fear."  An internal report found diversion of "services intended for the poor to such non-poor groups as Planned Parenthood, the American Civil Liberties Union, the San Francisco Sex Offenders Task Force . . ."  LSC funds even went to sue the U.S. government to get around regulations prohibiting export of vehicles to Nicaragua.  If we are going to have a program of government-funded litigation for the poor, funds should go to the poor and not to some lawyer's idea of the public good or foreign policy.  LSC can easily become accountable and constitutional by making it part of an executive-branch agency, the most appropriate probably being the Justice Department.  The Constitution does not brook riddles, solved or unsolved.  Federal prosecutors here will allow Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. to pay Michael Milken his 1988 compensation, paving the way for the securities firm to complete its long-awaited agreement to plead guilty to six felony counts.  Prosecutors last week told attorneys for Mr. Milken that they would not enforce a provision of an agreement they reached with Drexel last December that required the firm to withhold Mr. Milken's compensation.  Mr. Milken's attorneys had challenged the provision as unconstitutional.  The 1988 compensation for Mr. Milken, Drexel's former chief of junk bond operations, was previously estimated at about $200 million.  Spokesmen for Mr. Milken and Drexel declined to comment yesterday.  John K. Carroll, a prosecutor in the case, also wouldn't comment.  In an unrelated ruling that may have had an impact on the government's decision, a panel of the Eighth U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled in May that it is unconstitutional for the government to require an employer to terminate an employee.  The court ruled that the Fifth Amendment protects an employee "from arbitrary government interference" and entitles that employee to due process.  Mr. Milken's lawyers arguments were almost the same as those made in the Eighth Circuit case.  Mr. Milken was charged in March in a 98-count indictment alleging racketeering, conspiracy, securities fraud and other trading-related violations.  Prosecutors have said he faces an expanded indictment by Oct. 1.  With the Milken challenge resolved, Drexel can now plead guilty to the previously agreed-to felony counts and pay $650 million in fines and restitution.  Socialism has become so discredited in Hungary that a hardline rival to the ruling Hungarian Socialist Workers' Party changed its name because workers reject anything labeled "communist" or "socialist."  The "Communist Party of Hungary" was formed by people who think the current regime is betraying communist ideals.  But when workers wouldn't join, organizers renamed themselves the Workers' Marxist-Leninist Party.  Even with the new name, party leader Sandor Petres expects tough going.  He admitted to Hungarian Radio that he couldn't name a single effective working communist country anywhere in the world, but obviously he and his colleagues intend to fight to the bitter end, even if it is no longer feasible to use that C-word.  Regency Electronics Inc. said it agreed to form a joint venture with a closely held electronics concern in Tokyo to manufacture communications equipment.  Regency didn't disclose how much funding the venture with Japan's AK Corp. will have, but said it will begin by manufacturing cellular telephones, and will subsequently make specialized mobile radios.  Regency, which makes communications and other electronic gear, additionally said it intends to change next month its name to Relm Communications Inc.  Carolina Power & Light Co., Cyprus Minerals Co. and Greyhound Corp. were added to the Standard & Poor's Corp. 500-stock index.  Dropped from the S&P 500 were Marion Laboratories Inc. and Prime Computer Inc., which are being acquired, and Reading & Bates Corp., which is restructuring.  his portrait of a self-made businessman who kept his ideals as his collars frayed -- William Dean Howells chronicled the American scene in some 50 volumes before dying, long out of fashion, in 1920.  With his friend Henry James, he was the champion of realism, and a great force in American fiction of the late 19th century.  Just how interesting his work remains for its social and economic analysis, we are reminded of in a splendid new volume published by The Library of America (881 pages, $35).  I read it together with another Library summer release of three Henry James novels from the 1880s (1,296 pages, $35).  Both are printed on the acid-free paper and with the scholarly attention marking this estimable series devoted to notable American novelists, historians, essayists, poets and philosophers.  Howells is represented by three mid-career novels, "The Minister's Charge," "April Hopes" and "Annie Kilburn, " while "The Princess Casamassima," "The Reverberator" and "The Tragic Muse" round out the James volume.  As editor of the Atlantic, Howells was the first serious critic to recognize James's "very great literary genius."  He praised the vigor of James's prose, his brilliant characterization and his "luminous and uncommon use of words."  James, he wrote, had advanced the art of fiction by illuminating "the springs of action" and "the analysis of motive."  James also doffed his hat a lot at Howells.  That "vessel of light," he called him, whose "unfailing, testifying truth" would keep him "from ever being neglected."  And yet how different were these two friends in their approach to the social and economic realities of capitalism in the 1880s.  Howells was born in 1837 in Ohio, where Jeffersonian egalitarianism was the civic religion.  Later, when he moved to Boston, he was dismayed to discover the culture of poverty developing in the slums -- as immigrants and the rural poor moved in, looking for work in the mills and factories.  How "unequally things are divided in this world," he remarked in 1884 writing about the Back Bay elite.  "While these beautiful, airy, wholesome houses are uninhabited {during the summer vacation season}, thousands upon thousands of poor creatures are stifling in wretched barracks in the city here, whole families in one room.  I wonder that men are so patient with society as they are."  In "The Minister's Charge" and "Annie Kilburn," Howells dramatized with striking clarity the disparities of wealth and poverty in Boston.  These stories reflect Howells's claim that social evils occur because good men do nothing and that we are independently responsible for the economic disorder that afflicts society.  As a sharp critic of laissez-faire capitalism, Howells deplored the chance world of business that produced parvenu millionaires and mired others in grinding poverty.  As he gravitated toward a creed of Christian socialism reminiscent of Tolstoy, Howells abandoned his light comedies of manners for socially engaged fiction agitating for an economy that would provide for "the happiness of the whole human family."  The three novels in this volume show Howells resolving in fictional form the social and economic conflicts of the era through a new morality based on economic redistribution and labor peace.  James was likewise dismayed by the capital-labor conflicts of the 1880s, but his political position was much more conservative.  Living in London, where the effects of industrialization were even more visible, James noted "the steady rumble of that deep keynote of English manners, overscored so often, and with such sweet beguilement, by finer harmonies, but never extinguished -- the economic struggle for existence."  England in the 1880s, he concluded, was the "ancien regime" come again.  But in London there existed what had not seriously developed in America -- an extensive underground of urban terrorists ready to overthrow the regime by violence.  To write "The Princess Casamassima," James visited the slums, inspected the Milbank prison and studied the circle of London anarchists whose revolutionary ideas -- including bombing and assassination -- were modeled on those of Bakunin and Prince Kropotkin.  "The Princess" vividly depicts the misery of the London poor.  The central character is a young artisan-bookbinder, Hyacinth Robinson, who is recruited by revolutionaries to assassinate an enemy of the people.  Sent to the continent by the radical-chic Princess Casamassima (really Christina Light, an American girl married to an Italian prince), Hyacinth first encounters the glories of European life.  He visits great ducal houses, cathedrals, colleges and museums, and slowly their meaning begins to filter into his hot head.  Although Hyacinth knows that these have all been purchased with the sweat of underpaid workingmen, these glories are, for all that, precious monuments of the human spirit in all its imaginative grandeur, available for spiritual possession by all.  Recognizing that the success of the revolution would mean the destruction of the civilization that has produced such triumphs, the sensitive Hyacinth becomes paralyzed.  How he acts on his oath to strike a blow for the revolution, I will leave for the reader to find out.  ---  Mr. Tuttleton is professor of English at New York University.  Sun Microsystems Inc. said its Canadian subsidiary agreed to sell $80 million of computers over three years to the Kinburn Technology unit of Ottawa-based Kinburn Corp., which controls eight companies, including SHL Systemhouse, a computer supplier.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it lowered ratings on about $40 million of debt of this home decorating accessories maker.  Subordinated debt was dropped to triple-C, from single-B minus.  EX-MAYOR QUITS LAW FIRM: Former Philadelphia Mayor William J. Green resigned from 252-lawyer Wolf, Block, Schorr & Solis-Cohen, where he was a partner, to become vice president, government relations, at MacAndrews & Forbes Group Inc., the parent company of Revlon Group Inc. Mr. Green, 51 years old, was mayor from 1980 to 1983 and a U.S. representative from 1964 to 1977.  He joins former Wolf Block partner Howard Gittis, who became MacAndrews & Forbes's vice chairman and chief administrative officer in 1985.  OTHER CAREER MOVES: Milgrim Thomajan & Lee said Arthur H. Ruegger, 35, will join the New York law firm as a partner, effective Sept. 1.  Until this week, he was a partner at Myerson & Kuhn, a spinoff of Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Heine, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey, the defunct national firm where Mr. Ruegger also was a partner.  He will be a litigator at 100-lawyer Milgrim Thomajan.  TELESPHERE INTERNATIONAL Inc. said a private investor group purchased $4.2 million in 10-year exchangeable debentures.  The purchase is the final installment of a pact under which New York investor Francesco Galesi's FG Ventures agreed to buy $15 million of debentures.  Telesphere, of Oakbrook Terrace, Ill., provides long-distance telephone service.  Having become rich and famous with his docudramatic investigations of the U.S. presidency ("All the President's Men") and the Supreme Court ("The Brethren"), Washington Post reporter/editor Bob Woodward a few years ago turned his attention to another great American institution, John Belushi.  Mr. Woodward pronounced the late comedian's tawdry, drug-induced death as a highly significant American tragedy, perhaps to justify the time and effort that went into the best-selling "Wired."  Now the book has been made into a very bad movie that offers only the small satisfaction of seeing Mr. Woodward being demoted from Robert Redford to J.T. Walsh.  Mr. Walsh, who has acted well elsewhere, here has been given little to do but look puffy and bland.  He otherwise expresses himself by wearing his blue blazer buttoned in some scenes, unbuttoned in others.  Director Larry Peerce, whose previous films include "Goodbye Columbus" and "The Other Side of the Mountain," Parts I and II, and screenwriter Earl Mac Rauch ("The Adventures of Buckaroo Banzai") decided to tell the Belushi story as a contemporary "It's a Wonderful Life."  Only the Belushi who takes a tour of his life with an angel isn't about to commit suicide, he's dead, already zipped up in a bag in the morgue.  Ray Sharkey plays his guardian angel, inexplicably as a Puerto Rican cab driver called Angel.  The rest of the actors came into this project anonymously and that's how they'll leave it, if they're lucky.  Surely young Michael Chiklis, who has the dubious ability to mimic Belushi, won't want to be remembered as a naked, whining fatso who can do a not-bad imitation of the Belushi Killer Bee and Blues Brothers routines.  He and Gary Groomes, the Dan Aykroyd stand-in, have what might be called an unecological gift: Where can you recycle this act?  The film assumes great familiarity and adoration of the Saturday Night Live television show, where Belushi and Aykroyd became stars.  On the other hand, anyone who watched the show in the '70s will wonder where the duo's co-stars are: Where's Jane (Curtin) and the late Gilda (Radner) and Lorraine (Newman)?  Huge segments of the film are devoted to Messrs.  Chiklis and Groomes doing their earnest homage to Belushi and Aykroyd, an expenditure of energy that seems particularly wasteful since reruns of the real thing are a staple of late-night television.  When the film peeks behind the scenes of Belushi's life, we see Belushi snorting and mainlining cocaine, and we see a self-serving portrait of his wife, Judy, who apparently encouraged Mr. Woodward to write about her husband.  If she was as simpering in life as she is on film, one sympathizes a bit with Belushi's escape into reality-altering substances.  The 30-second television commercials put out by Drug-Free America make the same point as "Wired," and are worth remembering if you're thinking about seeing this movie: Just say no.  ---  The young British actress Emily Lloyd, who looks like Melanie Griffiths's skinny little sister, made an impressive debut as a strong-willed teenager in the 1987 British film, "Wish You Were Here."  Hollywood imported her and cast her in a father-daughter gangster comedy called "Cookie," in which the poor girl struggles unsuccessfully to get her mouth around a Brooklyn accent.  Since she is the star of the show, I strained for much of the film to make out what she was saying, then wished I hadn't when I did.  Try as she might, Ms. Lloyd couldn't convince anyone that she's from Brooklyn (or from anywhere, she's so garbled here) and "Cookie" isn't likely to convince anyone that it's "Married to the Mob," much as its makers might like it to be.  Director Susan Seidelman, whose previous films ("Desperately Seeking Susan," "Smithereens," "Making Mr. Right") had a nice whimsical feel for modern womanhood, seems to have felt no enthusiasm for this material.  She moves her characters from here to there competently, without zest.  Yet who could get sparked by the paint-by-numbers Mafioso whom screenwriters Nora Ephron and Alice Arlen ("Silkwood") have dashed off?  Luckily, Dianne Wiest appears in the amiable comedy "Parenthood" this summer, so her fans won't be compelled, for lack of a better opportunity, to see her in this.  Peter Falk is Peter Falk, which is nice and comforting, but not nearly enough to make up for what he's forced to do.  This isn't a hateful piece of work, just dull, so I'd like to say something nice about it: The last 10 minutes are almost good.  ---  VIDEO TIP: Watching "Wired" I began wondering why most recent movies about drug abuse are so heavy-handed and awful ("Less Than Zero," "Bright Lights, Big City," "The Boost"), when movies about alcoholism manage to be quite good ("The Days of Wine and Roses," for example).  I was saved from making any half-baked sociological pronouncements by a friend who reminded me of last year's "Clean and Sober," a remarkable picture about drug addiction with a boffo performance from Michael ("Batman") Keaton.  Also, don't judge Susan Seidelman by "Cookie"; check out her earlier films, mentioned above, which are quirky and fun.  Just five months after its introduction, General Motors Corp. is raising the price of its 1990 Chevrolet Lumina sedan, the first of a new line of four-door sedans GM is counting on to boost its sagging car-market share.  The least expensive Lumina will sell for $12,340, up 3.8% from the original base price of $11,883.  The base price of the Lumina Euro sedan, which Chevrolet expects to be the more popular version, will rise 3.4% to $14,240 from $13,776 currently.  GM appears to be boosting the Lumina prices in step with its prime competitor, the Ford Taurus.  The 1990 Taurus will start at $12,594, or $254 more than Lumina, and up 6.9% from the 1989 Taurus base price of $11,778.  But the 1990 Taurus will have a standard driver-side air bag.  Chevy's Lumina will not.  So far, Lumina hasn't set the market on fire.  At the end of July, dealers had an 82-day supply of the sedans; a 60 to 65-day supply is considered desirable.  In mid-August, GM sold 2,865 Luminas.  Ford, by comparison, sold 8,363 Taurus sedans.  Meanwhile, Chevrolet set the price for its top-of-the-line image car, the Corvette ZR-1, at $58,995.  That sticker could make the ZR-1 the most expensive car GM sells, depending on the final price of Cadillac's Allante model.  The 1989 Allante sells for $57,183.  Cadillac hasn't announced a final price for the 1990 Allante.  Overall, Chevrolet officials said they expect the division to increase its combined U.S. car and truck market share to roughly 20% in the 1990 model year from an estimated 18% for 1989.  Chevrolet general manager J.C. Perkins forecast 1990 Chevy sales at about 2.9 million vehicles, including more than 1.4 million trucks.  That's up from 2.8 million currently estimated for the model year that ends next month.  Division marketing executives said the new car advertisements will focus on product and features, rather than image.  Truck advertising will accent image, however, with lots of quick shots in one television version of men hard at work in factory settings.  Wellman Inc., which recycles plastic into fiber, agreed to acquire Fiber Industries Inc., which makes and markets polyester textile fibers under the Fortrel name, for about $361 million.  Wellman also will retire about $179 million of Fiber Industries debt and $20 million of Fiber's preferred stock.  Wellman plans to fund the deal by issuing $115 million of common stock and paying with bank debt and its own cash.  The transaction is subject to clearance by regulators and a vote by shareholders of closely held Fiber Industries, which is based in Charlotte, N.C. Wellman said, however, that it has obtained enough proxies from Fiber's holders to approve the transaction.  The companies expect to close the transaction within 90 days.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Wellman shares rose $1.50 to $29.375.  Thomas M. Duff, president and chief executive officer of Wellman, called the proposed acquisition of Fiber Industries "a natural fit in that they service the parts of the polyester-fiber market that we don't."  For example, both companies make polyester staple, but Wellman's is used in carpet and in fillings for pillows and comforters, while that of Fiber Industries is blended with cotton for sheets, upholstery and apparel.  Wellman estimates that between 20% and 25% of the Fiber Industries product line can be made using recycled plastic, including plastic derived from consumer recycling programs.  Wellman has agreements to buy plastic from recycling programs run by, among other entities, Browning-Ferris Industries Inc., the Houston waste-management company.  In 1988, Wellman recycled more than 350 million pounds of plastic and fiber.  Fiber Industries was formed through a 1988 leveraged buy-out of assets from Hoechst Celanese Corp., a subsidiary of West Germany's Hoechst AG.  Bottom-fishing and program buying gave stock and bond prices a lift in another day of sluggish trading.  The dollar bounced back after Tuesday's sell-off.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average shot up 27.12 points to 2678.11 in moderate trading.  Long-term Treasury bonds posted solid gains, with the price of the Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue up nearly a point, or about $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  The dollar rebounded, especially against the mark.  Traders said the bond market's rally was the result of bargain-hunters moving in after the sharp retreat in bond prices in recent weeks.  Prices began sinking as it became increasingly obvious that the economy wasn't headed for a recession and that the Federal Reserve therefore was less likely to continue easing credit.  The bond market also was buoyed late in the day by a relatively good reception for the Treasury's auction of five-year notes.  Although stock prices were up most of the day, the bond market's late gains spurred stocks to further advances.  The Dow Jones industrials gained more than 20 points in the final hour, at least partly on buy programs triggered by stock index arbitrage.  The late buy programs also helped boost volume, which otherwise was light.  The dollar's rebound came as rumors that the West German central bank would raise interest rates today faded.  Higher rates in West Germany would make the dollar less attractive to some foreign investors.  Currency traders said they wouldn't be surprised to see a West German rate increase at some point but that such action isn't likely at today's meeting of the Bundesbank Central Council.  In major market activity yesterday:  Stock prices climbed sharply in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 159.6 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners 1,015 to 487.  Bond prices rallied.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue fell to 8.16%.  The dollar rebounded.  In late New York trading, the U.S. currency was quoted at 1.9530 marks and 143.15 yen, compared with 1.9395 marks and 142.20 yen late Tuesday.  George K. Carter was elected vice president and treasurer, effective Oct. 1, succeeding Colin M. Short who is retiring.  Peter J. Robertson was elected vice president-finance for Chevron U.S.A. Inc., a unit, succeeding Mr. Carter in his previous position.  Chevron deals in integrated petroleum operations and related industries.  Baseball had been good to Roman Art Embroidery Corp., a company that makes caps for sports fans.  Then came the foreign competition, and the manufacturer was hopelessly undercut.  "Imports were burying us," says Robert Mazzola, president of the Brockton, Mass., company.  Needing advice, Roman Art turned to the New England Trade Adjustment Assistance Center, one of a dozen government-funded organizations around the country that help companies devise ways to survive against imports.  The center and the consultants it retained worked together with Roman Art to develop an entirely new specialty, something foreign competition would have a harder time invading.  The solution: Go into vintage baseball caps.  It was a good call.  Relying partly on its own archives, Roman Art now reproduces nostalgia treasures such as caps of the 1946 Dodgers and the 1927 Yankees.  And by next year, sales of the vintage caps will exceed "the best sales we ever had with the old product line," Mr. Mazzola says.  "Without the help, we would have been forced out of the field," he adds.  Across the country, about 650 companies like Roman Art are currently seeking help at the 12 assistance centers, says Daniel F. Harrington, a Commerce Department official in charge of the program.  Some of the centers are hooked up with universities or other institutions, some are independent, but all are nonprofit and government sponsored.  With a budget of about $12 million a year, the government program pays 75% of the bill for outside help and the companies pay 25%, Mr. Harrington says.  The centers were started over a decade ago to help America cope with its trade problem.  Since then the trade deficit problem has kept on growing, but the centers have helped scores of companies get back on their feet.  Their work shows how a handful of management techniques can apply to a lot of scenarios, and how small, struggling companies can profit from outside help.  "We help companies leverage their management time," says Richard M. McLaughlin, executive director of the New England center, one of the largest.  The centers analyze a company's problems, then help it arrange for consultants, engineering work, market research and the like to achieve changes.  Myriad consultants offer this kind of help, but to get it so cheaply through the centers, businesses have to demonstrate that their sales and employment have been hurt by import competition.  Despite all of the bargain advice nearly a quarter of the 700 companies that come to the New England center haven't been able to improve their results, Mr. McLaughlin says.  However, the other 75% to 80% have turned around or at least stabilized, the former marketing executive and company general manager adds.  Reducing costs is the key to a successful turnaround for about 40% of the NETAAC clients, and it is part of the answer for 75%, Mr. McLaughlin says.  The center often recommends greater use of incentive pay to boost productivity.  It also sometimes makes severe recommendations that totally transform a company.  Kennedy Bros.  Inc. came seeking advice after the Vergennes, Vt., maker of wooden housewares lost half of its business to cheaper Asian imports in just three years.  In an unusual move, NETAAC's consultants told the company that its old business really wasn't viable.  They did say, however, that its immense factory in a tourist area had lots of potential.  On the center's recommendation, the company kept about 10% of its manufacturing operation and transformed the factory into retail booths for 60 Vermont craftsmen and 75 antiques dealers.  Kennedy Bros. does all the selling, working on commission from the craftsmen and dealers.  "This has saved our company and totally transformed it," says Edwin Grant, president.  Far more often, NETAAC and the other centers work to revive existing businesses, and they find that companies respond to several techniques, Mr. McLaughlin says.  Many small companies, he says, can benefit from computerizing inventory control, establishing accurate cost analysis, and restructuring their debt.  Strong Group Inc., a Gloucester, Mass., maker of leather goods, used all three.  With a new data-processing system recommended by a NETAAC consultant, the company reduced inventory by 20% and slashed costs as a result, says Donald Cutter, Strong Group's president.  By assuring that materials would be at hand, the inventory-control system has helped the company boost productivity by about 6%.  A more accurate cost-analysis system allowed the company to adjust its product prices, raising some and lowering others, Mr. Cutter says.  The system also showed which items to drop entirely from the product line.  The company also restructured its debt, making 80% of it long-term, rather than just 10%.  That move eased the company's debt-service load "enormously," the official adds.  Last year, the company swung back into the black after posting a loss of $500,000 in 1987, Mr. Cutter says.  NETAAC advice also focuses on marketing, with consultants commonly recommending that companies find "a more benign niche," Mr. McLaughlin says.  He cites one such case, a bicycle maker priced out of the market for cheap standard bikes.  The company turned instead to the growing market for specialty bikes made for racing, stunts and off-road use.  Some answers are surprisingly simple.  With market-research assistance arranged by NETAAC, a paper company introduced a line of snazzy paper sold with instructions to write a resume.  What was really just a stack of high-grade paper became a "resume kit" sold in college bookstores.  Systematic marketing plans, often involving telephones, can help many troubled companies, Mr. McLaughlin says.  A company that made wood turnings, such as wooden handles for brushes, toiled for years for six big customers.  Suddenly, it lost three of the six to cheaper Canadian products.  "We identified all the businesses within a 300-mile radius that bought wood turnings and set up a telemarketing program to reach them," Mr. McLaughlin says.  Since then, the company has more than replaced the business it lost and staff has doubled to 50.  For a printing-equipment maker, NETAAC came up with a two-pronged solution.  It is helping the company to simplify its products to reduce production and servicing costs, and to come up with a low-priced line to export to industrializing countries, Mr. McLaughlin says.  In addition, Mr. McLaughlin says shorter production runs can help many companies compete against cheap imports.  Given the long distances between factory and markets, foreign makers often can't offer short runs.  A & A Manufacturing Co., an apparel maker in Fall River, Mass., this summer established -- with NETAAC help -- a system to produce 75 to 350 garments at a time, instead of typical runs of 1,000 to 5,000 garments in the past.  For rush orders, the company can respond within two days, where it used to take two or three weeks in the past, says Gene Laudon, company president.  The short runs allow retailers to carry smaller inventories, knowing it's easy to order more, an important selling point.  The short-run system even reduced labor costs.  For some, NETAAC provides more esoteric help.  Verne Q. Powell Flutes Inc. is famed for its flutes and piccolos. (Its idea of a low-end flute sells for $5,700.) But by 1986, when the Waltham, Mass., company changed hands, it was losing money, says Steven A. Wasser, chairman.  One problem was inaccurate placement of the tone holes on the flute tube, a problem that is the bane of flute producers because it requires expensive correction later and reduces productivity.  Government-funded engineering consultants figured out a new system, which the company then bought with its own money.  When efforts flop, it's usually because the company either lacks the management skills to make changes or, says Mr. McLaughlin, the "erosion has gone on so long that the company can't be turned around."  One Rhode Island manufacturing company is losing money and can't mobilize itself to complete any of the cost-reduction programs that it has started, Mr. McLaughlin says.  Once, the company enjoyed sales of $10 million a year.  "Now," says Mr. McLaughlin, "it's an $8 million company on its way to $6 million."  A major mutual fund trade group is fast running out of cash amid continued bickering between member funds that charge investors sales fees and those that don't.  In a recent letter to board members, the Mutual Fund Education Alliance, wracked by defections, says it needs a big cash infusion to survive.  "Cash reserves are at an all-time low -- an unfortunate and regrettable situation brought about by the organization's past use of dues earmarked for the future to meet current expenses," the letter said.  The jam reflects a splintering in the mutual fund industry between load and no-load groups.  Only a few years ago, funds either were classified as "load" -- those with initial sales charges of as much as 8.5% and sold through brokers -- or "no load," which primarily were sold directly to investors.  But that distinction has become blurred.  Many direct-marketed funds charge "low loads" of 3% or less.  Others have imposed exit fees and marketing and distribution charges, resulting in fewer true no-loads.  That trend led the trade group last year to de-emphasize the words "no load" in its name, although the term was retained in a subtitle.  The name change, from the No-Load Mutual Fund Association, reflected a decline in the number of true no-load funds in the group to about 250 out of a total of 450 funds.  But the name change also raised the ire of some no-load fund executives who are proud they don't charge sales fees.  Many fund groups have defected, saying the trade group has lost an identity that offered a marketing edge.  The alliance is suffering an "identity crisis," says Dennis W. Cross, executive vice president at USAA Investment Management Co., which recently quit.  "We're real strong believers in the no-load concept," Mr. Cross said, "and we felt the Education Alliance wasn't going in that direction."  "That's a lot overblown," counters Robert Edwards, the alliance's president.  "By far our largest constituency are no-loads by any measure."  Still, the trade group said in its letter that it needs a "special assessment" of 50% of annual dues from members besides the 1990 membership fees to continue.  Annual dues range from $500 to $24,000, depending on the size of the fund group.  Mr. Edwards says the group needs about $300,000 to continue, adding that the money is needed by the end of September.  The cash will be used to get the group "back on solid financial footing" so new programs and activities can be launched, according to the letter.  These include distribution of a question-and-answer newspaper column about mutual fund investing written by Mr. Edwards, plus a new directory of member firms.  But some board members privately were pessimistic about the group's chances.  "If they don't get it -- and they probably won't get it -- that's it," said one board member.  "It's as simple as that."  Kemper Corp., which offers mostly load funds sold through brokers but which had joined the group as a marketing tool, says it won't renew its membership because its interests now conflict with the educational aims of the trade group.  "The organization changed from representing direct-marketed, no-load funds to becoming an education alliance for them," says Gerald Cole, executive vice president at Kemper Financial Services Inc.  "Our main thrust is through brokers, and we feel we no longer have a reason to be a member because it's really designed for a different purpose."  Several seceding members have joined a competing association of low-cost funds.  The "100% No-Load Mutual Fund Council," formed several months ago, consists of a small group of mutual funds without sales charges of any kind.  Among the group's 110 members are funds with some of the best long-term track records in the industry, including Mutual Series Corp., Lindner Management Corp. and Nicholas Co.  Lush, green stalks graze Kevin Costner's shoulders as he strolls through a cornfield in the opening sequence of "Field of Dreams."  After he mows down a portion of his crop and carves out a baseball diamond, the ghosts of long-gone ballplayers who visit the field keep asking, "Is this heaven?"  No, it was Iowa.  And for the company that wrote an insurance policy on the cornfield, it was hell.  Blistering heat and the 1988 summer drought nearly ruined the field.  Just three weeks before filming was due to start, the parched corn barely reached Mr. Costner's knees.  Seeing not a cloud in the sky, Fireman's Fund Corp. had to shell out $200,000 for a makeshift irrigation system that tapped a nearby creek.  "Mother Nature got us that time," says Denise Dimon, a Fireman's Fund claims adjuster in Los Angeles.  The bite could have been worse: Without a cornfield, there might have been no movie.  Without a movie, the production company stood to lose more than $10 million.  Last year, Hollywood released some 500 films, which made about $4.5 billion at the box office.  But if not for insurance, the industry would soon be out of business, for few investors are willing to risk their money unless there are safety nets.  A tight filming schedule is easily derailed by a star who sprains an ankle, a stunt that backfires and burns down a set, a mishap that destroys valuable negatives or a thief who makes off with equipment.  Insurers pay the tab for such mishaps, and they have to be agile to get a production crew back on its feet.  Downtime in Hollywood can cost big bucks -- about $500 a minute, or $250,000 a day.  What's more, increasingly elaborate productions and swelling budgets are making insurance ever more important.  Policies in the '50s seldom covered much beyond damage to props; now they commonly apply to all sorts of risks inherent in exotic locations, death-defying stunts and sophisticated special effects.  With films today costing an average of $19 million, the insurer of a major picture might have as much as $75 million on the line.  The price of such coverage is usually 1% to 3% of a movie's budget.  Although insuring movies can be lucrative -- such policies brought in between $250 million and $300 million for insurers in 1988 -- the headaches it entails can be enormous.  One of the biggest so far resulted when Natalie Wood died during the filming of "Brainstorm."  MGM wanted to abandon the movie and collect from its insurers.  But underwriters at Lloyds of London thought it would be cheaper to complete the film, using a stand-in for Ms. Wood in the scenes that remained.  Lloyds got its way, but it still had to pay about $8 million in claims to cover production delays.  More recently, filming of "Karate Kid III" was delayed for several days when star Ralph Macchio ran into some poison oak, costing the movie's insurer about $100,000.  And a broken arm took actress Sean Young out of "Batman" 10 days before the cameras were ready to roll and nearly forced the Caped Crusader to stalk Gotham's nasties solo.  Warner Bros.' insurer paid the costs of finding a replacement (Kim Basinger), of buying the necessary new wardrobe and of juggling the production schedule to accommodate reshooting.  The total bill came to well over half a million dollars.  If Hollywood's insurers toil in a world of make-believe, they must still come up with real-life ways to minimize their losses.  The special effects for "Ghostbusters II" required a battery of hot lights and equipment that would have triggered the studio's sprinkler system.  The sprinklers were turned off, but the insurer demanded that a fire company be on the set at all times.  Determining premium rates for a movie can be a rather arbitrary process.  A higher deductible here, a lower loss limit there -- such factors can make a big difference in the bottom line.  For "Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade," the latest installment in Steven Spielberg's adventure series, obtaining insurance meant getting more rats.  In one scene, Harrison Ford and his blond sidekick wade through a dank underground chamber teeming with rats.  Lucasfilm Ltd., the producer, had 2,000 rats specially bred for the scene.  It asked Fireman's Fund to insure the rodents and cover the cost of any delays in filming if the production company lost a large number of the animals.  But the insurer demanded "a 1,000-rat deductible," meaning that it wouldn't pay any claims resulting from the loss of the first 1,000 rats.  So Lucasfilm lined up an extra 1,000 rats as a cushion.  When one of the drug-dealing hoods in the James Bond thriller "Licence to Kill" was about to cut the ropes that held Timothy Dalton suspended above a giant shredder, the knife slipped.  Her Majesty's favorite secret agent was left with a deep gash in his right hand.  The producer could have lost nearly $100,000 if he had been forced to close up shop for the rest of the day.  But LifeStar International, a Washington-based medical consulting group, had been retained for just such emergencies at the remote filming site in Mexico.  The doctor on the set repaired the damaged tendon in Mr. Dalton's hand and, with the help of a makeup artist, fashioned a latex bandage out of a surgical glove.  The star was back in front of the cameras in about an hour.  Without the LifeStar unit on the set, Mr. Dalton probably would have had to fly to Los Angeles for surgery.  Chubb Corp., which insured "Licence to Kill," is said to have given the producer a discount of more than $20,000 on its premium (which totaled about $525,000) because of the physician on call.  Insuring such big stars as Elizabeth Taylor and Tom Cruise doesn't cost more than covering B-movie actors, unless they are in bad health.  All movie insurers require actors to have a physical exam before starting every film.  Some of the insurers keep medical files on the stars they have covered, including notations on which have drinking or drug problems, which have a tendency to get sick during projects and which show up late for every cast call.  Many insurers refused entirely to write a policy for John Huston's "The Dead" because of the legendary director's poor health.  Fireman's Fund eventually agreed, but it insisted on having an ambulance on the set and a nurse to accompany Mr. Huston at all times.  The insurer also required a backup director -- a position filled by Mr. Huston's son -- who could finish the film if Mr. Huston had proved too ill to complete it. (Mr.  Huston died shortly after finishing the movie.)  Although insurers take painstaking steps to limit losses, they can't control everything.  "You think you might know it all," says Sal Nociforo, executive vice president of an American International Group entertainment division in New York.  "But when you're insuring a film, there are very many unknowns."  The insurer that covered Francis Ford Coppola's "Apocalypse Now," shot in the Philippines, had carefully researched the typhoon season and refused to cover damages caused by those storms during a specified four-month span.  Unfortunately, the first typhoon that year hit about five days earlier than normal.  The insurer had to pay $1.5 million to rebuild a jungle village set destroyed by the storm -- even though it would be set on fire in the closing sequence of the movie.  "There had to be a set to torch," explains Richard Youens, a group executive director with Graham, Miller & Co. Ltd.  Fireman's Fund, for its part, acknowledges that the request to insure the cornfield in "Field of Dreams" was a bit unorthodox.  The company took on the job after checking with the U.S. Weather Service to see if the forecast rain would be sufficient.  Even more reassuring was the report of the movie's farm adviser, who had selected a special fast-growing seed to develop tall, beautiful green stalks.  Nobody figured on the drought, however, during which the corn grew at only half its usual pace.  Even after irrigation -- which angered neighboring farmers whose own fields were turning brown -- the Iowa cornfield still wasn't ready for the cameras in late June.  As evidence for its claim, the producers measured the corn daily and recorded it on videotape.  The cast and crew sat idle for two days, literally watching the corn grow.  Through it all, Don Lansing, whose farm was used in the movie, couldn't help thinking that Hollywood should have come the year before.  His 1987 crop, he notes, reached full height three weeks early.  Control Data Corp.'s chief financial officer is leaving after three years of rescue work at the troubled computer company.  The departure of John K. Buckner, 52 years old, comes several months after it became clear that he would not become the next chief executive officer.  Control Data's board ended the guessing game in December by naming Lawrence Perlman, 51, president and chief operating officer, making him heir apparent to chairman and chief executive Robert M. Price, 58.  Mr. Buckner was made vice chairman at the same time.  Mr. Buckner's duties as chief financial officer will be assumed by Mr. Perlman, who already has oversight responsibilities for most other areas of the company.  While that assignment was termed an interim one, Mr. Price said: "We have no active search under way for a replacement for John and we're in no particular hurry."  Mr. Price said that while he was "very grateful" for Mr. Buckner's contributions, as Control Data continues to shrink "probably we don't need such a top-heavy management structure."  Mr. Price noted that since Mr. Perlman had been closely involved with the company's restructuring efforts, including the debt aspect, "it's not that big a change."  Mr. Buckner, who holds a doctorate in nuclear engineering, was attracted to Control Data in May 1986.  A former chief financial officer at such high-tech companies as EG&G Inc. and Prime Computer Inc., he made no secret of his desire to run his own company some day.  Indeed, the announcement noted that "long-standing interest."  Mr. Buckner couldn't be reached for comment but Mr. Price said Mr. Buckner had no immediate plans.  "He's going to stop and think about it for a while," the chairman said.  As for his own intentions, Mr. Price denied rumors that he is planning to retire in the next few months and let Mr. Perlman take over.  "They're incorrect," he said.  Mr. Perlman, who is vacationing in Europe, used the announcement of Mr. Buckner's departure to declare that it was "vital at this time to improve the performance of the company by focusing on, and building, those businesses that are or have the potential to be strong profit contributors in the near future."  During his tenure at Control Data, Mr. Buckner had his hands full.  He immediately plunged into talks with the company's group of what was then 27 banks to restructure a ballooning debt on which it had defaulted.  A substantial public offering ensued, as did the sale of numerous assets, including the company's financial arm, Commercial Credit Co.  Money wasn't the only thing Mr. Buckner found lacking when he arrived at Control Data's Minneapolis headquarters.  He was dismayed at the financial controls in place, or more precisely, their absence.  Mr. Buckner grumbled openly about the "not invented here" mentality that had kept his predecessors from using off-the-shelf software designed for computers made by rival companies.  Mr. Buckner moved quickly to remedy that situation, although the overhaul is still under way.  Among his other tasks was to try to turn around Control Data's high-speed computer chip operation, VTC Inc., which has been plagued by manufacturing problems and ongoing losses.  "Given the circumstances of the semiconductor industry," Mr. Price said, "I'm not sure that God himself could fix VTC."  Eastman Kodak Co., reeling from a 60% plunge in profit in the first half, plans to cut its work force by about 4,500 and to sell or consolidate a score of ailing businesses.  Kodak's latest restructuring -- its fourth since 1983 -- exceeds many investors' expectations and clearly indicates the severe difficulties the company has had in containing costs.  Acknowledging the problems, Kodak Chairman Colby H. Chandler, in an internal letter to managers, said: "Our experience so far this year results in a clear imperative that we must take action -- strong action -- and we must do so now."  Wall Street analysts for the past 18 months have been highly critical of Kodak's seeming inability to control costs and to understand its intense competitive and pricing pressures.  Yesterday's news left some satisfied that Kodak was at least beginning to bite the bullet.  "It may not be enough, but it's certainly a good start," said Peter Enderlin, an analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  He expects the overall cost savings to total $350 million to $400 million, or 75 cents a share, in 1990.  Kodak wouldn't disclose which businesses it plans to put on the block or to restructure.  But the photographic, pharmaceutical and chemical concern did say the moves would affect about 20 operations representing annual revenue of $1.25 billion.  The total job loss is 3,500 more than had been projected by Kodak in an earlier restructuring program and represents about 3% of Kodak's world-wide employment.  Kodak isn't expected to shed any significant part of its chemical business or Sterling Drug Co. unit, which it acquired last year for $5.1 billion.  The pharmaceutical business has added tremendous debt to Kodak's balance sheet and sharply increased costs but isn't expected to generate big profits any time soon.  Instead, analysts said, Kodak will concentrate on paring a variety of businesses in the $100 million to $200 million range such as videocassette tapes and perhaps parts or all of the company's Verbatim unit, a floppy-disk manufacturer.  "There's a lot of businesses that Kodak doesn't need to be in," said Alex Henderson, an analyst with Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  While Kodak's announcement came after the close of trading on the New York Stock Exchange, institutional investors reacted positively.  Betty Kepley, portfolio analyst with the Wisconsin Investment Board, recently purchased Kodak stock because it appeared undervalued.  "We thought the company's strategy of going after market share instead of profit wasn't correct . . . and there was a lot of fat there," she said.  "They shouldn't have had flat returns on earnings in the past four years."  But the latest restructuring "sounds like more than the Street expected," she added.  In composite trading on the Big Board yesterday, Kodak closed at $50.75 a share, up $1.  While Wall Street may be applauding the move, Kodak's hometown of Rochester, N.Y., is undoubtedly glum.  Along with substantial job cuts, Kodak will virtually freeze wages for remaining managers and hourly workers and tie as much as 40% of top executives' compensation to the company's performance.  "They're making some pretty fundamental changes" in management structure and compensation, said Smith Barney's Mr. Enderlin.  Kodak's traditional annual wage dividend to employees -- an automatic bonus tied to the company's cash dividends rather than earnings -- also is being overhauled.  The formula now will be based upon the company's pretax earnings and return on assets.  This and other actions, Mr. Chandler said, "invade sacred areas of the company but are a needed remedy."  The restructuring plan also calls for reductions in 1990 capital-spending plans and sharp cuts in operating expenses including research and development and advertising.  In addition, Kodak said, it will attack excessive costs associated with "fail-safe inventories and a ratio of accounts receivables to sales days that is no longer acceptable."  By Kodak's analysis, the restructuring will generate "up to $1 billion in operating cash flow during 1990."  It apparently took Kodak's 85% plunge in second-quarter profit to prod the extensive cost cutting, which the company insists is a continuation of a $200 million savings program begun in the first quarter.  Kodak said it didn't foresee "such a sharp drop" in second-quarter earnings.  "It came as a surprise, with a lot of unfortunate factors coming together," said a company spokesperson.  These factors include higher costs, larger interest expenses and unfavorable currency translations.  The second-quarter earnings drop also reflected a $227 million restructuring charge.  Analysts contend that Kodak management's attention has been diverted away from operations by Polaroid Corp.'s successful patent suit against Kodak regarding instant cameras.  Attention also has focused heavily on new product introductions, from batteries to printers and new films.  Once the cost cuts take effect, Kodak will face an equally demanding challenge.  It must control the costs of ongoing businesses and compete more effectively against a growing number of companies that have made inroads into its core businesses.  Fuji Photo Film Co., for example, has gained market share in both film and color papers, areas Kodak once virtually monopolized.  "The question for Kodak now is whether it can execute this restructuring," said Smith Barney's Mr. Enderlin.  Investors in money-market mutual funds aren't yet benefiting from recent increases in short-term interest rates.  Yields on the funds slipped slightly in the latest week, continuing a steady decline that began in April.  The average seven-day compound yield was 8.66% in the week ended Tuesday, compared with 8.68% last week, according to Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a newsletter based in Holliston, Mass. (Compound yields assume reinvestment of dividends.)  "It came as a great surprise to me," said Walter Frank, chief economist for the Donoghue Organization, publisher of Money Fund Report.  He said he expected yields "at minimum would be stable to reflect recent short-term rates."  Short-term interest rates have bumped upward in the past few weeks, following reports indicating that the economy is stronger than expected.  Six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction, for example, yielded 8.29%, compared with 7.74% July 31.  Changes in money-fund yields typically lag behind other interest-rate shifts because of the varying maturities of the funds' investments -- mainly Treasury securities, certificates of deposit and shortterm commercial paper.  The average maturity of the 387 funds tracked by Donoghue was 40 days in the latest week, the same as the week before.  Average maturity is considered an indicator of which way fund managers think interest rates are headed.  Shorter maturities permit them to capture rising rates sooner; longer maturities allow them to hold on to higher rates for a longer time when rates are falling.  The average maturity was 42 days just three weeks ago; at the start of this year, when rates were climbing, it was 29 days.  Mr. Frank said he expects money-fund yields to "kick up a little" in the next few weeks, "but it will be mostly noise."  Over the next few months, he said, he expects yields to be fairly stable because the Federal Reserve is expected to keep short-term interest rates stable.  As a result, he said, increases in money-fund assets may slow.  Assets rose $3.6 billion in the latest week, to $335.9 billion, a record for the funds tracked by Money Fund Report.  Money funds continue to offer better yields than comparable bank investments, although the gap has shrunk.  The average yield on bank money-market accounts, for example, was just 6.99% in the week ended Tuesday, while three-month certificates of deposit of less than $50,000 were yielding an average of 7.95%, according to Banxquote Money Markets.  In late April, when the average seven-day compound yield on money-market mutual funds was 9.62%, average bank yields were 7.10% on money-market accounts and 8.66% on three-month CDs.  Investors still can get close to double-digit yields at some funds.  The top-yielding fund in the latest week, Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar Money Market Fund, had a seven-day compound yield of 9.63%.  The average seven-day simple yield of the 387 taxable funds fell to 8.31% in the latest week, from 8.33%.  The 30-day simple yield fell to 8.38% from 8.45%, and the 30-day compound yield fell to 8.73% from 8.81%.  Yields on tax-free money funds increased, although most investors would still do better with taxable funds.  The average seven-day compound yield on 191 tax-free funds rose to 5.68%, from 5.62%, according to Money Fund Report.  For an investor in the 33% tax bracket, the latest yield is equivalent to a taxable yield of 8.48%; for investors in the 28% tax bracket, it's equivalent to 7.89% taxable yield.  The assets of the tax-free funds rose to $69.7 billion from $69.3 billion; average maturity remained at 54 days.  The average seven-day simple yield on the tax-free funds rose to 5.53% from 5.47%.  The 30-day simple yield was 5.50% in the latest week, up from 5.48%, while the 30-day compound yield rose to 5.65% from 5.63%.  New York City's planning commission rejected a builder's proposal to transfer unused development rights from Grand Central Terminal so he could build a 72-story office tower three blocks away.  The commission said the proposal didn't meet the air rights transfer standards set by the city's zoning code.  Under the code, air rights can be sold to the owners of lots across the street or adjacent properties as long as a "chain of ownership" links the sites.  The city contends the chain was broken after sites between the terminal and the development site were sold by Penn Central Corp., which owns the terminal.  But developer G. Ware Travelstead and Penn Central contend a chain exists through the railroad's underground properties.  Mr. Travelstead, who purchased the air rights from Penn Central in 1983, said he would sue the city on the ground the decision entails unlawful taking of property.  In a move sure to raise the ire of city preservationists, Mr. Travelstead also said he will propose building a tower atop the landmark terminal to retrieve his lost investment.  "If the city is saying we can't use the air rights, then we should at least be allowed to build on top of the terminal," he said.  Gabriel Taussig of the city's law department denied that the planning commission's decision means Grand Central's air rights can't be transferred.  "It just means the air rights can't be transferred indiscriminately," he said.  In 1978, the U.S. Supreme Court upheld New York City's landmark law on the ground that owners of landmarks were able to maximize value by selling unused development rights.  Mr. Travelstead contends that by preventing him from using those rights three blocks away, the city is violating the intent of the law.  Mr. Travelstead said he tried over the past five years to get the city to decide the underground-transfer issue.  Yesterday's decision means he will begin construction on a smaller tower on the development site.  Mr. Travelstead said he has spent $16 million acquiring and investigating the air-rights issue thus far.  He is developing the site with First Boston Corp. and a limited partner, who wasn't identified.  When the head of new products for Ford Motor Co.'s unit here wants to talk strategy with his boss, he hops on the company plane for a 55-minute flight to Curacao.  That is where the unit's president is holed up to avoid a warrant for his arrest in Venezuela.  When the personnel chief of a Fortune 500 pharmaceutical company's Venezuelan operation needs to discuss budgets, he jets to Miami, where his unit's president is avoiding the possibility of arrest in Caracas.  "What used to take half a day to do now takes three days," laments the personnel manager.  This is a tedious way to do business, but for many international companies here, it has become the only way.  About 100 top executives from blue-chip multinationals have decamped Venezuela in the wake of a huge foreign-exchange scandal.  The exodus isn't an admission of guilt, the businessmen insist; it's their only choice.  For in Venezuela, if a company is charged with doing wrong with the nation's money, that company's top executives can sit in prison -- denied bail -- while the case lumbers through an unwieldy legal system.  And in the sometimes-bizarre inquiry triggered by this scandal, scores of multinational companies, along with domestic businesses and former top government officials, are being investigated.  Authorities have issued 47 arrest warrants so far and imposed travel restrictions on more than 60 other individuals, according to the principal judge in the affair.  About 15 arrests have been made, he said.  The only executive of a multinational unit to be arrested so far is Livio Pernetz, the Venezuelan-born director of Caleb Brett Venezuela, an import-verification unit of Britain's Inchcape PLC.  The rest of those being sought apparently have left the country.  The mad rush to get out of Venezuela also includes many executives whom authorities haven't singled out but who aren't taking any chances.  Prominent among those who have fled are executives of car-assembly, flour-milling and pharmaceuticals companies, which have been among the first targets of investigators.  The investigation generally focuses on a few top executives from each company.  Investigators believe that out of $40 billion authorized for payment by a now-defunct government agency over the past six years, as much as $8 billion may have been illegally skimmed.  The agency, known by the acronym Recadi, was in charge of administering Venezuela's complex foreign-exchange control system.  It was supposed to conserve the country's dollar reserves by limiting their distribution to key importers, and to subsidize these importers by allocating the dollars at bargain rates.  The subsidies were meant to ensure that a continued flow of vital imports would keep Venezuelan industry rolling, prevent product shortages and keep inflation at bay.  Instead, with the price of dollars on the free market as much as three times the subsidized rate, corruption was rampant at Recadi, investigators say.  In some cases, Recadi officials allegedly demanded commissions for authorizing dollar distributions.  In others, importers are suspected of having bribed Recadi officials to approve inflated import invoices so they could collect extra dollars.  By 1987, the system was open to all 26,000 Venezuelan importers.  It was discontinued earlier this year as part of an economic-reform package.  About half of those importers are suspect, investigators say.  In hindsight, no one is surprised.  "It was a pinata," declares Judge Luis Guillermo La Riva, the jurist leading the charge against the multinationals.  John Werner, president of H.J. Heinz Co.'s Venezuelan unit, one of many food companies being investigated, says: "You could have set up that system in Iowa and I guarantee there would have been a lot of corruption."  Mr. Werner, who hasn't been personally implicated or had his travel restricted, denies any wrongdoing by Heinz.  The scandal sometimes reads like a tropical soap opera.  The inquiry picked up steam when Hector Meneses, a former development minister and Recadi director, tried to kill himself but failed.  Mr. Meneses reportedly left a suicide note, later published in the local press, implicating other top government officials.  Disgusted by tales of corruption emerging from the congress and courts, Arturo Uslar Pietri, the country's leading intellectual, has sarcastically proposed a new medal, "The Order of the Fool," to be bestowed on honest citizens.  Thousands of people marched in a "Parade of Fools" to protest government corruption.  Economically and politically, this affair couldn't come at a worse time for Venezuela.  Making life difficult for multinational companies can't help government efforts to open Venezuela's long-protected economy to foreign investment and competition.  A deep economic slump already had prompted many multinationals to rethink their plans for additional investment.  Evidence of widespread government corruption, meanwhile, adds fuel to public discontent that erupted in February anti-austerity riots that left about 300 dead and 1,900 injured.  For foreign businessmen, the Recadi investigation has been a crash course on the Venezuelan legal system.  Judges wield enormous power, combining the roles of prosecuting attorney, grand jury and criminal-court judge.  Defendants accused of crimes against the "national patrimony," such as alleged in the Recadi case, can't post bail.  Thus, Judge La Riva, outgoing and folksy, has become the scourge of Venezuela's corporate elite.  Businessmen accuse him of "judicial terrorism," and hint at legal extortion.  The judge denies the allegations, labeling them part of a smear campaign by "the Caracas oligarchy."  He maintains he has nothing against businessmen -- many, he says, are honest.  But it was businessmen who took the most advantage of Recadi, he says.  "They sacked Venezuela," he declares.  "For every dollar that a public official was bribed, the businessman received $10,000."  Businessmen also complain of a lack of professionalism.  The investigation does seem haphazard and ill-equipped to deal with the mountains of records companies are being asked to provide.  Aside from a dozen or so young law students and lawyers who help take depositions, the judge has only five economists and accountants provided by Congress and the police to help with technical details.  "In most cases I know about, travel restrictions were ordered before there was an investigation," complains Alberto Mestre, the president of Kraft Inc.'s Venezuela unit, one of the companies being investigated by the judge.  Mr. Mestre himself hasn't been implicated and his travel hasn't been restricted.  He says Kraft's accounts are in order.  Judge La Riva provoked an embarrassing incident by issuing an arrest warrant for Nestor Rapanelli, an Argentine who had been an executive at a flour-milling company here.  The warrant went unnoticed until Mr. Rapanelli was named Argentina's Economics Minister in July.  "If Rapanelli goes through Venezuela and is arrested, that would be a problem for Argentina," shrugs an Argentine Economics Ministry spokesman.  "The thing to do is not to go through Venezuela."  In May, Judge La Riva blundered as he began investigating Venezuela's car-assembly companies, the biggest private-sector users of Recadi dollars.  He issued orders prohibiting executives from five auto-assembly companies from leaving the country.  But the judge took the names from out-of-date incorporation papers, which meant that some of the executives of the General Motors Corp., Ford and Fiat S.p.A. units that he prohibited from leaving Venezuela had been gone for years.  The judge remains unconcerned.  He has charged Ford's Venezuelan unit with "fraudulent use of public funds" and issued arrest warrants for four present and former Ford officials. (Judge La Riva says he is prohibited from elaborating on any case under investigation.) Ford insists its accounts are in order and is appealing the judge's decision to levy charges.  "I was going to get" General Motors de Venezuela, Judge La Riva says unabashedly, running his index finger across his throat in a head-cutting motion.  "But they took the case away from me."  Another judge is handling the investigation of the GM unit, which hasn't been charged with any wrongdoing. (A spokesman for General Motors de Venezuela, 51% locally owned, says "all our accounts are clear and we don't fear an investigation.") The judge dismissed charges against Fiat's Venezuelan unit.  Some executives who remain in Venezuela despite investigations of their companies acknowledge that they may be taking a calculated chance.  But in some cases an impending arrest warrant is signaled by the imposition of travel restrictions, and executives have found ways to evade that barrier.  Some businessmen have left the country by hiring commercial fishermen to take them to the nearby island of Trinidad.  One man got out by bribing an immigration official $500 at a small regional airport.  Another executive hid out in the hills around Caracas while his company bargained with a pilot, who wanted $100,000 to fly him out.  After a week's jawboning, two pilots, one flying a decoy route, smuggled him out of the country from a remote airstrip.  The price: $50,000.  Another executive received a telephone call from Judge La Riva asking if he was the president of his company, which was being investigated.  The executive said yes.  The judge then asked him how to spell his name.  "I decided it was time to leave," says the executive, who did so the next day.  No warrant or travel restrictions have been issued for him. (Most executives decline to be quoted by name in hopes of avoiding the judge's attention.)  Not all of Judge La Riva's targets have been foreigners.  One warrant went out for Nicomedes Zuluaga, a member of Venezuela's aristocratic elite known as the Lords of the Valley.  Mr. Zuluaga, chairman of a flour-milling company, Grandes Molinos de Venezuela, was accused of paying too much for wheat.  But to everyone's surprise, Mr. Zuluaga didn't flee.  Protesting his innocence, he went to prison instead.  Well, sort of.  At the prison, Mr. Zuluaga occupies the warden's office and bedroom, turned over to him so that Mr. Zuluaga has an appropriate place to receive visitors.  He has his own visitors' guestbook, his chauffeur brings breakfast and with the help of a personal computer, Mr. Zuluaga traces his family tree to the 16th century.  He uses a facsimile machine to send instructions to his companies and occasionally commiserates on his cellular phone with Venezuelan President Carlos Andres Perez.  In his gilded cage, Mr. Zuluaga has become a symbol to Venezuelan businessmen who feel Judge La Riva is trying to divert public attention from official corruption and plunging living standards worsened by stringent economic reforms.  Prices rose 62% in the first seven months of this year, and one economist predicts domestic economic output will fall 10% this year.  "If there is no bread, then circuses," mutters Mr. Zuluaga, a commanding presence still, even behind the warden's big desk.  Multinational executives draw another message from Mr. Zuluaga's fate: leave.  "If Nicomedes Zuluaga with all his power has been in prison for months, who is going to cry for you?" asks Vincenzo D'Elia, general manager of a SmithKline Beckman Corp. Venezuela unit, who hasn't been implicated.  Recently, to the general relief of businessmen, Judge La Riva has parceled out most of the cases he has launched to nine newly named jurists.  Nevertheless, two weeks ago he announced 30 new investigations of food-processing companies, many subsidiaries of U.S. companies.  He promises to decide them all by Christmas.  Meanwhile, many fugitive executives will continue working from vacation destinations in the Caribbean.  Ford Motor de Venezuela has three top executives on the lam in Curacao.  In the resort hotel where they live, the Ford men strike a visually odd note.  They -- and visiting Ford brass -- are the only people around in buttoned-up long-sleeved shirts and ties.  One recent day, half a dozen executives sit under a stuffed marlin in the outdoor cafeteria, sweating through a marketing strategy meeting in full corporate dress.  Just a stone's-throw away, scantily clad tourists sunbathe and frolic in the ocean.  Ford chose Curacao because from there executives can watch Venezuelan television news and buy Venezuelan newspapers.  And a company plane hops back and forth daily.  Still, in a telephone interview from an undisclosed location, Cornelius Koreman, president of Ford de Venezuela, says he doesn't know how long this method of operation can go on.  Despite facsimile machines, phones and constant meetings in Curacao, "Sooner or later you start loosing the sense of the environment in which one operates," he says.  Both in Caracas and outside, executives are hoping the worst is over.  Publicity surrounding the case has shifted toward the investigation of Blanca Ibanez, private secretary and mistress of former President Jaime Lusinchi.  She has left the country and reportedly is in Miami with Mr. Lusinchi.  In addition, the vocal criticism of Judge La Riva by the business community appears to have slowed his drive somewhat.  Some executives are even returning to Venezuela, quietly.  But most keep up their guard.  "I have two plane tickets with open dates," says Mr. Werner, the Heinz executive, who never left.  In its rapid drive toward democracy, Poland's reconvened Parliament, the Sejm, today hears Prime Minister-designate Tadeusz Mazowiecki outline his general reform program, and votes to approve the Solidarity activist as the country's first non-Communist prime minister since World War II.  In an interview with The Wall Street Journal yesterday Mr. Mazowiecki said his general economic philosophy is that the state "shouldn't set everything but {rather} open possibilities" and he appealed for Western aid "soon" for the beleaguered economy, struggling under a $39 billion debt burden.  He said Poland would start working next month on an economic austerity plan with the International Monetary Fund, and that reaching agreement with the IMF on such a plan is a top priority.  Solidarity has asked for as much as $10 billion in debt forgiveness from Western governments.  Mr. Mazowiecki said he bore no "resentment" against the Communist Party, which jailed him several years ago, and said he intends to work with all political forces in a broad coalition government.  To ensure Communist participation in the government, he hinted that Solidarity is now willing to give the Communists more than the two ministries it originally had set aside for them, Interior and Defense.  It isn't feasible for the Communist Party to go into opposition, he said because "history has not known an opposition that has the army and police in its hands."  He added that it wasn't his intention to "put the Communist Party in a position of negation and pure opposition."  He stressed, however, that he intends to be an activist prime minister, not a "puppet" at the head of a phony coalition still dominated by the Communist Party.  To start on these goals, Mr. Mazowiecki meets today with the Communist Party's parliamentary group to haggle over how many government posts the Communists will have.  Solidarity wants to keep for itself the Justice, Education and Information ministries, even though various of its coalition partners have also demanded one or more of those jobs.  To satisfy everybody, Mr. Mazowiecki may have to juggle vice minister jobs among the various factions.  He is expected to complete his cabinet by the end of the month.  Meanwhile, Poland's newly liberated politicians are busily making up for lost time.  Yesterday, the Sejm (pronounced "same") buzzed with meetings of the parliamentary groups of Solidarity, the new leaders of the coalition government, and of the other coalition partners, the Communists, the Peasants' Party and the Democratic Party.  The Sejm quickly passed a provisional budget for the next three months that is theoretically balanced, although given Poland's 100% inflation rate it won't stay balanced.  The budget gives doctors and teachers long overdue raises and cuts subsidies to some inefficient state industries.  In the afternoon the Sejm debated a bill to repeal the death penalty.  Mr. Mazowiecki's task is particularly delicate because he has to horse trade with his friends as well as his enemies.  At yesterday's meeting of Solidarity's parliamentary delegation, held in the Sejm chamber before the regular sitting, the premier-designate fielded questions and advice that illustrate the breadth and difficulty of his task.  "We need a peasants' Solidarity group within Parliament," said one member.  "We've got to control the mass media," said another.  "If we don't keep the justice and education ministries the government will be just a sham," cried another.  "What are you going to do about the nomenklatura {Communist party apparatchiks placed in key government and industry jobs because of party loyalty.}?"  "What about the relationship between the Solidarity trade union and the government?"  As one member after another asked a question, Mr. Mazowiecki calmly took notes and eventually stood up to reply.  He said he'll try to keep the peasants' concerns in his mind whatever he does.  He knows the mass media and justice and education are vital.  He won't conduct a witch-hunt of the nomenklatura, but rather will seek talent and efficiency from all parties.  The government and the Solidarity union are different institutions, but "I come from you and I won't forget it," he said.  After a virtuoso performance of calming the troops without giving anything away, Mr. Mazowiecki sat down to a standing ovation from the Solidarity members.  He then rushed out to more meetings.  "When I first accepted this job I felt it was a 100 kilogram burden on my head," he said.  "Then I realized that no matter the weight, I have to do something about it.  I hope I can."  Last-minute squabbling by the major airlines is temporarily delaying widespread fare increases.  The delay signals the industry's nervousness about raising fares amid a recent slackening in air travel, but industry pricing analysts said that carriers appear likely to fall in line.  Indeed, some of the delays can be attributed to feuding among the carriers.  On tickets used largely by business travelers, the carriers appear to be jockeying over whether to eliminate discount fares issued shortly before a flight or whether to simply slap $20 increases on those one-way tickets in limited markets.  Many airlines have also delayed until Aug. 30 from yesterday a restructuring that would have resulted in an effective increase on one of their most popular excursion fares.  The reason for the delay wasn't immediately clear.  In a broad restructuring of fares, the airline industry had planned yesterday to eliminate many of the discount-priced fares that it had been offering to business travelers for years.  But United Airlines, a unit of Chicago-based UAL Corp., which had initially signaled its consent to the move, apparently is balking.  Pricing analysts said the reason might be fallout from a turf battle.  Analysts are speculating that United is angry at carriers that have introduced low fares in its important Chicago O'Hare Airport hub of operations.  These Chicago fares were initiated last week by Minneapolis-based NWA Inc.'s Northwest Airlines as an apparent foray against Midway Airlines Inc., which is based at Chicago's smaller Midway airport.  The Northwest move was apparently having an indirect impact on United.  Apparently because United is balking, Houston-based Texas Air Corp.'s Continental Airlines, the architect of the attempt to eliminate discount-priced business fares, has delayed its original plan until after next Monday.  Instead of eliminating discount-priced business fares, United is now promoting a plan to narrow the discount level on business fares by $20 on certain markets.  It appears that the plan backed by United, if adopted industry-wide, wouldn't raise fares as much for business travelers as the Continental scheme.  According to Airline Economics, a Washington, D.C., research company, the airlines have been successful at raising fares about 12% during the first half of this year, compared with the 1988 period.  But a recent softening in traffic might dissuade the carriers from moving as swiftly as Continental intended to raise fares for business travelers.  That sentiment might also have played a role in the decision by carriers to delay at least temporarily implementation of Continental's other plan to raise the price of its seven-day advance purchase round-trip ticket, which is primarily used by leisure travelers.  After raising the seven-day fare, Continental had planned to initiate a 14-day advance purchase fare that would be 50% refundable.  It would be a more expensive version of the currently available 14-day advance purchase ticket, which isn't refundable.  Time Warner Inc. dropped the other shoe in its two-step $13.86 billion acquisition of Warner Communications Inc., offering Warner shareholders an unusual package of stock -- but no cash -- that avoids additional debt and eases the short-term drain on earnings.  The former Time Inc. paid $70 a share in cash last month for the first 100 million common shares of Warner.  Now the publishing and entertainment company, which owns 59.3% of Warner, proposes to acquire Warner's remaining 86.6 million shares for about $6.07 billion in securities that it values at $70 a share.  The package consists of two kinds of new Time Warner preferred stock plus common shares of the BHC television station subsidiary of Chris-Craft Industries Inc., formerly Warner's largest shareholder.  The absence of any new cash payments or any additional debt "provides us the additional flexibility and financial capability to build and to acquire," said Gerald M. Levin, vice chairman of Time Warner.  But even the company's own advisers point out that Time Warner will still be heavily in debt -- by $12 billion, including the two companies' old debt plus the $8 billion that was borrowed to buy the first 100 million Warner shares.  The "back-end" offer "eliminates some of the pressure on the company to sell off assets," said Time Warner adviser Frederic M. Seegal, managing director at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "But the fact of the matter is the company is still leveraged, and it will have to run itself in a leveraged mode.  And management understands that."  But Time Warner's Mr. Levin said the bulk of the company's debt burden will be handled by generating cash flow rather than by selling off pieces of the company.  No "core assets" will be sold, he said, despite earlier speculation that some of the combined companies' local cable systems may be put on the block.  "We're builders, not dismantlers," Mr. Levin said, although he conceded that some peripheral operations may be sold.  One often-cited candidate is Time's Scott Foresman book publishing unit.  Mr. Levin declined to comment on speculation about any specific units that might be sold.  Time Warner will need more than $1.2 billion a year to cover the interest costs of its $12 billion debt, plus $300 million a year to cover cash dividends to be paid on one type of preferred shares in the package announced yesterday.  Wall Street analysts generally estimate that Time Warner can generate cash flow of $2 billion a year.  Some Time Warner advisers also hope the company can reduce debt by $500 million in the first year.  Only one potential snag remains.  Warner still is locked in a court battle with Chris-Craft, which contends it has the right to veto terms of the package announced yesterday.  That dispute is scheduled to be heard in a Delaware court Monday.  The two adversaries have agreed that Warner's 40% stake in Chris-Craft's BHC unit will be used as part of the "back-end" offer for Warner shares.  Chris-Craft also has an option to turn down BHC shares and receive a larger amount of the Time Warner preferred when Chris-Craft -- a company that has industrial operations such as chemicals and plastics as well as television broadcasting interests -- tenders its remaining 6% stake in Warner.  Time Warner shares rose $2.125 to close at $141.75 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, while Warner common fell $1.625 to close at $65.375.  Analysts value the "back-end" package at around $67 a share, despite the $70 value claimed by the company.  The biggest chunk of it will be exchangeable convertible preferred stock -- valued by the company at $35 a share -- that pays a cash dividend of 8.75%.  The dividend payments of about $300 million a year will still be only about half of what Time Warner would have had to pay if it had issued debt instead of the preferred.  The second largest part is in so-called pay-in-kind exchangeable convertible preferred valued by the company at $26 for each Warner share.  It will have a dividend rate of 11%, which for at least three years will be paid in the form of additional shares instead of cash, easing the burden on company cash flow.  The two types of preferred have an average conversion price of about $210 for each Time Warner share, which further lessens the pressure on the company: Because Time Warner common has traded around $140 recently, holders of the new preferred won't be able to convert their stock into common until the company's shares rise significantly.  The final part of the package, which the company values at $9 a share, consists of Warner's 12 million BHC shares valued at a total of $725 million.  The Japanese have devised yet another innovative use for the FAX machine: to exchange gutter talk with Americans.  This Saturday, 30 U.S. competitors will line up at Cloverleaf Family Bowl in Fremont, Calif.  Simultaneously, over 5,000 miles away on Sunday morning, 30 Japanese keglers will gather at Motoyawata Starlanes outside Tokyo, for the second International Tomodachi (meaning friends) Facsimile Tournament.  "The common bond is bowling," says Don Hillman, president of the Bowling Proprietor's Association of America.  "It's so exciting.  You can't believe your teammate is bowling in Japan at exactly the same time."  The match pairs a young bowler from each country.  After the bowlers roll a game, they fax scores, strategy and support to their overseas partner.  After four games, the pair with the highest total wins.  The competition is the brainchild of Keijiro Nakano, who owns several alleys in Japan.  He and Mr. Hillman met at a U.S. bowling convention a few years back and the tournament seemed an obvious idea.  "We use our FAX machines constantly to share facts about the bowling industry," Mr. Hillman says.  The stakes aren't high: the Californians sent Japan a red satin jacket for the winner, while the Japanese sent a porcelain vase.  In the first FAX match, held earlier this year, the foreigners sent two Japanese dolls; the U.S., in return, sent a pair of telephones shaped like bowling pins.  Noting that there are 100 million bowlers world-wide, Mr. Hillman envisions tournaments in which "people from Japan, Korea, Germany and France could be bowling simultaneously and have their scores fed into FAX machines around the world."  Mr. Hillman says "the image of bowling in Japan is exactly like the U.S. image."  Yet, there are cultural differences: Japanese bowlers tend to be younger, usually under 25.  While American lanes are dominated by weekly leagues, Japanese find it difficult to make the time commitment because of dedication to their jobs.  And perhaps the most striking difference: "There's very little beer.  You don't see 10 people getting a bottle and going down to the lanes.  Japanese tend to be more serious about what they do."  Ford Motor Co. is recalling about 450,000 of its 1985 and 1986-model cars because they exceed the federal standard for hydrocarbon emissions, the Environmental Protection Agency said.  The 1985-model cars are the Ford Mustang, LTD, LTD Wagon and Thunderbird; and the Mercury Capri, Cougar, Marquis and Marquis Wagon.  The 1986 autos consist of Ford LTDs, LTD Wagons and Thunderbirds; and Mercury Cougars, Marquis and Marquis Wagons.  All the vehicles carry 3.8-liter fuel-injection engines.  The recall involves about 390,000 of the 1985 models and about 60,000 of the 1986 ones.  The EPA noticed the excessive emissions during testing.  Ford subsequently agreed to recall the vehicles and install a new valve to increase air flow into the exhaust system to allow more complete combustion of exhaust gases.  The agency said Ford has begun notifying car owners about the recall by mail.  Vehicles can be taken to any Ford or Mercury dealer for the free repair.  The mortgage interest deduction is under attack.  The General Accounting Office and Office of Management and Budget are circulating juicy estimates of the revenue that could be gained by eliminating the deduction.  Forbes thinks its demise is imminent and that home buyers should beware.  Opponents of the deduction are concerned that it benefits affluent households disproportionately, and that with such a big tax preference for housing, we end up with too much investment in housing and too little in everything else.  But the mortgage interest deduction not only is not the problem, it is an efficient and egalitarian part of the tax code.  First, the deduction is not a "subsidy to home ownership" per se.  Interest is deductible for mortgages not only on owner-occupied homes, but on rental properties.  Interest is also a deductible expense for businesses.  The interest deduction is not even exclusive to housing generally, much less to owner-occupied housing.  However, owner-occupied housing does receive an important benefit in the tax code: The services derived from owner-occupied housing are not taxed.  If you rent a house to someone else, the rent (less depreciation and expenses) is taxable income.  If you live in your own house, essentially renting to yourself, no taxable income results.  Despite problems in estimating this "imputed" rent, some industrialized countries do tax it, albeit at a low rate.  How much more expensive is it to rent than to own?  Well, it depends on your tax bracket.  Taking into account the depreciation write-off on rental housing, renting is 20% to 30% percent more expensive than owning an identical dwelling for taxpayers in the highest brackets.  For taxpayers in low brackets, renting is actually cheaper than owning because the depreciation write-off on a rental is worth more to the high-bracket landlord, and then is passed on to the tenant in a competitive market, than is the tax break on the imputed rent to a low-bracket owner.  This is simply an artifact of progressive income taxes.  Had we only a single tax rate, renting would be more expensive than owning for everyone.  But this is due to the income tax landlords pay on rents, not because of the interest deduction.  Given that interest earned is taxed, deductible interest tends to make the cost of owning the same regardless of whether the home owner borrows or pays cash for a house.  For example, consider a household with a $100,000 house and a marginal tax rate of 28% that faces an interest rate of 10%.  If savings are used to buy the house, the annual cost is the forgone interest of $10,000 (on a similarly risky investment, say a Ginnie Mae pass-through) less the tax that would be paid, $2,800, leaving $7,200.  If the entire $100,000 is borrowed, the interest paid is $10,000, but since it is deductible, it costs the household, after taxes, the same $7,200.  Thus, it cannot be the mortgage interest deduction that "drives a wedge between the cost of owning and the cost of renting," as claimed by Milton Friedman in the March 20 issue of Forbes magazine.  With interest both taxable and deductible, the cost of owning via debt and equity are roughly equal.  And, again, interest is deductible for the landlord, too.  Owning is cheaper for those in high brackets because there is no tax to pay on rent received from themselves.  If interest were not deductible, owning would be more expensive for borrowers than for those who have cash.  Older and wealthier people would be unaffected, because they would simply use other assets to increase home equity and avoid expensive debt.  Only those who must borrow to own would face higher costs.  Thus, an especially American sense of equity is served by deductible mortgage interest because it allows people with only wages and salaries to have the same access to ownership as those with income from securities.  Given that over a lifetime we all have a certain amount of tax to pay, the best tax system is not one that imposes taxes disproportionately at any point.  For example, even though education is correlated with income, it would not make sense to replace part of the income tax with a tax on a college education, payable at graduation.  Similarly -- present values of the tax being equal -- people would not choose to give up the mortgage interest deduction in exchange for lower income tax rates, because the deduction helps smooth expense burdens over their lifetimes.  Eliminating the deduction is tantamount to a new tax that falls at a very inconvenient time in most people's lives -- when they have recently bought homes and are feeling pinched anyway.  And the front-end burden of our traditional mortgages is large: With interest rates at 11%, 96% of the initial payment on a 30-year mortgage is interest.  But as the loan is paid off, inflation erodes the real value of the payments and the interest portion declines.  For a taxpayer in the 35% bracket, the present value of the entire deduction on a $100,000 loan is just under $35,000.  The cash necessary to carry a $100,000 mortgage over its first six years would increase by $17,500 if interest were no longer deductible, with $3,750 of it in the first year alone.  The mortgage interest deduction helps shift the tax burden to years in which it is easier to bear.  In 1987, 58 million households owned their homes.  Of these, 25 million had no mortgage.  The top end of the distribution of existing mortgages by size can be seen in the accompanying chart.  Clearly, the current limit of $1.1 million as the maximum mortgage debt on which interest is deductible was a mere political gesture.  The affected individuals may as well have been listed in the bill.  Even for mortgages written in 1988, fewer than 10% were greater than $190,000.  The simple fact that 25 million households have no mortgage tells us that the relation between mortgage debt and either housing consumption or income is weak.  But home owners tend to be middle- and upper-income people, and why should we make paying taxes easier for them?  Because by taxing them in a less burdensome way, we can both improve their situation and ultimately get more revenue from them.  Those who care about redistribution to the poor should want the most efficient of taxes to be imposed on the well-to-do.  The American Dream of home ownership is indeed intertwined with the deductibility of mortgage interest.  Only when the treatment of interest is symmetric -- both taxable and deductible (or untaxed and not deductible) -- does the tax code not skew the distribution of ownership toward the wealthy.  And deductible interest improves the allocation of the tax burden across people's lives.  The mortgage interest deduction should remain intact.  There are less painful ways to collect the revenue.  ---  Ms. Woodward is chief economist at the Department of Housing and Urban Development.  This article is based on a paper by John C. Weicher and her for the September National Tax Journal.  ---  @ Distribution of Existing Mortgages by Size  @ BALANCE NO. OF MORTGAGES  @ Below $100,000 32,000,000  @ $100,000-120,000 433,000  @ $120,000-150,000 264,000  @ $150,000-200,000 134,000  @ $200,000-300,000 58,000  @ Over $300,000 16,000  Two investors who lost out in last year's feverish bidding to acquire a Texas savings and loan sued their lawyer, Thomas P. Vartanian, charging that he failed to inform the group about the proper appeals process.  Dean Hoover and James Eggleston, Dallas lawyers who formed the Hoover Group to bid for insolvent thrifts, said they are seeking $200 million in actual damages and additional unspecified punitive damages from Mr. Vartanian, a high-profile Washington lawyer specializing in savings and loan, and his law firm, Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson.  In the suit, Mr. Hoover charges that Mr. Vartanian intentionally failed to tell the group about a 30-day deadline for appealing a thrift sale because Mr. Vartanian didn't want to have one client suing federal regulators while he was negotiating other transactions with the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp.  Mr. Vartanian, former general counsel to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board who has billed at least $12 million for his savings and loan legal work, wasn't available for comment.  Harvey Pitt, a lawyer with Fried Frank, said the firm hasn't seen the lawsuit and couldn't comment on it.  But Mr. Pitt said the lawsuit follows a suit filed last week by Fried Frank charging that Messrs.  Hoover and Eggleston failed to pay $18,000 in legal fees owed to Mr. Vartanian.  "We take justifiable pride in the high quality of our legal services and I have absolutely no doubt that the legal services we provided the Hoover Group were of the highest level," Mr. Pitt said.  Mr. Hoover disagrees.  He contends that the Fried Frank lawsuit followed his threat of a lawsuit, and said the $18,000 in fees were "billed for hours {Mr.  Vartanian} didn't expend, for work we didn't request."  In the lawsuit, Messrs.  Hoover and Eggleston said they haven't paid the legal bills because they haven't been able to discuss them with Mr. Vartanian.  The Hoover group said it bid $150 million for Guaranty Federal Savings & Loan Association of Dallas and two smaller thrifts to be purchased as a package.  Instead the thrifts were sold last September to a group including Trammell Crow Co., Mason Best Co. and Temple-Inland Inc. for about $127 million.  Mr. Hoover said his group, which he asserts had financial backing from Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities, wanted to challenge the bidding process.  But he said he didn't learn of the 30-day limit on appeals until he read a newspaper article in January about another disgruntled bidder filing the required "petition for review."  Moreover, Mr. Hoover charges that his group continued to try to acquire other troubled thrifts and planned a bid for Commonwealth Savings Association of Houston.  Mr. Hoover said he stopped using the services of Mr. Vartanian when he learned that Mr. Vartanian was representing another bidder for Commonwealth as well as Hoover.  Mr. Pitt challenges that account, saying "that is not a correct statement of facts."  He declined to elaborate.  Most investors know they are supposed to be weighing risk against return in making investment decisions.  But how to put a number on the riskiness of a particular investment or portfolio?  Financial professionals use several measures that can be valuable for individuals in planning their portfolios.  In particular, quantifying risk is a big part of "asset allocation," a service whose popularity has grown since the 1987 stock market crash.  Unfortunately, like many aspects of managing one's money, gauging investment risk is both more complex and less certain than most people would like.  "Some people think that when you have a model, because it's scientific, you get the exact right answer.  But this is still a judgment game," says Irwin Tepper, president of a Newton, Mass., asset-allocation firm.  Consider, for instance, the varied portfolios recommended by a sampling of financial advisers and asset-allocation specialists, including Mr. Tepper.  They were asked to design a portfolio that would take the least risk while having an expected return of 10% a year.  All four specialists put a minority of the funds in common stocks -- traditionally seen as one of the riskier investments -- and emphasized a mix of cash equivalents and bonds.  But the variations were considerable: The recommended commitments to bonds, for example, ranged from 2% to 50% of the portfolios; the range for stocks was zero to 36%.  So what is this thing called risk that financial professionals can gauge so differently?  Risk has traditionally been equated with the volatility of investment returns.  Small-company stocks are deemed riskier than large-company stocks, for instance, because the best years for small stocks have been more stupendous and the worst years more sickening.  Along those lines, financial advisers often measure the "standard deviation," or variance, of an investment's short-term returns from its own average return over a longer period.  Standard deviations are calculated for entire portfolios to size up the best and worst performances they are likely to turn in.  Similarly, investors may see references to "beta," a calculation of the volatility of a particular stock or mutual fund relative to a broad market indicator such as the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index.  The lower the beta or standard deviation, the lower the risk.  Many financial advisers aim to construct portfolios that are unlikely to do worse in any single year than individual investors determine they can stomach financially and emotionally.  "It comes down in many cases to a gut-level decision," says Steven B. Enright, a New York financial planner with Seidman Financial Services, a unit of accountants BDO Seidman.  "Ninety-five percent of the clients want no more than a 10% loss."  Calculation of future risk, however, is the subject of much debate.  For instance, is it appropriate to use the high volatility of bond returns over the past several years, the lower volatility over several decades, or someone's best guess?  A minority of advisers says that the whole approach is flawed.  Their alternative is to draw up various economic scenarios for the coming year and to estimate how different investments would fare in each case.  "We want to understand how much risk we are taking now, not how much risk one would be asking on average over a long period of time," explains Hugh R. Lamle, executive vice president of M.D. Sass Investors Services Inc., a New York investment advisory firm.  But some see peril in the scenario approach.  "That is just fine in principle," says William F. Sharpe, an emeritus professor of finance at Stanford University and head of an asset-allocation firm.  "But there is a tendency for people, when they write down a limited number of scenarios, to not put down really extreme scenarios or attach a high enough probability to the extremes."  Practitioners may also disagree about how a particular type of investment will perform in a particular environment over the coming year.  M.D. Sass currently estimates that stocks would post a one-year loss of 18% in a recession.  Bailard, Biehl & Kaiser, a San Mateo, Calif., investment advisory firm, puts the recessionary loss at only 5%.  Regardless of what kind of analysis is used, advisers say some risks aren't adequately addressed by standard mathematical measures.  Where real estate investments are concerned, for example, there is the risk of having to wait months to find a buyer.  And analyses based on the expected returns and price fluctuations for different investment categories, such as stocks or corporate bonds, don't fully address the risks associated with individual issues within those groups.  For example, it may make perfectly good sense for an investor to be in the bond market, but being in certain issues may be very risky because of the chance of default.  Even more important, the focus on a one-year horizon can blind investors to the longer-term risk of not generating high enough returns to stay ahead of inflation or provide comfortably for retirement.  Investors really need to evaluate risk with two time frames in mind, says Mr. Lamle of M.D. Sass: "There's the return they need over the long-term and how much pain they can tolerate between now and then."  John Markese, director of research for American Association of Individual Investors in Chicago, says: "Some people, in trying to avoid risk, put all their money in Treasury bills.  But the likelihood of their achieving their wealth goals may be virtually zero."  Advisers can address that longer-term risk by estimating the portfolio return an investor needs to build enough cash to meet long-term goals.  Then, usually using standard deviations, they can also calculate probabilities that a particular portfolio will deliver that target return or, say, beat inflation over an extended period.  Indeed, that focus on long-term goals should be the starting point for evaluating risk, says Richard Grinold, director of research at BARRA, a Berkeley, Calif., firm that helps money managers analyze risk.  Starting from short-term volatility, he says, "is a 'trees' kind of answer rather than a 'forest' kind of answer.  I think you want to look at the forest first."  ---  @ Low Risk and a Decent Return?  Sure, You Just . . .  Here's what four investment professionals recommended when asked to design the least risky portfolio with an expected return of 10% a year  40% government bonds, 30% cash equivalents, 10% U.S. stocks, 10% foreign stocks, 10% real estate  @Bailard, Biehl & Kaiser, Least risk defined as no loss  @ San Mateo, Calif., in least favored of four  @ investment advisers economic scenarios for coming  @ year.  @ 72% money market fund, 28% short-intermediate bond fund  @M.D.  Sass Investors Least risk defined as most  @ Services, Inc., New York, positive return in least  @ investment advisers favorable of three economic  @ scenarios for coming year.  @ Based on firm's own funds.  50% corporate bonds, 25% small stocks, 22% treasury bills, 3% stocks (S&P 500)  @Irwin Tepper Associates Least risk defined as lowest  @ Inc., Newton, Mass., standard deviation for the  @ asset allocation firm expected return.  Assumptions  @ include long-term historical  @ deviations, predicted returns.  62% Treasury bills, 36% stocks (Dow Jones Industrials), 2% intermediate bonds  @WestCoast Software, Least risk defined as lowest  @ Portland, Ore., unit of standard deviation for the  @ consultants Wyatts Co. expected return.  Assumptions  @ include standard deviations for  @ the past five years, predicted  @ returns.  Hotels Try to Lock  You Into Your Room  SOME HOTELS are making it a lot tougher for business travelers to change plans.  They're doing it by increasingly requiring guests who can't make their guaranteed reservations to cancel by 4 p.m. instead of 6 p.m. Travelers who cancel past deadline may be charged full price on their credit cards, even if they never arrive at the hotel.  Hotels insist those two hours can make a big difference in reselling rooms.  They argue that when a reservation is canceled at say, 5:45 p.m., they end up with neither the cancellation charge nor another occupant.  Generally, chains haven't adopted the stricter schedule companywide, but give individual hotels the option to set hours.  "The 6 p.m. deadline just wasn't giving some hotels the flexibility they needed," says a Ramada Inc. spokeswoman, who estimates that 10% to 15% of the chain's 530 U.S. and Canada properties now impose the 4 p.m. schedule.  "It's basically a matter of economics."  But the policy puts pressure on business travelers, who normally don't arrive at their destinations so early and often don't know their plans until the end of the business day.  Now, many are getting locked into hotels that don't best fit their plans.  ---  @ Hotel Markdowns  Cities whose hotels had the highest/lowest discounts off their average room rates in 1988  @ PERCENTAGE  @ CITY OF DISCOUNT  @ Phoenix, AZ 39.6%  @ Austin, TX 38.5  @ West Palm Beach-  @ Boca Raton, FL 35.5  @ Honolulu, HI 35.3  @ Denver, CO 34.0  @ Atlantic City, NJ 8.6%  @ Jacksonville, FL 8.5  @ Portland, OR 5.8  @ Norfolk-Virginia Beach-  @ Newport, VA 1.3  @ Reno, NV 1.0  Source: Laventhal & Horwath  Where to Go If You Want  A Room and a Bargain  PHOENIX IS LOOKING a lot better these days, at least to hotel bargain hunters.  It ranked first, followed by Austin, in a recent survey on hotel discounting.  Because hotels offer weekend and corporate discount rates, they charge on average less than their published room rates.  In Phoenix, the published rates were marked down an average 39.6% in 1988, according to the survey by Laventhol & Horwath.  Austin's hotels were discounted 38.5%.  At the other end of the list, hotels in Reno marked down their rates an average of only 1%.  The higher the markdown, "the more overbuilt the hotel market is," says Mark Lomanno, national director of research for the accounting firm.  "You may not be paying the cheapest rates in the country in those cities, but you're getting the best bargains."  New York hotel prices were the highest on average -- $113 a night.  But that was marked down 24.4% from the $149 average.  Airlines' Big Secret  Is Secret No More  MIDWAY AIRLINES may have blown the lid off the airline industry's most hush-hush program: corporate fare discounting.  In an industry first, the Chicago-based carrier recently began running ads in trade newspapers promoting its corporate discount program.  "Midway is going to negotiate a deal that fits your company's travel needs exactly," one ad promises.  For a year or two, airlines have been offering big corporations lower fares on certain routes, in exchange for guarantees of large volumes of business.  But the industry has generally been tight-lipped about the subject, for fear of encouraging too many companies to demand such bargains and angering the average consumer.  Now, some industry officials think Midway has opened the floodgates by so blatantly spreading the word.  "A lot of your medium and smaller companies don't know about these deals," says Ed Peters, vice president of marketing for IVI Travel, a large agency in Northbrook, Ill.  "They'll probably start asking now, 'What's out there for us?'"  Midway, which won't disclose details of its discounts, plays down such prospects.  It insists it can limit the deals by negotiating only with companies that can demonstrate how they'll boost Midway's business.  Mix-up, or Lack of One,  Skews Pan Am Contest  NOW THIS IS the kind of contest all airlines should hold.  To celebrate its 50 years of trans-Atlantic travel, Pan Am this summer began distributing scratch-off cards that gave customers a chance to win instant prizes and compete for a grand prize drawing of 50 years of free travel to Europe.  But on one of the first flights, nearly everybody aboard won a prize, ranging from free drinks to ticket discounts.  The airline, of course, had meant for the winning cards to be spread evenly among all flights to Europe.  "Apparently, the manufacturer didn't shuffle the cards right," a Pan Am spokeswoman says.  Winners were allowed to keep their prizes.  But after the mistake was caught, the cards were better shuffled for the rest of the contest, which ended this month.  "I thought the mistake was kind of cute," the spokeswoman adds.  "But some people weren't too happy."  Tadeusz Mazowiecki is scheduled to be confirmed today as the first non-Communist leader of an Eastern Bloc country since Stalin drew closed the Iron Curtain more than 40 years ago.  Just two days ago, Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev ordered the Polish Communist Party to drop its demands for cabinet positions beyond the two-defense and interior -- already agreed upon.  The party has now agreed to support the new government in Parliament and to accept Mr. Mazowiecki as prime minister.  Mr. Mazowiecki, and his colleagues from the trade union movement Solidarity face the challenging tasks of salvaging the economic wreckage while sharing power with the Communists -- the same party that imprisoned him for his dissident work only eight years ago.  The new Polish leader spoke with Amity Shlaes of the editorial page of The Wall Street Journal/Europe at the offices of the Solidarity paper, Solidarity Weekly, in Warsaw.  ---  WSJ: As Poland's new prime minister your greatest challenge will be to rescue the nation's devastated economy.  What measures will you take to stop inflation and how long will the Polish people have the patience for you to succeed?  Mr. Mazowiecki: We have a crisis situation in Poland.  With putting an end to inflation for example, I am quite aware this is going to be a difficult task.  At the same time, we must revive production.  We need to liquidate barriers that impede production, that bureaucratize our economy.  There are not enough incentives in the economic sphere.  My general philosopohy is that the state shouldn't determine everything {but instead} must open possibilities to people.  The first important thing is to get Poles believing it can be better.  But when they will be able to feel that is hard to say.  There are many factors that affect this.  For example aid from abroad.  The government will address the International Monetary Fund and we will have to prepare a plan for the next IMF session {in September}.  WSJ: Can a trade union lead a fight for free-market forces?  Mr. Mazowiecki: Solidarity will remain a trade union.  That's my idea.  But {there must be} new political forces that emerge.  The trade union can be a part of implementing the market economy.  For some years we have talked about establishing an anti-crisis pact {in which the workers agree not to strike}.  This pact has to be elaborated now.  This pact has to be mutually respected, because it's the only way to get our economy on a straight line, not immediately but in the longer run.  Solidarity and the trade unions must be one of the sides of this pact.  WSJ: You are Poland's first non-Communist prime minister since World War II and also its first postwar leader with a strong Catholic profile.  What will having a Catholic leadership change for Poland?  Mr. Mazowiecki: A state is for the common good; it has to be a state for everybody.  There are no distinctions between categories of people.  We have experienced what the ideological state means.  So we wouldn't like to exchange one ideological state for another one.  This is an important moment in history in which political forces can work for the first time and form a government.  {As for changing legislation, for example to ban abortion,} as a Catholic I am for the protection of life, for life being respected.  And I personally am against abortion.  But I do think the focus should be on solving such problems through education, not through repressive means.  WSJ: When you were a dissident working for Solidarity the Communists put you in jail.  How can you work with them now in government?  Mr. Mazowiecki: I think my task in this historic moment is to pass beyond such things as having been in jail -- not to appeal to resentments.  It is not our intention to put the Communist Party in the position of negation and pure opposition. {That is impossible because} history has not known an opposition that has the army and police in its hands.  As for the economic situation . . . they must take co-responsibility. . . .  I am not going to agree to lead a government {in which Solidarity is represented through} only a prime minister and a few secondary seats. . . .  I may be a good or a bad prime minister, but I will not be a puppet prime minister.  WSJ: How should Western aid to Poland be structured?  Mr. Mazowiecki: I think it is important that the West understand that Poland needs help and is worth helping -- not to wait until we fail.  But we understand very clearly that aid cannot be selfless aid but aid that is based on economic profitability.  I think the economic assistance from the West can help a lot if it comes soon.  WSJ: How about aid from the Soviet Union?  Mr. Mazowiecki: We pay great attention to the important changes made by Mr. Gorbachev.  At the same time we would like the Russians to have under standing for our transformation.  To pay attention to the fact there is an opportunity opening in our country, . . . that there will be a broad social basis {in Poland}.  As we wish good luck to the changes occurring in the Soviet Union, I hope they wish us good luck.  WSJ: Poland has the first non-Communist prime minister in the history of the East Bloc.  Will other countries in the East Bloc follow your lead if you succeed?  Mr. Mazowiecki: All I can say is that we must succeed.  For the others I can't answer anything.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. said it completed a $100 million sale of the institutional money-management business of its Lehman Management Co.  The business, in which Shearson will retain a 20% stake, was sold to certain members of its management.  Proceeds will result in a $77 million pre-tax gain for Shearson in its quarter ending Sept. 30.  Shearson is 60%-owned by American Express Co.  Summer is the time for vacations, for recreation, for taking off your serious hat and putting on your carefree one.  It's a time for dropping all pretense that what you are doing has a deeper significance than the act itself, or that is it relevant in any way to the real issues and problems of the day.  Such escapism is a fundamental human need, which is why the nation's capital becomes a ghost town in August.  But this year, Washington didn't wait for August to take a vacation.  From Capitol Hill to the White House, it hasn't seemed to be serious about serious things for months.  Consider the fight that tied the place in knots just as Congress was stampeding to adjournment in early August.  The matter at hand was the savings-and-loan industry bailout and reform package, a matter necessitated by the deregulatory fecklessness of Congress and the administration earlier in the 1980s.  There was no disagreement that real money, ranging from $150 billion upward, was going to be required over the next several years to clean up the wreckage.  Despite the ersatz populism trotted out regularly by Democrats and Republicans, almost everyone also promptly agreed that the taxpayers should shoulder the lion's share of the costs, rather than the institutions that had incurred them and caused the mess in the first place.  That left only one important debate unresolved.  Should the total cost, which is real, be treated as real?  Should it be put on budget, where it would show, or kept off budget, where everyone could pretend that this massive addition to the deficit didn't really exist?  And if it were to be put on budget should it be counted as part of the fiscal '90 budget, thereby inevitably triggering Gramm-Rudman-Hollings sequestration provisions, or should it be treated as something separate and apart from the "real" deficit?  The last question was all but ignored.  Almost everyone, regardless of label, agreed that this was a deficit that really wasn't a deficit.  That automatically meant no one was dealing with the question as serious adults, representing equally serious constituents.  That left Congress and the White House to deadlock over the non-serious question of how much, if any, of the total annual cost of the bailout should be publicly attached to the budget for accounting, though not Gramm-Rudman, purposes.  Watching grown men and women tying themselves in knots on that one was akin to witnessing preachers having a go at mud wrestling.  Former congressional budget director Alice Rivlin put it with admirable clarity: "Borrowing money is borrowing money," a fact of life legislated out of existence just before adjournment.  For today's public servants, President Bush chief among them, money is something you promise, not something you must provide either through new taxes or new budget cuts.  The voters having proved that they want to have their cake and eat it, too, the politicians are anxious to validate their wisdom.  Cleaner air?  Absolutely.  Improved public-school education?  Of course.  A drug war?  All out.  A new leap into space?  Tomorrow.  And the price tag for all this, not to mention the combination of cuts in other programs and additional revenue to pay it?  A discreet cough, silence and a quick shuffle to the wings.  Finally, there has been the matter of the hostages in Lebanon and the larger question of terrorism and hostage-taking everywhere.  Having been on vacation, I have been totally cut off from television and therefore untouched by the searing images of death and grief accompanying the latest tragedy, as they inevitably accompany every hostage "crisis."  As a result, what strikes me from afar is a sense of deja vu, plus disbelief that, at least initially, officials and media fell into a mode of public rhetoric and behavior that was as familiar as it was futile.  By now, everyone ought to know that the U.S. has one million people at risk in the world every day of every year.  We are a free people in a nation with far-flung economic and military interests.  Our nation has real enemies, and our allies have real enemies who believe they can influence those allies through us.  Hostage taking is therefore inevitable, made even more inevitable by the public drama we stage after every incident.  But whether the administration in office is "tough" or "soft," there is virtually nothing it can do that is easy or without grave potential for loss of innocent life.  Nor is any other nation's example of particular relevance to us.  Israel is routinely "tough," and it is as routinely the target of terrorism of one sort or another.  France is widely understood to be "soft," willing to buy its people out of captivity and otherwise deal with terrorists, but it is victimized neither more nor less often than other countries.  All of which should now be clear to just about everyone, from television anchors to men and women in the street to presidents.  And that being clear, serious people might be expected to draw serious conclusions, not the least serious being that the president has no good options and therefore would be best advised to drop the subject and get on with the business of being president.  The alternative, which can best be described as incessant public dithering, is both hypocritical and counterproductive, in that it raises the value of hostage taking without increasing the likelihood of an acceptable solution.  But we are not serious on this matter, either, though President Bush shows signs of having learned a great deal about what not to do and say from the mistakes of his immediate predecessors.  While he is still overly fond of musing aloud about the problem, most of what he has to say is restrained and sensible.  But it was President Bush, nonetheless, who approved the nonsense PR game of briefing the world on how the U.S. had been on the verge of tough military steps if another hostage had been killed.  That left the chilling, though improbable, implication that this president had actually learned nothing from the disastrous results of the last president's military sorties in the region.  A much more likely explanation is that on this, as on taxes, deficits and the lack of fit between promises and resources, the president and his staff simply don't believe the American people are ready to hear the unadorned truth about anything.  It is a lack of faith shared by Congress and demonstrated in repeated ways this year.  Thus it has been as co-conspirators that Congress and president have taken a break they don't deserve or need.  They've both been on vacation from the hard choices and plain talk of honest governance all year.  ---  Mr. Carter is a political commentator who heads a television production firm.  From testimony July 19 before a subcommittee of the House Foreign Affairs Committee by Michael Oksenberg, professor of China politics at the University of Michigan and a staff member of the National Security Council during the Carter administration:  Let the reason for this global retreat or withdrawal from China be clearly understood.  It is not the product of a conspiracy led by the United States.  It is not due to a coordinated policy of Western governments.  It is not the result of the improvement of Sino-Soviet relations.  It is not attributable to hostile Western journalists filing distorted dispatches from China.  It is not the consequence of a plot by a small number of Chinese intellectuals.  It does not stem from students failing to leave the square at the right time.  Nor is it the outcome of a struggle for power, in which one defiant leader -- Zhao Ziyang -- stimulated a mass movement that otherwise would have been handled deftly.  These are the reasons that the leaders of China offer for their debacle.  And I suspect that the leaders believe their own explanation.  They are unprepared to accept the real reasons for their domestic and foreign plight: their own lapse of judgment; their isolation; their tragic failure to understand and respond to the profound social and intellectual changes caused by their own economic reforms and openness to the outside world; and their lack of concern for the world-wide reaction to the violent suppression of the demonstrations.  Your Aug. 9 Asides "ACLU Defends Satanism" states that a coven of witches in Rhode Island was able, via the assistance of the ACLU, to obtain tax status as a legitimate religious body.  This obviously piqued your editorial ire.  If you had bothered to do your research, you would know that witchcraft (also known as Wicca) is recognized by, among others, the U.S. armed forces as a legitimate religious practice.  You would also have been able to tell your readers that Wicca far predates the advent of Christianity and therefore has nothing to do with either God or Satan.  Daniel Raphael  Seattle  ---  Witchcraft, which can be positive or negative, has little or no similarity to Satanism, except that they both deal with the unseen world.  Such ignorance unleashed the Salem witch hunts three centuries ago.  Incidentally, the Rhode Island tax ruling was certainly a correct one.  Rev. Douglas Scripture Boggs  Christian Light Metaphysical Ministries  Bloomington, Ind.  ---  In your haste to discredit the ACLU you have played fast and loose with the facts on witchcraft.  Witchcraft is not Satanism.  This sad attribution was begun by the Roman Catholic witch hunters in the Middle Ages; relying on these sources is like relying on Nazis for insights on Jewish culture.  Witches and their covens are nothing more, and nothing less, than the remnants of the great, pre-Christian pagan religion of Europe and the Near East.  Rather than worship a male god, witches revere the Great Goddess, an all-encompassing figure who appears even today in popular culture as Mother Nature or Mother Earth.  Despite the lack of a bureaucracy, hierarchical priesthood or massive buildings, witchcraft assuredly falls under any definition of religion, precisely the point the ACLU was trying to make.  Richard Craig  Chicago  ---  Satanism is a Judeo-Christian religion; Wicca is not.  Satanism glorifies evil and can exist only in opposition to Christ and the Judeo-Christian god.  Wicca is in opposition to no religion except Satanism, but only because Wicca opposes all manifestations of evil.  Wicca is a religion of healing and nurturing.  I have never known a witch or a coven that believed in Satan.  Satan is from an entirely different (and to us, recently developed) religion, and we deny his existence.  Morgan Greylock  Belleville, Ill.  ---  You perpetuate the tendency for Christians to regard those who worship something different from their own God as uncivilized followers of the devil, and ready for conversion to what you might consider a real, tax-deductible religion.  But witchcraft and other "pagan" religions began long before Christianity.  Just because witchcraft isn't as popular as Christianity doesn't mean its churches shouldn't be given the same rights and benefits of Christian churches -- every church is protected under the First Amendment's guarantees of religious freedom.  We can't have laws favoring one religion while repressing others, otherwise we're doomed to return to the days of witch burnings and concentration camps.  Jonathan Velline  Richmond, Calif.  Malcolm Forbes said he won't write off any of the estimated $1 million he spent entertaining friends and business associates at his 70th birthday party in Morocco.  Mr. Forbes said some people got "the notion" he might try to write off some of the trip because he flew over a number of big Forbes customers -- advertisers in the business magazine that bears his name.  He asserted "a case could be made" for deductions stemming from the party.  But "it was never planned to be a tax-deductible trip," he said.  "There is no portion of it that will be claimed" as a deduction.  The possibility of a write-off had aroused the ire of a congressman.  After reports that Mr. Forbes intended to write off some expenses as a business tax deduction, Rep. Fortney Stark (D., Calif.) wrote a letter to Internal Revenue Service Commissioner Fred Goldberg saying: "I hope that you will ensure that the IRS inspects with a fine-tooth comb any claims by the Forbes businesses for the reasonableness of party deductions.  The public's support of the tax system is destroyed by reports of tax-deductible birthday bashes by bellydancing billionaires."  That was after Mr. Forbes was quoted in the Washington Post as saying "some of it is a business expense" and after his eldest son, Malcolm Forbes Jr., told the New York Times: "When you invite 300 of the CEOs that you do business with, you want to make a good impression."  Actually, Mr. Forbes may have had a hard time claiming party expenses as business deductions, according to some accountants.  Steven Friedman, senior manager at KPMG Peat Marwick, didn't seem to think the affair was "conducive to discussing business."  And even if it had been, the tax code requires Mr. Forbes to show that such things as 600 belly dancers and trips to Morocco were "necessary" and "ordinary" business expenses.  Gerald Padwe, national director of tax practice at Touche Ross & Co., commented: "I wouldn't dismiss out of hand that some of this is deductible."  After all, he added, it draws attention to Mr. Forbes and his product, the magazine.  "It's an advertising expense."  The IRS won't discuss the matter.  "We're obviously not going to comment about matters involving an individual taxpayer," a spokesman said.  Mr. Forbes said Mr. Stark's criticism was "good election" material.  But the party, it appears, might not have been.  Politicians were sparse on the guest list.  The only governors attending were Thomas Kean of New Jersey and George Deukmejian of California and Edward DiPrete of Rhode Island, according to a Forbes magazine spokesman.  Mr. DiPrete is a friend of one of Mr. Forbes's sons.  Both Mr. Kean and Mr. Deukmejian are old friends of Mr. Forbes -- and neither is running for re-election.  Cie.  Industrielle Chairman Jean-Marc Vernes suffered a setback in efforts to defend his company from a record takeover bid by Cie.  Financiere de Suez as Cie.  Financiere de Paribas decided not to act as a white knight.  Because of its ties to groups close to Mr. Vernes, Paribas was widely rumored as one of the most likely candidates to lead his defense as he tries to fight off Suez's two-pronged, 23.7 billion-franc ($3.62 billion) bid for the Cie.  Industrielle holding company and its main asset, insurer Groupe Victoire.  But in a telephone interview last night, Paribas Chairman Michel Francois-Poncet said that, barring a major change in circumstances over the next few days, his group "won't be part of the action as an equity shareholder."  "Since we're neither a shareholder {in Cie.  Industrielle or Victoire} nor an insurer, it's basically not our ballgame," Mr. Francois-Poncet said after his merchant banking group, a longtime rival of Suez's, reviewed the situation for two weeks.  Paribas's decision could make it more difficult for Mr. Vernes to launch a counterbid, as the banking group was viewed as one of the few French groups with enough money to help top what is already France's largest takeover offer.  Mr. Vernes has pledged to the French government that his counterbid, if it emerges, would include a majority of French groups.  Copper-futures prices resumed their climb yesterday after a pause the day before.  Production problems remained the dominant influence.  The September contract advanced 2.50 cents a pound to $1.2785.  The Cananea mine in Mexico, which a judge declared bankrupt on Sunday, will reopen within three months, the company's director was quoted as saying.  The mine has a production capacity of 160,000 tons of copper a year.  One analyst said he had heard that the mine would open in mid-October but wouldn't be in full production this year.  In Peru, the labor situation appeared to be improved but still tenuous, according to the analyst.  Southern Peru Copper Co.'s Ilo smelter was reported to have been working fully since Monday, and some miners at the company's Toquepala and Cuajone mines were said to have returned to work.  Another report quoted a company official as saying that shipments of copper from the Ilo smelter have resumed, as workers have returned after a one-week strike.  The official was quoted as saying that no tonnage will be lost as a result of the strike and that shipments will be rearranged so as to avoid delays.  The official, however, noted that Toquepala and Cuajone mines remained on strike.  While production at Cuajone was halted, some concentrates have been received at Ilo from Toquepala, and the smelter has stocks for about a week, according to the official, the report said.  William O'Neill, vice president of research for Elders Futures, New York, said it was a "typical Peruvian strike, not complete, and with a great deal of uncertainty."  In Papua New Guinea, where the big Bougainville mine hasn't been operating since May 15 because of attacks by rebel landowners, the Roman Catholic Church entered the dispute on the landowners' side, according to Reuters.  The mine hadn't been expected to reopen until at least the end of the year because of extensive damage and concern about the safety of the employees.  But last week, a mine official said production would resume Sept. 1.  The church said, "Laws must be enacted to recognize the Melanesian concepts of ownership, value and compensation for the land," according to the report.  Mr. O'Neill said the entry of the church into the situation could intensify the dispute and possibly affect the announced reopening of the mine.  Talks in the 47-day-old strike at the Highland Valley mines in British Columbia are scheduled to resume tomorrow, a news report said.  Highland Valley produces about 180,000 tons of copper annually.  Mike Frawley, a metals trader at PaineWebber, New York, said the strength of the copper market in August, normally a slow month, had exceeded expectations, and increased demand was beginning to develop while supplies remain tight.  "There is a lot of buying inquiry for the fourth quarter," Mr. Frawley said.  Refined U.S. copper production during July amounted to 121,300 tons, down from 142,600 in June, according to the American Bureau of Metal Statistics.  The July figure, however, was well above the 112,700 tons produced in July 1988, the report said.  World-wide inventories of copper as of the end of June amounted to 427,100 tons, down from 455,700 at the end of May and only slightly changed from stocks of 423,500 tons at the end of June 1988.  Normally, stocks of copper tend to rise during the summer because of shutdowns of copper-using industries.  But in the past three years, demand has been stronger than expected during June, July and August, preventing a buildup of inventories.  Demand begins to rise in the fall and reaches its peak around March.  Yesterday, stocks of copper in warehouses of New York's Commodity Exchange again fell, this time by 75 tons to 16,395 tons.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  SUGAR: Futures prices ended slightly higher after first dipping.  The October delivery was up 0.18 cent a pound at 14.13 cents.  At one point the contract traded as low as 13.79 cents.  Prices initially were easier based on a report that India would buy 200,000 tons of refined sugar this week, an analyst said.  Earlier this week, there had been expectations that India would purchase as much as 500,000 tons of raw and refined sugar, and the smaller figure reported yesterday was a letdown, the analyst said.  Prices perked up when it was reported that Yugoslavia would come into the market next Tuesday to buy 90,000 tons of refined sugar, the analyst said.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Most soybean and corn futures prices dipped slightly in quiet trading.  Continued rains in Iowa and Illinois doused speculation from earlier this week that a developing dry spell might stunt crop production.  With little hint of any major export deals in the works, interest among speculators is ebbing, traders said.  Wheat-futures prices were mixed.  ENERGY: Petroleum futures were generally higher despite increased oil inventories in the U.S.  The American Petroleum Institute's report on U.S. oil statistics, released late Tuesday, showed an increase of 4.5 million barrels in crude oil stocks in the week ended last Friday to 335.2 million barrels compared with the previous week's level.  Initially, as expected, this was a bearish factor for petroleum futures.  Crude oil opened lower on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  But it recovered as analysts and traders took note that crude oil inventories still were lower than they were a year ago.  West Texas Intermediate for October delivery settled at $18.80 a barrel, up 11 cents.  November and December crudes were up nine cents and six cents a barrel, respectively.  Gasoline and heating-oil futures generally showed modest gains.  COFFEE: Futures prices rose for the fourth consecutive day.  The September contract rose 3.68 cents to 83.22 cents.  Prices have strengthened as the pressure to sell coffee by Central American producing countries and Mexico has dissipated, according to a New York dealer.  Over the past month, huge quantities of coffee that had been held in warehouses in those producing countries at great expense have been sold at almost any cost as prices dropped, the dealer said.  Now, however, most of this coffee has been absorbed by dealers in consuming countries and there isn't as great an urgency to sell on the part of those producers.  Roasters aren't showing much interest in buying, although their inventories aren't thought to be sufficiently stocked for winter needs, when consumption of coffee is highest, the dealer said.  "They're only buying hand-to-mouth at the moment.  That's because they have to continue working off more expensive stocks acquired earlier and because they aren't sure if this market has actually bottomed out," the dealer said.  However, he noted, roasters will eventually have to come in for supplies later in the fall.  The open interest in futures, which is the biggest in years, he said, reflects both the huge sales to dealers and the anticipation that roasters will begin to buy.  He said dealers have been heavy sellers in hedges to protect the price of the coffee they own against price drops.  Roasters have bought futures that will protect them against price increases for the beans that they will be buying later on, the dealer said.  Open interest is the number of contracts that remain to be offset by either an opposite transaction or delivery of a commodity.  International Business Machines Corp. said its scientists have demonstrated a very dense chip for receiving data over fiber-optic lines at a speed many times faster than currently possible.  The computer giant said the chip contains 50 times more optical and electronic components than any similar chip, further demonstrating the feasibility of such optoelectronic devices.  The devices will become increasingly important in coming years because they allow data transmission of at least one billion bits per second -- the information equivalent of a good-sized set of encyclopedias.  That transmission rate is as much as 10 times faster than currently possible on fiber-optic lines, which are already many times faster than conventional wires.  IBM also said its scientists had demonstrated a similar chip for use in transmitting data.  Being able to handle transmission and reception with just two chips should make the devices faster, by cutting the distance the signals have to travel.  That should also make them less expensive and more reliable, because there will be fewer parts.  The chips combine the optical and electronic parts so that data, normally transmitted electronically, can be changed into pulses of light.  Other companies have announced development of optoelectronic chips, but progress has been limited because the combination of the different types of devices can be tricky.  In addition, the "quantum well" technology used to generate light pulses in the gallium arsenide chips is still esoteric.  Few computer networks need this sort of speed at the moment, but the time is coming.  Computers' power continues to double every couple of years, and people are increasingly transmitting graphics, which require far more data than does text.  In any case, the IBM chips are experimental, so it will take some years for them to reach the market.  In a mud-brick workshop three miles from the Pyramids, a woman weaves a tapestry reminiscent of Pharaonic tomb carvings from 4,500 years ago.  Birds, camels, dancers and breadbakers float across the loom with little concern for scale or perspective.  Together, the figures form a narrative of gypsy life that flows from bottom to top, from right to left to right.  The weaver, Garya Mahmoud, hasn't seen Pharaonic reliefs; nor does she work from sketches or patterns.  In fact, she's seen little of anything outside this rural village of 10,000.  Her inspiration comes instead from memories of the Harrania she knew as a child.  "I weave only what is up here," says the 45-year-old artist, tapping her black head cloth with a metal comb used to beat threads together.  "I make it up as I go along."  Sitting barefoot and cross-legged before the loom, she weaves the hair of a gypsy girl, then heads home to cook lunch for her family of eight.  Improvisation and everyday life are the warp and weft of the Ramses Wissa Wassef Arts Centre, named for the Cairo professor who founded the atelier in 1951.  Mr. Wissa Wassef blamed the decline of traditional Egyptian craft on modern education, which he felt destroyed inborn creativity.  To prove his theory, he chose village children at random and taught them to weave whatever came into their heads.  Thirty-eight years later the experiment has bloomed into a thriving collective of 45 artists whose work now exhibits in galleries worldwide.  "The imagination was there just waiting," says Sophie Wissa Wassef, the center's director since her husband's death in 1974.  "All we did was give it thread."  The Wissa Wassefs chose weaving because it is slow, allowing for time to improvise and imagine.  The process also is easy for villagers to grasp: the thread is spun from Nile Valley cotton, the looms are primitive, without pedals or shuttles, the dyes are made from the vegetables in Mrs. Wissa Wassef's garden.  The weavers, most of whom are illiterate, come and go as the rhythms of agriculture and child-rearing allow.  In one room, young mothers weave while babies doze in their laps or in cradles alongside their looms.  Some artists arrive only after helping their families gather crops in the field.  Not surprisingly, the tapestries they create are naturalistic, depicting scenes close to home.  "It is best to always tell a story that you have seen with your own eyes," explains Karima Ali, one of the original dozen recruits in 1951.  Ten still weave at the center.  One work, titled "Wheat," follows grain from the stalk to the harvest to the wide-sailed boats that once carried grain up the Nile.  Another, called "Market Place," shows a Bruegelesque clutter of shifty merchants and lecherous traders eyeing women who sell rabbits and geese.  Mrs. Ali once traveled to Europe with an exhibition of the center's work.  While there, she saw some modern paintings.  "I didn't like them," she says.  "They had no meaning, no story."  But Harrania tapestries aren't always straightforward.  Twenty years ago, Mrs. Ali became enraged when her husband took a second wife.  Setting aside her portraits of plants and birds, she crafted a huge battle scene filled with charging horses and bleeding soldiers.  Six months into the work, her mood softened and she wove two war horses sipping from a calm blue pond.  By the time she reached the top she was her usual self: The battle melts away into an orange-purple sunset.  When the Wissa Wassefs came to Harrania, there was no tradition of decorative art in the village.  Even now, the first-generation artists don't hang weavings in their homes, preferring to sell whatever they create.  "They have the same attitude toward flowers," says Mrs. Wissa Wassef.  "Why plant something you can't eat?"  The artists are paid per piece, and most earn three times the wage of farm laborers.  The second-generation weavers, taken in as children by the Wissa Wassefs' two daughters, see themselves as artists as well as craftsmen.  And they are gradually changing the village's attitudes toward labor.  In the 1950s, it was considered a disgrace for women to work outside the home; now, the young weavers often are prized as brides.  "Why shouldn't I be proud of my work?" says 18-year-old Naglaa Farouk, who plans to keep weaving despite grumbling from her fiance's family.  An increasing number of young men also are forsaking farm labor to join the center.  The tapestries, though, remain remarkably unchanged by the slow incursion of modern ways.  Many Harrania homes now have televisions, and weavers enjoy nature programs that show them something other than the camels, water buffalo and palm groves of the Nile Valley.  "But they see it in their own peculiar way," says Suzanne Wissa Wassef.  When an underwater creature appears in a weaving, she says, "it may be a fantasy fish, a round ball with big eyes."  After a visit to the Cairo planetarium, one weaver stuck a Milky Way into the sky of his tapestry -- beside a sunrise and sunset.  Curiously, the Pyramids rarely appear in the tapestries, although they dominate the village horizon.  Asked about this, weaver Garya Mahmoud laughs.  "A pyramid is just there, like a tree.  What is so special about it?"  Even so, the resonances of Pharaonic art are sometimes striking; the early tapestries often tell stories in horizontal bands, and stylized birds seem pasted to flat backgrounds as if in a hieroglyphic text.  Again, Mrs. Mahmoud just shrugs.  "They lived near here and saw some of the same things we see," she says of the ancient Egyptians.  "But every period must explain its own period.  We wear different clothes now and don't fish with spears."  Mrs. Wissa Wassef, who lives just above the workshop, wonders how the next generation of artists will express itself.  She believes in adapting to Harrania's modernization and now teaches her artists simple perspective, or reads them poetry while they weave.  "The biggest danger is that the art becomes repetitive," she says over a lunch of grilled pigeon with her daughters.  But her children are more orthodox, insisting that any outside influence alters their father's vision of native creativity, expressed in the simplest of ways.  "Rules and foreign images handicap them," Yoanne says, shaking pita bread at her mother.  "Their own solutions are always best."  Drifting back from lunch in brightly colored robes and head-scarves, the weavers themselves aren't much interested in artistic theory.  For them, the center's garden and cool adobe studios are a soothing oasis in a village of unpaved streets and garbage-choked canals.  And the work itself provides both a good living and a creative alternative to drudgery in home or field.  As a boy, Ali Selim was turned away from the weaving center because the workshop couldn't handle any more students.  Envious of his sister, who weaved there, Ali crafted a crude loom of his own, picked up discarded threads and made his first tapestry.  Presenting it to the Wissa Wassefs, he was added to the original group.  Thirty years later, he's still there, weaving beside his sister in a room that is silent except for the tap of metal combs and the sound of fingers sliding along threads.  "There are a thousand jobs in the world," he says, eyes riveted to his loom.  "But thank God I found one as peaceful and happy as this."  ---  Mr. Horwitz is a free-lance writer based in Cairo.  Diodes Inc. said four long-time directors resigned and two outside directors were appointed in a restructuring of the board of the supplier of semiconductor rectifiers.  Diodes, Chatsworth, Calif., said the new panel consists of an annually elected, single-class, five-member board.  The changes were made at the suggestion of Diodes' largest shareholder, Microsemi Corp.  Dorothy N. Lloyd, Charles A. Benak, Albert F. Ottobre and Ted G. Slave stepped down as members of the old classified, seven-member board.  Harold Harrigian, director of corporate finance at Crowell Weedon & Co., and Michael A. Rosenberg, president of SFE Technologies of San Fernando, Calif., were named directors.  David M. Lloyd, Alan B. Lees and Maurice L. Muehle will continue as members of Diodes' board.  Bell Atlantic Corp. said it is continuing negotiations with the Communications Workers of America to resolve local labor issues, and it said it has reached a tentative agreement with the union in New Jersey.  Workers have been on strike since Aug. 6, when their old three-year labor agreement expired.  The company said it also will meet this afternoon with bargainers for the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers in New Jersey.  The union, which represents 9,000 Bell Atlantic employees, is scheduled to give the company its response to a contract offer presented last Friday.  Another IBEW unit in Pennsylvania has reached tentative agreement on a new contract.  Bell Atlantic and the CWA, which represents about 41,000 employees at the telephone operating company, already have reached agreement on major issues such as wages, pensions and benefits.  The two sides had set a deadline of midnight Tuesday to reach agreement on local issues such as work rules, but extended the talks early Wednesday morning after failing to resolve issues.  Meanwhile, Chicago-based Ameritech and the CWA are scheduled to return to the bargaining table today.  About 40,000 of the company's workers are represented by CWA. No talks are scheduled to try to resolve the strike against New York-based Nynex Corp., where the CWA represents about 40,000 workers and IBEW represents 20,000.  The Mexican government is hoping that the opening to foreign investment in its 58%-held airline, Mexicana de Aviacion, is the bold step needed to convince investors abroad that Mexico has changed its traditional nationalistic aversion toward foreign capital.  The government announced late Tuesday that an investment group, headed by Mexicans but including Chase Manhattan Corp., Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and British investor Sir James Goldsmith, will provide $140 million in fresh capital to a new airline holding company to be formed from Mexicana.  The government will gradually eliminate its stake in the airline over the next three years, after which foreigners would be allowed to take a majority position if they elect to do so.  The Mexicana deal is one of the first fruits of a liberalization of Mexico's foreign investment law unveiled in May.  The new investment regulations allow foreign participation in some previously closed sectors, such as airlines, and provide for automatic approval of projects of as much as $100 million in industries not reserved for public and national companies.  Before the Mexicana deal, the regulatory change had received mixed reviews.  Adherents said that the government of President Carlos Salinas de Gortari made the best of the bad situation it encountered when it took office last December without the congressional support to repeal the old nationalistic investment law.  "They stretched the existing law as far as they could, a good job under severe constraints," says Miguel Jauregui, an investment lawyer whose clients include many top foreign companies.  But critics have called for a more unconditional opening.  They note that Mexico's need for foreign capital has taken on far greater urgency since the recently announced Bush administration debt relief plan provided Mexico with less economic aid than was originally hoped.  By allowing significant foreign participation in Mexicana, which handles about half of Mexico's air traffic, the government is hoping to quiet those who doubt its openness.  "This deal shows that we are very serious about attracting foreign investment," says Carlos Camacho Gaos, the Commerce Ministry's director general of foreign investment.  "Under the old regulations, this wouldn't have been possible."  In the Mexicana agreement, the government's stake in the airline will be diluted to 40%, the current private shareholders will hold 35%, and the new Mexican and U.S. investment group will hold 25%.  A group of Mexicans, led by the hotel and sugar mill conglomerate Grupo Xabre, will provide 52% of the new $140 million in equity.  Chase Manhattan will provide 35%, a Drexel unit 7%, and a company controlled by Mr. Goldsmith, 6%.  The new investors have pledged to provide Mexicana $3 billion in new capital over the next decade.  The investment is badly needed at a time when the Mexican airline industry is becoming increasingly competitive because of President Salinas's program of deregulation and privatization.  Chase's $50 million investment in Mexicana is part of an overall effort by Chase to become deeply involved in transactions that require a high degree of financial engineering -- and profit.  Last year, Chase scored big in a similar U.S. deal: it reported an $11 million pretax gain on the sale of a stake in Cain Chemical Co.  Before the Mexicana restructuring, the effect of the new regulations had yet to make itself felt in a big way.  Through July of this year, the Mexican Commerce Ministry approved $1.2 billion in new foreign investment, about one-quarter of which arrived through the new mechanism for automatic approval.  In the previous administration, the annual average for approved foreign investment was $2.2 billion.  But Mexican officials say they've seen a sharp increase in inquiries.  Companies with experience in dealing with Mexico's previous closed investment regime are the ones most impressed by the new attitude.  "Mexico's opening up much, much faster than I would ever have imagined," says George Kise, an executive for a Seattle-based fishing and seafood processing company.  Mr. Kise was rebuffed in an effort to establish an operation in Mexico before the introduction of the new regulations, but he's been encouraged to try again.  Not everyone is so enthusiastic about the new investment policy.  Highly conservative Japanese investors are put off by some of the creative mechanisms the government designed to circumvent the old law's restrictions, such as special 20-year trusts that allow foreigners to enter some once-closed industries.  "Why must I take this circuitous route, when what I really want is clarity and certainty?" said Masato Kuwahara, general manger of Sumitomo Corp. in Mexico.  Adds Seiroku Ochi, commercial director of Nissan Motor Co.'s Mexican operations: "I don't think these regulations alone are going to make a great difference."  To convince doubters, the government may be unveiling another blockbuster foreign investment project soon.  Government officials say they're studying several proposals from foreign investors for projects involving the government's 51%-owned Telefonos de Mexico, the huge but notoriously inefficient telephone monopoly.  Analysts said the government might grant foreigners concessions in some auxiliary telephone services, such as cellular phones, that have been opened up to 100% foreign participation under the new regulations.  Investors jolted stocks higher with a late round of buying.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 27.12 to 2678.11, with half of that gain coming in the last hour of trading.  New York Stock Exchange volume of 159,640,000 shares was the highest this week.  Broader averages showed a strong advance as well: Standard & Poor's 500-stock index gained 3.51 to 344.70, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 1.73 to 191.84.  Advancing issues on the Big Board outpaced decliners, 1,015 to 487.  Traders attributed the market's rise to bargain-hunting by investors, takeover-related buying and stock-index arbitrage.  Kidder Peabody and other firms conducted large stock-index arbitrage "buy" programs -- selling Major Market Index futures against a purchase of underlying stocks-traders said.  Dow Chemical was a favored stock with investors again yesterday, rising 2 1/8 to 104 7/8, the second consecutive 52-week high.  The stock has gained nearly $5 in two days.  James Wilbur, an analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham, said the move in Dow Chemical reflects optimism over its planned deal with Marion Laboratories.  By buying a stake in the drug business, Dow will have "broadened their business and become a higher-growth-rate company," he said.  "A company that was very cyclical is becoming less cyclical because of the addition of the Marion product line," Mr. Wilbur added.  The first step in the transaction will occur soon, when Dow purchases 39% of Marion's shares for $38 each.  Marion was the most active issue on the Big Board, trading 4,521,200 shares to close down 1/8 to 35 1/2.  Theodore Semegran, an analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton, said the Dow-Marion transaction has sparked investments in many other companies that produce widely used chemicals.  This trend was evident yesterday.  Union Carbide climbed 3/4 to 28 1/2, B.F. Goodrich gained 1 5/8 to 62 5/8 and Quantum Chemical added 1 1/8 to 45 1/2.  NL Industries, which submitted a $55-a-share buy-out offer for Georgia Gulf, rose 1 3/8 to 26.  Aluminum Co. of America, a leading advancer among the 30 stocks in the Dow industrials, went up 1 5/8 to 75 1/2.  Among other metals issues, Phelps Dodge advanced 1 1/8 to 70, Reynolds Metals added 7/8 to 58 and Amax rose 1 3/8 to 29 on the Big Board, while Magma Copper added 1/4 to 7 1/8 in American Stock Exchange trading.  Wellman, recycler and producer of plastics, rose 1 1/2 to 29 3/8.  Among stocks rising on takeover talk, International Minerals & Chemical jumped 4 7/8 to 54 amid speculation that the company may become the target of a takeover offer from Britain's Wellcome PLC.  Oil field-services stocks rallied after Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. reaffirmed its buy recommendations on Dresser Industries, which advanced 1 1/8 to 46, and Kaneb Services, which rose 3/8 to 4 1/2.  The firm said prospects for increased U.S. oil drilling appear to be favorable.  Rowan Cos., the group's most active issue, climbed 3/4 to 9 3/8 in Big Board composite trading of 1.7 million shares.  Halliburton rose 1 3/4 to 38 1/8, Schlumberger rose 2 3/8 to 44, McDermott International added 1 1/8 to 22 7/8, Baker Hughes gained 1 1/8 to 21, Parker Drilling went up 3/8 to 7 1/4 and Helmerich & Payne added 1 1/8 to 29 7/8.  Phillips Petroleum gained 1 7/8 to 25 1/4 as 2.2 million shares were traded.  Oppenheimer & Co. repeated a buy recommendation on the stock, citing rapid improvement in Phillips' financial picture.  Analyst William D. Hyler placed the company's asset value at "close to" $50 a share.  Tesoro Petroleum climbed 1 1/4 to 10 7/8.  Harken Energy offered to buy the company for $11.75 a share and said it has obtained the necessary financing.  Elsewhere on the takeover front, Holiday soared 7 7/8 to 77.  Montgomery Securities said the stock would be valued at $95 to $100 a share if the company restructures by spinning off its hotel and gambling businesses.  Also, there were rumors that someone soon would disclose owning more than 5% of Holiday's common shares -- a possible prelude to an acquisition offer.  Maytag gained 3/4 to 25 on 3.2 million shares.  Activity in the stock has been heavier than usual since last Friday; both analysts and traders attribute the high volume to takeover speculation.  Another active issue, American Family, dropped 5/8 to 17 3/4 after denying speculation that a Japanese company would make an bid.  More than 1.5 million shares changed hands; the stock traded as high as 19 1/8 before the company said the rumors were unfounded.  Genentech gained 1 3/4 to 19 1/4.  The company said it launched human clinical trials of a second version of CD4, a drug designed to treat acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Sysco added 1 5/8 to 53 1/8.  The company reported earnings of 70 cents a share for the June quarter, on the upper end of analysts' expectations.  Armco, which lost a key piece of equipment in a fire at its steel plant in Ashland, Ky., went down 1/4 to 12 1/2.  The company said it hasn't yet determined the costs of the damage.  The American Stock Exchange Index gained 1.84 to 377.70.  Volume totaled 14,280,000 shares.  B.A.T Industries added 1/2 to 14 1-16 on composite volume of 2.2 million shares.  Hoylake Investments, its hostile bidder, said it agreed to a conditional sale of the company's Farmers Group subsidiary for $4.5 billion to Axa Midi Assurances, a French insurance firm.  Wang Laboratories Class B rose 1/4 to 6 1/4 on 1.1 million shares.  As expected, the company named Richard W. Miller, a former executive at General Electric, as its president and chief operating officer.  MSA Realty went up 5/8 to 10 1/8.  The company, which posted a second-quarter loss, said it will seek prospective buyers for its assets.  Money Market Deposits-a 6.24%  Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.05%  Six-month Certificates-a 8.03%  One-year Certificates-a 8.02%  Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.94%  Five-Year Certificates-a 7.93%  U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  Canadian Environment Minister Lucien Bouchard said the government plans to ban exports of polychlorinated biphenyls or PCBs.  The decision comes after Canadian shipments of PCB-contaminated waste were turned away by British dockworkers two weeks ago.  The cargo came from a burned-out storage warehouse in Quebec that the province had planned to dispose of at a ReChem International Ltd. incineration plant in Britain.  "In the next week or so, there will not be any more exports out of the country," Mr. Bouchard said.  He said the government also will look at ways to prevent private companies from exporting PCBs.  The first of two cargoes of PCB waste from the warehouse fire turned back from Britain was to arrive in Baie Comeau, Quebec, late last night, three days earlier than expected.  Baie Comeau residents who oppose the storage of the waste at a site outside the town were gathering last night for a rally.  Taken by surprise by the early arrival of the ship, some residents were reported to be preparing to try to block the unloading of the PCB waste.  Wednesday, August 23, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 10 1/2% high, 9 1/16% low, 10 1/4% near closing bid, 10 1/2% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10 1/4%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.775% 60 days; 8.675% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.29% three months; 8.25% six months; 8.22% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.63% 60 days; 8.58% 90 days; 8.52% 120 days; 8.45% 150 days; 8.37% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9 1/16% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 9% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 21, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.99% 13 weeks; 7.85% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.29%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.18%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.15%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.15%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  FICTION  @ LAST WEEKS  @ WEEK ON LIST  @ 1 Polar Star  @ by Martin Cruz Smith  @ (Random House, $19.95) 2 8  @ 2 The Russia House  @ by John le Carre (Knopf, $19.95) 1 12  @ 3 Red Phoenix  @ by Larry Bond (Warner, $19.95) 3 14  @ 4 Blessings  @ by Belva Plain (Delacorte, $19.95) 4 4  @ 5 While My Pretty One Sleeps  @ by Mary Higgings Clark  @ (Simon & Schuster, $19.95) 6 16  @ 6 The Joy Luck Club  @ By Amy Tan (Putnam, $18.95) 5 21  @ 7 A Knight in Shining Armor  @ by Jude Deveraux  @ (Pocket Books, $17.95) 7 2  @ 8 Win, Lose or Die  @ by John Gardner (Putnam, $13.95) 8 2  @ 9 The Temple of My Familiar  @ by Alice Walker  @ (Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, $19.95) 9 16  @ 10 Journey  @ by James Michener  @ (Random House, $16.95) 10 6  @ NONFICTION  @ 1 It's Always Something  @ by Gilda Radner  @ (Simon & Schuster, $18.95) 1 12  @ 2 All I Really Need to Know I  @ Learned in Kindergarten  @ by Robert Fulghum  @ (Villard Books, $15.95) 2 42  @ 3 A Woman Named Jackie  @ by C. David Heymann  @ (Lyle Stuart/Carol Publishing  @ Group, $21.95) 3 16  @ 4 A Brief History of Time  @ by Steven Hawking (Bantam, $18.95) 4 70  @ 5 Wealth Without Risk  @ by Charles Givens  @ (Simon & Schuster, $19.95) 5 25  @ 6 From Beirut to Jerusalem  @ by Thomas Friedman  @ (Farrar, Straus & Giroux, $19.95) 6 4  @ 7 The Good Times  @ by Russell Baker (Morrow, $19.95) 8 13  @ 8 The 8-Week Cholesterol Cure  @ by Robert Kowalski  @ (Harper & Row, $17.95) 11 99  @ 9 Toxic Parents  @ by Dr. Susan Forward with  @ Craig Buck (Bantam, $18.95) 7 2  @ 10 The T-Factor Diet  @ by Martin Katahn (Norton, $18.95) 10 16  @ Compiled by Publishers Weekly from data from large-city bookstores, bookstore chains and local bestseller lists across the U.S. Copyright 1989 by Reed Publishing USA.  Broadbeach Associates Inc. said it is willing to reconsider the terms of its $62-a-share, or $89 million, bid for McGill Manufacturing Co. if McGill can demonstrate that additional values exist.  However, Broadbeach said it would explore all of its options if McGill continues to ignore its proposal and refuses to meet with its representatives.  In a letter to McGill's chairman, the Los Angeles-based investment and securities firm said it was "disappointed" that its proposal had been rebuffed and reiterated its desire to conclude a friendly acquisition.  "In the event you are able to demonstrate to us that such additional values exist, we would be willing to reconsider the terms of our proposal, including price," the letter said.  Broadbeach holds a 7% stake in McGill, a ball-bearing concern based in Valparaiso, Ind.  McGill officials couldn't immediately be reached for comment.  Air-safety investigators urged the Federal Aviation Administration to take stronger action to prevent Boeing Co. 747 cargo doors from tearing off in flight.  Recommendations by the National Transportation Safety Board were issued yesterday as the board continued to investigate a Feb. 24 accident near Hawaii involving a United Airlines 747.  The aircraft lost a right forward lower cargo door and part of its fuselage.  Nine people were killed when they were swept out of the plane, and 38 were injured.  A week later, the FAA ordered airlines to reinforce latch mechanisms of 747 cargo doors, speeding up the timetable of an earlier agency directive issued July 1, 1988.  United had already said it would accelerate its efforts on its 747s immediately after the accident.  United, a unit of UAL Corp., later said in a Safety Board hearing that it had failed to inspect the cargo door on the accident plane after major repairs on Dec. 23, 1988.  The board hasn't yet determined the cause of the accident.  But it said in its letter to the FAA yesterday that evidence suggests that the cargo door opened in flight, causing the damage, and that the door wasn't latched properly or became unlatched after takeoff.  The board said that even with reinforced latching mechanisms ordered by the FAA, other "unpredicted failures" could occur, such as malfunctions of the manual or electrical door-drive units, which could force open a locked latch.  It recommended that the FAA require using certain devices on 747 cargo doors that would prevent the door-drive units from defeating the latch locks, and the installation of indicator lights that would tell ground personnel and flight crews when the latches are secured and locked.  In Seattle, a Boeing spokeswoman said that it seems Boeing has already made all the changes recommended yesterday by the Safety Board.  "As far as we can interpret, we're already in compliance."  An FAA spokesman said the agency has already begun a study of the older cargo doors to ensure that they meet the FAA's "current safety expectations."  This includes a warning system that would alert flight crews when cargo doors aren't properly closed or locked, he said.  The FAA will give the Safety Board recommendations "high priority," he said.  American Family Corp., a holding company based in Columbus, Ga., said its American Family Broadcast Group Inc. unit agreed in principle to sell KTIV-TV, a station in Sioux City, Iowa, to closely held Quincy Newspapers Inc., a newspaper and television concern in Quincy, Ill.  Terms weren't disclosed, but American Family said the sale of the NBC affiliate, which is the dominant station in the market, would be for cash.  It said the transaction is contingent on a definitive agreement and Federal Communications Commission approval.  Food and Drug Administration investigators are looking into possible brand-name drug manufacturing problems at an Indianapolis plant owned by Eli Lilly & Co.  Disclosure of the FDA's investigation of Lilly comes as the federal agency broadened its separate investigation of the generic drug industry.  Officials of some generic drug companies have admitted to engaging in bribery, submission of false data and other criminal activities to get their drugs on the market ahead of competitors.  Generic drugs are usually less expensive versions of brand-name drugs whose patents have expired.  The FDA said it will begin comprehensive plant investigations at the nation's 20 leading generic-drug makers.  The agency is already looking at 11 generic-drug makers and it said last week that it plans to test the 30 top-selling generic drugs on the market.  FDA officials said the investigation at Lilly centers on manufacturing and record-keeping problems and has not turned up the illegal practices found among the generic-drug manufacturers.  "We're talking about apples and oranges here," an FDA spokesman said in Washington.  A spokesman for Lilly confirmed that FDA officials were conducting an investigation at an Indianapolis plant that makes tablet and capsule products, such as phenobarbital and potassium chloride.  Lilly's spokesman also confirmed that in June the company recalled from its wholesalers a thyroid drug and 11 types of vitamins manufactured at the plant.  He said that the recalls involved a premature loss of the products' potency and that there was no safety hazard involved.  The spokesman said Lilly didn't know whether the FDA inspection was linked to the recalls.  "Pharmaceutical companies including Lilly are frequently reviewed by the FDA with regard to their manufacturing processes," said a Lilly spokesman.  "Lilly is now undergoing such a review."  People familiar with the FDA investigation of Lilly said it was triggered by the company's June recall of its products.  On June 22 Lilly recalled a tablet form of thyroid medication.  On June 30 the company recalled 11 vitamin products.  The FDA sources said that although the agency usually sends its inspectors to plants when there is a recall, the Lilly investigation wasn't being considered routine.  The sources said the recalled products could turn out to be an indicator of more widespread manufacturing problems at the company.  All the products were recalled at the wholesale level.  "These are relatively small product lines for us," said Lilly's spokesman.  He said the vitamins that were recalled included a B-complex vitamin and two multi vitamins, Mi-Cebrin and Mi-Cebrin T.  All the recalled products are sold either under the Lilly or Dista name.  Dista is a Lilly brand name.  Lilly's spokesman said the FDA investigation had been under way at the Indianapolis plant for a number of weeks.  The investigators have focused on Lilly's documentation and validation procedures for its drugs, the spokesman said.  Investigators haven't told the company when the investigation would be completed.  Meanwhile, a group of California physicians, joined by a University of Washington pharmacy professor and a pharmacologist from the University of California at Los Angeles, petitioned the FDA to hold a hearing on the safety and effectiveness of generic drugs.  They also requested a moratorium on drug approvals until there is a review of all generics on the market.  The FDA said it plans to withdraw three drug approvals from Par Pharmaceutical Inc. of Spring Valley, N.Y., and 25 drug approvals from Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc. of Springfield Gardens, N.Y., on the ground that the companies made "untrue statements" in seeking FDA clearance to market the generic products.  Both companies have already voluntarily recalled or suspended production of the drugs involved.  Richard W. Miller, a veteran of RCA Corp. and General Electric Co. but a novice to the computer industry, was named president and chief operating officer at Wang Laboratories Inc.  Mr. Miller, 48 years old, succeeds Frederick A. Wang, who was forced out of the job by his father, An Wang, the company's founder, chairman and chief executive officer.  The ouster came in the wake of a $424.3 million loss for the year ended June 30.  Although Mr. Miller said in an interview he wasn't promised the chief executive slot, the appointment makes him heir apparent to An Wang, who is 69 years old and working half-time as he recovers from surgery for cancer of the esophagus.  Mr. Miller said he will join Wang's board.  Investors welcomed the announcement, which was expected, as a sign that the troubled Lowell, Mass.-based computer maker is stabilizing.  In American Stock Exchange trading, Wang class B stock rose 25 cents to $6.25 a share on heavy volume of 1.1 million shares.  Mr. Miller said that his first mission is to address the company's financial problems, which he said are "manageable."  He said the company needs to cut costs more, although he declined to discuss potential further layoffs.  He said he wasn't prepared to discuss strategic changes but promised to improve Wang's reputation for service.  Mr. Miller said he has been meeting with Wang bankers, customers and executives for the past 10 days.  He said "we're close to having" one of several financial institutions provide $175 million in financing, either by buying assets or making an equity investment or a combination.  Getting bank permission to raise those funds was a key provision of Wang's negotiation of a restructured $575 million bank loan package announced this week.  The additional funds are needed because Wang is expected to continue to incur operating losses for the next two quarters.  Although the Wang family has said it would welcome a minority investment by another company, Mr. Miller said the interest he is aware of comes from financial institutions.  He said "Dr.  Wang and I certainly don't see (a takeover) in the cards."  The Wang family controls the company through its 80% holding of Class C stock and elects a majority of the board.  Some analysts had speculated that Wang's problems have become so severe that the Wang family might be willing to sell the company.  However, Mr. Miller's appointment "should lessen the likelihood of a business combination," said Barry Willman, a Sanford C. Bernstein & Co. analyst who follows Wang.  Mr. Miller has the doubly difficult job of adapting to Wang, a company that hasn't brought in a high-level executive from the outside in at least a decade, and adapting to the computer industry.  Thomas Willmott, an analyst with Aberdeen Group, Boston, noted that Apple Computer Inc. thrived under John Sculley, a soft drink executive, but under Thomas Vanderslice, a former GE and GTE Corp. executive, Apollo Computer Inc. lost its market leadership and eventually was acquired.  Mr. Willmott said Mr. Miller "sounds like a builder -- not someone who wants to slash and burn -- and that's an optimum profile."  Mr. Willmott added that despite shrinking market share, Wang still has a large business in the office automation and minicomputer fields and "this fellow has an opportunity to rebuild."  Louis Cabot, chairman of the Brookings Institution and head of the Wang directors' search committee said the committee liked the fact that Mr. Miller had both financial experience in helping restructure the bankrupt Penn Central Co., and operating and deal-making experience in RCA and GE's consumer electronics operations.  He added, "We were particularly eager to check out his chemistry with Dr. Wang.  He was very strong for him from the first time he met him."  In a prepared statement, Mr. Wang indicated he is willing to grant Mr. Miller far more authority than he gave his son.  "I have great confidence in the ability of Rick Miller to assume total control of the operations of Wang Laboratories," Mr. Wang said.  "He will have my full support and that of the board of directors in resolving the company's current situation and restoring it to profitability."  Mr. Miller declined to disclose his compensation.  He said his long-term reward will be tied to improving the company's stock price.  ---  Amanda Bennett in New York contributed to this article.  Chips & Technologies Inc. said it acquired all of the assets of Scientific Micro Systems Inc. for $16 million and then sold some of those assets to Televideo Systems Inc., Sunnyvale, Calif., for $7 million.  Chips & Technologies, San Jose, Calif., kept the part of Scientific Micro specializing in semiconductor products used in the control of floppy and hard-disk drives, both key computer parts, a spokesman said.  Scientific Micro, of Mountain View, Calif., offered about 35 sets of chips used in drives, he said.  About a year ago, Chips & Technologies formed a group to develop sets of chips used in controlling drives.  The company, which has introduced several such products on its own, plans to retain Scientific Micro's 250 workers.  Socanav Inc. said Steinberg Inc. holders tendered 99.9% of their common shares and 96.7% of their nonvoting Class A shares in Socanav's 1.33 billion Canadian dollar (US$1.13 billion) offer for Steinberg by Tuesday's original expiration date.  Socanav, a small Montreal-based shipping concern, has extended the offer to Sept. 6.  After it ends, Socanav will be able to buy out any remaining Steinberg holders at the offering price because it holds more than 90% of each class of Steinberg shares.  Steinberg is a Montreal-based food retailing and real estate concern.  Separately, Steinberg's Quebec union said that because Socanav hasn't offered certain guarantees it wants, it will begin enforcing its contract to the letter.  The union said it will seek to cancel a series of wage rollbacks negotiated a year ago.  The union supported Oxdon Investments Inc., the loser in the bidding for Steinberg.  Mercantile Bankshares Corp., Baltimore, said it agreed in principle to acquire Baltimore Trust Co. in an exchange of stock valued at about $52 million.  Under the agreement, subject to approval by regulatory agencies and holders of both companies, Baltimore Trust holders would receive between 46.7 and 56.3 shares of Mercantile Bankshares common for each common share of Baltimore Trust owned.  Baltimore Trust has 20,000 shares outstanding.  If those shares were exchanged for Mercantile Bankshares stock, the merged company would have about 14 million shares outstanding.  The Nasdaq Composite Index jumped 3.32 in active trading, as investors snapped up shares of over-the-counter market technology stocks, such as Stratus Computer, Sun Microsystems and Intel.  The Nasdaq 100 Index, which includes the OTC market's largest technology issues, rose 4.21 to 434.98.  The group's strength helped push the Nasdaq Composite Index up 0.7% to 461.68 on turnover of 139.7 million shares.  By comparison, the New York Stock Exchange Composite posted a 0.9% gain.  Much of the buying was from bargain hunters, traders said.  "Value-conscious buyers are realizing that technology is still a place to be," said Ralph Costanza, head of the OTC trading department at Smith Barney, Harris Upham.  "When {technology stocks} get to cheap levels, and {investors} are convinced that the market isn't due for a collapse, they step in to buy," he said.  While Mr. Costanza said there are still no clear trends in the OTC market, he hopes that technology stocks will return to lead the market higher in the fourth quarter.  The market's strength surprised Tony Cecin, managing director of OTC trading at Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood in Minneapolis, who said he expected more selling, in light of the market's recent weakness.  But Mr. Cecin said the strength bodes well for all OTC stocks.  "You're seeing a continuation of money leaving the big-cap stocks and going into small-cap stocks," Mr. Cecin said.  In the technology group, Intel added 1 to 30 1/4, Apple Computer gained 7/8 to 43 3/4, and Seagate Technology advanced 3/8 to 11 7/8.  Stratus Computer gained 2 3/4 to 33 1/4 on 455,000 shares amid rumors that International Business Machines might be interested in acquiring the company, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  The rumors aren't new.  IBM is Stratus Computer's largest customer, accounting for about 30% of revenue, and there has been speculation in the past that IBM might make a bid for the company.  A Stratus spokesman declined to comment on the speculation.  Meanwhile, Stratus Computer's competitor Pyramid Technology gained 1/2 to 13 3/4.  Sun Microsystems gained 3/4 to 16 on 1.4 million shares.  Sun Microsystems of Canada, a unit of the Mountain View, Calif., concern, and Kinburn Technology, a unit of Kinburn Corp. of Ottawa, said they signed an agreement with a projected value of $80 million over three years, to enhance distribution of Sun products world-wide.  Also, Needham & Co. recommended Sun Microsystems and said that it believes "the worst news is out" on the maker of computer workstations and that its stock will rise from its current price level.  The company also said it expects high sales volume for Sun's new Sparc workstation, which it said has low production costs.  Sun's stock has been battered lately and the company recently reported a fiscal fourth-quarter loss of $20.3 million, compared with a $25.3 million profit in the year-earlier quarter.  The company also has said that a return to profitability in its first quarter ending Sept. 30 can't be guaranteed.  Microsoft added 7/8 to the 2 1/4-point gain it posted on Tuesday, closing at 59 1/4.  Wyse Technology said it would make Microsoft operating system software available for its IBM-compatible personal computers.  All of the Nasdaq industry groups advanced.  The largest financial stocks, as measured by the Nasdaq Financial Index, rose 2.40 to 459.37.  Improved earnings helped Offshore Logistics climb onto the most-active list.  The stock added 5/8 to 8 1/4 on volume of more than 1.3 million shares.  Late Tuesday, the company reported operating profit of 17 cents a share for its fourth quarter ended June 30.  The company earned seven cents a share in the year-earlier quarter.  Morrison was one of the Nasdaq's biggest percentage losers, dropping 2 7/8 to 28 3/8.  The operator of public cafeterias and specialty restaurants blamed problems in the family-dining division for disappointing earnings it expects to report for its fiscal first quarter.  The company said it expects earnings in the quarter ending Sept. 2 to be flat with the 35 cents a share in earnings from continuing operations it reported in the year-earlier quarter.  The company reported net income of $6.6 million, or 37 cents a share, in the 1988 quarter.  Another restaurant operator, Cracker Barrel Old Country Store, also fell.  The stock lost 1 1/4 to 25 3/4.  J&J Snack Foods gained 3/4 to 15 1/2, rebounding from a sharp sell-off on Tuesday.  The Professional Investor Report said that the company told one analyst that its business in the first five weeks of the current quarter has been better than expected.  Live Entertainment regained some ground it lost since the fatal shooting of the company's chairman and his wife earlier this week.  Shares of the distributor of prerecorded music rose 5/8 to 17 5/8 on 760,000 shares.  The stock has lost 16.7% since the company disclosed the death of Jose E. Menendez and his wife at their home in Beverly Hills, Calif.  DDI Pharmaceuticals added 3/8, or about 14%, to 3.  The company reported net income of seven cents a share for the latest second quarter, up from last year's two cents a share.  A nearly flat third quarter sent Nordson's stock price down 3 1/4 to 50.  The company, which makes equipment that applies industrial coatings and adhesives, reported net income of 89 cents a share in the quarter ended July 30, compared with 88 cents a share a year earlier.  The Nasdaq Insurance Index gained 0.32 to 532.83.  But some large insurance issues lost ground.  First Executive dropped 3/8 to 11 3/4, and Safeco dropped 1/8 to 33 3/8.  Just when it appeared that interest rates had nowhere to go but up, they fell, leaving some analysts clearly perplexed.  The big switch came at yesterday's government note auction, which drew stronger-than-expected demand.  The Treasury sold $7.8 billion of five-year, two-month notes at an average yield of 8.26%.  That was lower than the 8.72% average rate at the previous five-year note auction in May and lower than economists and bond traders had expected.  "The bidding was much stronger than anticipated," said Michael J. Kugler, trading manager at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "There were more players in this auction, so there was very good demand."  That was a surprise to many bond dealers who had bet in recent days that the auction would garner only mild support.  They worried that the Treasury's huge borrowing needs would drive up interest rates.  Not only must the market absorb a total of $41 billion of new Treasury bonds and bills this week, but the market still is digesting $57 billion of securities that were auctioned in the second week of August.  Today, the government will sell $9.25 billion of oneyear Treasury bills.  The auction's results were clearly unexpected.  "The fact that the market did better caused some confusion," said F. Ward McCarthy, a managing director at Stone & McCarthy Research Associates, Princeton, N.J.  He said there was so much bearish sentiment ahead of the auction that it might have encouraged speculators to go against the grain.  "Sometimes the market sentiment gets so negative that the risk of taking a contrary view is worth considering.  Call it bottom-fishing," he said.  Traders were confounded by the auction results because many traditional buyers -- domestic money managers, individual investors and Japanese institutions -- showed little interest in participating in yesterday's auction.  Picking up the slack, they contend, was a group of arbitragers and several major investors from Europe and the Middle East.  "Investors from Saudi Arabia were buying bonds" as a way to invest in the dollar, which rose yesterday, Mr. McCarthy said.  Prices of long-term Treasury bonds were up about 1/2 point for most of the day, then jumped shortly after the auction results were announced.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond ended nearly one point higher, or about $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  Yesterday's rally erased the losses on Monday and Tuesday.  Late yesterday, the yield on the new five-year notes fell to 8.21% in when-issued trading.  Trading was extremely light throughout the day, before and after the auction.  That led to speculation that the rally reflected a spurt of buying among a small group of dealers who were rushing to cover short positions.  In a short sale, dealers sell borrowed securities and later seek to make a profit by buying the securities back at a lower price to replace what was borrowed.  Yesterday, that strategy proved to be costly.  "The auction went pretty well, and the markets breathed a sigh of relief now that we've gotten through another big block of supply" of Treasury securities, said Joel Kazis, a managing director and head of U.S. government securities trading at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Today's sale of new one-year Treasury bills also is likely to attract strong buying, Mr. Kazis said.  "I don't see any problems with the year bill," he said.  "There are lots of buyers out there for it."  Meanwhile, mortgage-backed bond prices also rose even though the nation's savings and loan associations continued to liquidate large amounts of the securities.  Dealers said New West Federal Savings & Loan Association sold $1 billion of mortgage securities in the early afternoon.  On Tuesday, analysts estimated that mortgage securities sales by thrifts approached $500 million, and on Monday Gibraltar Savings sold about $900 million.  Short-term rates were mixed.  Rates on U.S. Treasury bills fell yesterday, but the federal funds rate rose.  And U.S. Trust Co. raised its broker loan rate to 10 1/4% from 10%.  That was the first increase since late February in its broker loan rate, which is the rate banks charge brokers and dealers on overnight loans secured by marketable securities.  Schuyler Grant, senior vice president at U.S. Trust, said the broker loan rate increase largely reflected yesterday's rise in the rate on federal funds, or overnight loans between banks.  Traders attributed the higher funds rate to short-term technical pressures stemming from the fact that yesterday was the final day of a two-week period in which banks must settle their reserve positions with the Federal Reserve.  Other banks didn't match the move.  For example, Bankers Trust Co. left its broker loan rate unchanged at 9 3/4%.  That's where it's been since July 31, when Bankers Trust cut it from 10%.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities were between 1/4 and one point higher yesterday in light trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of about 99 15/32 to yield 8.16%, compared with Tuesday's price of 98 17/32 to yield about 8.25%.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at about 98 16/32 to yield 8.2%, compared with Tuesday's price of 97 28/32 to yield 8.3%.  Short-term rates were lower.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted at 8.01% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.27%, while six-month Treasury bills were quoted at 7.88% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.30%.  Here are details of yesterday's auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ 5-year 2-month notes  @ Applications ........................ $26,149,567,000  @ Accepted bids ....................... $7,799,767,000  @ Accepted at low price ............... 60%  @ Accepted noncompetitively ........... $341,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) ................ 99.893 (8.26%)  @ High price (Rate) ................... 99.976 (8.24%)  @ Low price (Rate) .................... 99.893 (8.26%)  @ Interest rate ....................... 8.25%  The five-year two-month notes are dated Sept. 1 and mature Nov. 15, 1994.  Corporate Issues  Corporates ended between 1/4 and 3/4 point higher.  A $300 million bond offering by the Inter-American Development Bank late in the day graced an otherwise quiet corporate new issue market.  The 20-year issue offers investors the option to put the bonds back to the bank either in the 10th year or in the 15th year.  The bonds were priced to yield 8.465%.  In other new issue market news, more than a dozen Wall Street firms are readying financing proposals for the Tennessee Valley Authority's huge refinancing of high-coupon government debt.  The TVA will assess the proposals, which are due today, and expects to decide within the next two weeks if it will tap the public market with more than $7 billion in mostly long-dated bonds.  If the TVA does proceed with its plans, a $1 billion issue could come to market within the next month, according to Robert Yates, the power authority's treasurer.  This would mark TVA's return to the public debt market after a 15-year hiatus.  Complicating TVA's decision to proceed with the public funding is that it risks losing access to government financing via the Federal Financing Bank, a unit of the Treasury that has bankrolled TVA since 1974.  The Federal Financing Bank's policy has traditionally been to disallow borrowers to tap both the government and public market for funds.  The Treasury unit also doesn't lend funds for refinancing its higher-coupon debt.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were unchanged to 3/8 point firmer late yesterday.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was at 97 5/8 bid, up 1/4 on the day.  The yield was 7.39%, down 0.02 percentage point from Tuesday.  The short end of the market will get an injection of supply today, with underwriters gearing up to bid for $450 million of Texas tax and revenue anticipation notes.  Meanwhile, uncertainty continued to hold sway in the market for Washington Public Power Supply System debt.  WPPSS earlier this week postponed pricing of a $450 million refunding issue until after Labor Day because of concerns raised by Chemical Bank, trustee for projects 4 and 5 bondholders.  Projects 4 and 5 bonds have been posting price gains since the delay in the refunding was announced.  Double-digit coupon projects 4 and 5 bonds were at about 13 bid late in the day, according to one broker, up about 1/2 point.  Foreign Bonds  British government bonds ended sharply lower on an unexpectedly sharp widening of Britain's July trade deficit.  The current account deficit was #2.06 billion ($3.27 billion), compared with a revised June gap of #1.52 billion.  Britain's July merchandise trade deficit was #2.46 billion on a seasonally adjusted basis, vs. a revised June gap of #1.92 billion.  Among benchmark issues, Britain's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 fell 3/4 point to 115 11/32 to yield 9.67%, while the Treasury's 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 7/32 to 99 30/32 to yield 11.74%.  The Japanese government bond market retreated for the second day in a row.  Traders said firm U.S. interest rates may be starting to take a toll on the market, although its weakness isn't expected to seriously impede Thursday's sale of Japan's new 10-year bonds.  Japan's Finance Ministry Wednesday proposed a 4.9% coupon for the new issue, according to analysts.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 ended at a price of 97.17 and a yield of about 5.07%.  That yield was up from 5.04% Tuesday.  West German government bonds ended slightly firmer.  Bond dealers, however, said most buyers were dealers and that overall sentiment in the market remained bearish.  "No one trusts this rally," one trader said.  "We follow {U.S.} Treasurys, and there is too much paper there for prices to rise."  Bonn's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 rose to 99.75 from 99.70 Tuesday.  The yield fell to 6.78% from 6.79%.  The government's 6 3/4% notes due 1994 rose 0.025 point to 99.625, where it yielded 6.83%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities gained 12/32 to 13/32 point despite the big reported sale by New West.  Dealers said New West sold $1 billion of Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities.  New West, a so-called bad bank formed with troubled assets of failed American Savings & Loan Association, once the largest thrift in the U.S., held an estimated $13 billion of mortgage securities before its liquidation program began about a month ago.  Traders estimated that as much as half of that portfolio has been sold.  Officials at Ranieri Wilson & Co., which is managing the New West liquidation program, were unavailable for comment.  Traders said the reported sale by New West didn't badly hurt the market because Wall Street firms were bracing for even more selling by thrifts and commercial banks that never materialized.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery rose 13/32 to 96 26/32.  Freddie Mac 9% securities rose 13/32 to 95 26/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% securities were yielding 9.59% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the 10-year Treasury note widened 0.01 percentage point to 1.38.  The auto industry's second-half strength continued in mid-August, as sales of domestic-made vehicles rose 1.8% from the strong year-earlier results.  The biggest gains came from the increasing number of Japanese cars being built in the U.S.  Analysts attributed the strength in sales to heavy price discounting and to a "mini-rush" to buy before the sharply higher prices on 1990-model vehicles take effect Oct. 1.  In addition, some cited fundamental economic factors, specifically a firming of consumer confidence and less anxiety about a possible economic downturn.  Nonetheless, analysts and auto makers alike expect sales to drop this fall when the bargains on 1989-model vehicles begin to dry up.  U.S. auto makers reported sales of 274,320 cars, vans and trucks in the Aug. 11-20 period, compared to sales of 303,292 vehicles achieved last year.  While the absolute sales volume is less than last year, the latest period included only eight selling days compared with nine a year ago.  The 1.8% gain in sales reflects the daily selling rate.  Perhaps more impressively, sales of cars alone hit the second-highest rate for any 10-day period this year, on a seasonally adjusted basis.  The seasonally adjusted sales pace of 8.6 million vehicles for mid-August is based on a U.S. Commerce Department formula; it was exceeded only by the rate of 8.9 million cars in late January.  In all, Americans purchased 178,414 North American-made cars during the eight days in mid-August, a 4% increase on a daily basis from the 193,055 cars purchased during the nine-day period last year.  "The strength that we're seeing now is coming at the expense of car sales in the fall," said Michael Luckey, who heads a consulting concern that bears his name.  He and other analysts said the underlying economic fundamentals aren't strong enough to support the recent brisk sales pace.  They also said consumers are buying now to avoid the steepest price increases of recent years, which are anticipated when new models are introduced this fall.  Incentives that range between $1,000 and $2,000 per vehicle also have encouraged consumers to buy now, analysts said, because the incentives that may appear later in the fall mightn't be as attractive.  Others point to more fervent consumer confidence and pent-up demand.  "A lot of people stayed out of the market because of inflation fears," said Robert Rohrman, who owns a string of 12 dealerships in the Midwest.  "Now that the economic news is so good, I think they decided that maybe we're not going to have a recession for another couple of years."  Whatever caused the sales strength, the big winners were the Japanese.  They sold 38% more cars built in their U.S. and Canadian factories than they did last year in mid-August.  Among the Big Three auto makers, only Ford Motor Co. reported higher sales of North American-made cars.  The No. 2 auto maker said it sold 55,020 cars in the period, 2.3% higher than the 60,184 reported in the prior year.  General Motors Corp. reported a slight drop in car sales to 78,013, from 88,394 in the year ago period.  Chrysler Corp. experienced a 3.7% decline in car sales, to 24,490, from 28,595.  Meanwhile, GM was the only Big Three auto maker to report higher truck sales.  The No. 1 auto maker reported a 4.3% increase in truck sales, while Ford reported a 10.7% decline, and Chrysler reported that its truck sales were off a slight 1.2% in the period.  Among other auto makers, Honda Motor Co. continued its strong gains of recent weeks, by posting an 18.3% car sales gain.  Nissan Motor Corp. experienced a steep 19% car sales decline, but had a slight truck sales gain.  Total vehicle sales for all eight domestic auto makers, including imported vehicles sold by the Big Three, increased 1.1% to 284,085 cars and trucks from 316,082.  ---  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 x-%  @ Aug 11-20 Aug 11-20 Chg.  @ GM total vehicles ........... 125,906 139,277 + 1.7  @ Domestic car .............. 78,013 88,394 - 0.7  @ Imported car .............. 5,062 4,919 + 15.8  @ Total car ............... 83,075 93,313 + 0.2  @ Domestic truck ............ 42,618 45,964 + 4.3  @ Imported truck ............ 213 0 d  @ Total truck ............. 42,831 45,964 + 4.8  @ FORD total vehicles ......... 87,137 101,604 - 3.5  @ Domestic car .............. 55,020 60,184 + 2.8  @ Imported car .............. 1,523 2,868 - 40.3  @ Total car ............... 56,543 63,052 + 0.9  @ Domestic truck ............ 30,594 38,552 - 10.7  @ CHRYSLER total veh .......... 46,319 55,073 - 5.4  @ Domestic car .............. 24,490 28,595 - 3.7  @ Imported car .............. 2,059 3,498 - 33.8  @ Total car ............... 26,549 32,093 - 6.9  @ Domestic truck ............ 18,862 21,475 - 1.2  @ Imported truck ............ 908 1,505 - 32.1  @ Total truck ............. 19,770 22,980 - 3.2  @ NISSAN total vehicles ...... 6,843 8,428 - 8.7  @ Domestic car .............. 3,011 4,182 - 19.0  @ Domestic truck ............ 3,832 4,246 + 1.5  @ HONDA domestic car .......... 9,732 9,256 + 18.3  @ TOYOTA domestic car ......... 6,300 1,429 +396.0  @ MAZDA domestic car .......... 942 1,015 + 4.4  @ MITSUBISHI-c ................ 906 0 d  @ Total cars .................. 187,058 204,340 + 3.0  @ Domestic .................. 178,414 193,055 + 4.0  @ Imported .................. 8,644 11,285 - 13.8  @ Total trucks ................ 97,027 111,742 - 2.3  @ Domestic .................. 95,906 110,237 - 2.1  @ Imported .................. 1,121 1,505 - 16.2  @ Total domestic veh .......... 274,320 303,292 + 1.8  @ Total vehicles ............ 284,085 316,082 + 1.1  a-Totals include only vehicle sales reported in the period.  c-Domestic car  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%.  x-There were 8 selling days in the most recent period and 9 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  Heine Securities Corp., an investment advisory firm based in Short Hills, N.J., said it owns 1,079,700 shares, or 5.6%, of Jerrico Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Heine said the purchases were for investment purposes.  Officials at Jerrico, a franchiser, owner and operator of restaurants based in Lexington, Ky., couldn't be reached.  Jerrico closed yesterday at $24.625, up 25 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  Heine's filing said its most recent purchases occurred between Aug. 7 and Aug. 14, when it bought 808,500 common shares for $24.063 to $24.185 a share.  Northwest Airlines paid a $650,000 civil penalty to the Federal Aviation Administration for violations of safety regulations.  The fine resulted from a special monthlong FAA inspection last year of the airline, a unit of NWA Inc.  The inspection was part of the FAA's National Aviation Safety Inspection Program.  Most other major airlines have undergone a similar in-depth examination of their maintenance practices and flight operations.  The Northwest penalty is in the middle range of FAA fines assessed against carriers in the past.  Eastern Airlines, a unit of Texas Air Corp., Houston, paid the highest fine, $9.5 million, following a 1986 special inspection.  Piedmont Airlines, now part of USAir Group Inc., Washington, D.C., and Delta Air Lines, Atlanta, were fined the least of any carrier to date.  Each paid less than $150,000 in fines.  Northwest said the violations stemmed from record-keeping lapses and some delays in making follow-up inspections of certain repairs done on its Boeing 747 aircraft.  The FAA also cited Northwest for using repair procedures on its 747s that the aircraft's manufacturer, Boeing Co., hadn't approved.  Northwest says Boeing had given verbal, but not written, approval of the procedures used.  The airline said the dispute involved "minor repairs."  In Seattle, a Boeing spokeswoman said she wasn't familiar with the situation and had no immediate comment.  William Slattery, Northwest executive vice president for operations, said that the airline has taken steps to correct the problems and that none of the violations cited "involved the safe operation of Northwest aircraft."  The FAA originally cited Northwest for 139 possible violations, including requiring its pilots to fly beyond the maximum number of hours allowed in a day and deferring repairs of certain nonessential aircraft items.  After "discussions and informal information exchanges" with the company, the FAA later narrowed the number of actual violations to about 10 major issues, Northwest said.  The agency also reduced its proposed fine of $801,000 to $650,000.  Sir James Goldsmith enlisted one of Europe's biggest insurance companies, France's Axa Midi Assurances, to help overcome key obstacles to his #13.35 billion ($21.19 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC.  Axa agreed to acquire Farmers Group Inc., B.A.T's big California insurance unit, for $4.5 billion, if Sir James's bid succeeds.  Axa also plans to invest #600 million for a stake of about 15% in Sir James's bidding consortium Hoylake Investments Ltd. B.A.T paid $5.2 billion for Farmers in 1988.  Axa's investment, which boosts Hoylake's cash resources to about #1.5 billion, gives the Anglo-French financier additional scope for sweetening and adding cash to Hoylake's current all-paper, highly-leveraged bid.  Many B.A.T institutional holders say both are necessary to gain their acceptance for the bid, under which Sir James proposes to sell all of B.A.T's operations except tobacco.  Finding a potential buyer for Farmers is a boost to Sir James's group's efforts to surmount regulatory roadblocks in the U.S. to its bid, which has become mired in U.S. courts.  Hoylake has filed nine lawsuits to take the bid's insurance issues away from U.S. state regulators and put them in federal court.  In a statement, Sir James suggested that a "successful and growing insurance group" would be a better Farmers' owner than "a sprawling tobacco-based conglomerate."  British financier Jacob Rothschild, another backer of Hoylake, added that "we regard this as an immensely important step forward in this whole matter."  Sir James said a Farmers purchase was reviewed by several other insurers, which he declined to disclose.  He said Axa made the best offer through an implicit auction, and added that he doesn't plan to pre-sell any other B.A.T units.  Axa Chairman Claude Bebear said in an interview last night that the fact that "Axa are insurers who want to develop in the insurance business should be viewed sympathetically by insurance commissioners.  This should remove a few worries," he added.  "It shows both Jimmy's and our will to keep Farmers in the insurance business and not do asset-stripping."  Meanwhile, people familiar with Hoylake said the bidding group asked Britain's Takeover Panel yesterday to consider effectively extending the timetable for its bid until the U.S. regulatory issues are resolved.  Insurance regulators in the nine states where Farmers operates declined to comment on Hoylake's agreement with Axa, with most citing the continuing review of Sir James's bid and Hoylake's pending suits against the commissioners.  Axa's Mr. Bebear said it would be "presumptuous" to say he had specific plans for Farmers at this stage, but said he had no plans to change management.  Still, the structure of the transaction could raise some concerns for state regulators.  Though Axa has a full insurance license in 27 states, including seven in which the proposed Farmers' change in control requires approval, it is relatively little-known in the U.S. and isn't a major American property and casualty insurer -- a big line of Farmers' business.  Axa's U.S. unit, Axa America, owns a reinsurance company called Gamma Re that operates in another 16 states.  Axa proposes paying Hoylake $2.25 billion in cash upon completion of the Farmers transaction, and an additional $2.25 billion in loan notes with maturities of two years or longer.  Several state regulators have expressed concern at debt-financed insurance takeovers.  But Mr. Bebear said the structure should satisfy regulators.  Finally, under U.K. takeover rules, Sir James has only until early October to acquire 50% of B.A.T's stock, and then until the end of that month to remove any remaining conditions to his bid.  Axa faces tough time pressure to satisfy the insurance commissioners before the U.K. bid clock expires.  The $4.5 billion price tag is in line with analysts' and institutional estimates for Farmers' value.  B.A.T said Hoylake "is proposing to sell Farmers on the cheap in a forced sale, and B.A.T shareholders would be deprived of its real value and future potential."  But Mr. Bebear said the lower price tag is due in part to new uncertainties in the U.S. insurance business.  B.A.T's institutional holders said Axa's involvement adds credibility to Hoylake's takeover effort.  But they said that Sir James isn't likely to win control of B.A.T unless he substantially sweetens and restructures his bid.  "It clearly makes the proposals much more credible, and I would imagine it would make it easier for Goldsmith to get underwriting for a partial cash offer," because it effectively reduces the amount of needed takeover finance by $4.5 billion, said Andrew Threadgold, chief executive of Postel Investment Management Ltd., which owns about 2% of B.A.T.  However, another big B.A.T holder said the news was neutral for B.A.T shareholders: "It doesn't make what is being offered to us any more attractive."  ---  David J. Jefferson contributed to this article.  Tesoro Petroleum Corp., which rejected one persistent suitor three times in the past year, has received yet another buy-out proposal.  Harken Energy Corp. of Dallas said it submitted a proposal to Tesoro outlining a plan to acquire the San Antonio, Texas, refining concern for $190 million.  Under its plan, Harken said, it also would assume $200 million in Tesoro debt and preferred stock.  Tesoro officials refused to comment on the Harken proposal.  Alan G. Quasha, Harken chairman, said the company is particularly interested in Tesoro's refinery because it would fill a gap in Harken's business.  Harken owns about 800 retail gasoline stations, primarily on the Gulf Coast, as well as a wholesale gasoline operation and some oil and gas producing properties.  Harken would purchase Tesoro's 14 million common shares outstanding and an issue of preferred stock that is convertible into 2.3 million common shares, for $11.75 a common share.  Additionally, Harken would provide $40 million in equity and Metropolitan Life Insurance Co. would remain a holder of about $57 million of Tesoro preferred stock.  Bankers Trust Co. would provide the remainder of the financing for the transaction.  Tesoro rebuffed Pentane Partners Limited Partnership, a New York investment group, in its three attempts to buy Tesoro, claiming among other things that Pentane's financing was shaky.  Harken has secured an option to buy Pentane's 8.6% stake in Tesoro if Harken's proposal is accepted.  Harken doesn't currently own any Tesoro stock.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Tesoro shares closed at $10.875, up $1.25.  In national over-the-counter trading, Harken shares closed at $4.50, up 18.75 cents.  Dunkin' Donuts Inc., Randolph, Mass., reported a decline in fiscal third-quarter earnings because of costs related to its defense against a hostile tender offer from Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd.  Net income for the quarter, ended July 29, was $2.1 million, or 24 cents a share, down about 34% from $3.2 million, or 49 cents a share, the year before.  Revenue rose 3.9% to $30.3 million from $29.2 million.  The latest results include a pretax charge of $2.5 million from professional fees stemming from the takeover battle.  Net in the first nine months fell 23% to $7.6 million, or $1.08 a share, from $9.9 million, or $1.49 a share, a year earlier.  The latest results include a pretax charge of $5.1 million from professional fees and restructuring expenses.  Revenue increased 8.8% to $89.7 million from $82.4 million.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Dunkin' Donuts closed at $37.75, unchanged.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Chemex Pharmaceuticals, public offering of 1.2 million units, each consisting of two common shares and one warrant to purchase one common share via PaineWebber Inc.  RMI Titanium, a partnership owned equally by USX and Quantum Chemical, public offering of 15 million common stock of RMI, 12,750,000 shares via Salomon Brothers Inc., First Boston Corp. and Morgan Stanley & Co and 2,250,000 shares via an international offering by Salomon Brothers International, Credit Suisse First Boston Ltd., and Morgan Stanley International.  Optical Radiation Corp. said it will discontinue operations of its Visionetics Corp. unit, cutting earnings for the year ended July 31 about $5 million, or 75 cents a share.  Optical's president, Richard D. Wood, said the Asuza, Calif., company still expects to post increased earnings for its core businesses on higher revenue.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Optical, which designs and makes optical products for vision care, scientific and industrial applications, closed up $1.875 at $20 on heavy volume.  Visionetics, which had annual revenue of about $5 million, had an operating loss since Optical Radiation acquired it in April 1988.  The Brookfield, Conn.-based unit, which had 55 employees to make automatic optical inspection equipment for the printed circuit board industry, will be closed.  Its equipment inventory, and an undetermined number of employees, will be relocated to Azusa.  In fiscal 1988, Optical Radiation had net income of $8.6 million on revenue of $101.5 million.  Nynex, which many analysts consider the black sheep of the Baby Bells, might be in line for another shearing.  A short-term cloud hangs over the stock as analysts wring their hands: Perhaps the company will reach an expensive labor settlement, signaling that top managers are wimps who can't cut costs.  Or maybe the company's 2 1/2-week-long strike will drag on, eroding Nynex's already unimpressive earnings.  A few analysts, however, praise Nynex for not caving in to its unions.  Its tough bargaining stance "is a good sign, to the extent that management is taking a firmer hand in controlling costs," says Frank Governali of First Boston.  Nynex managers filling in for strikers have accepted the tough-guy attitude, trading the latest wisecrack: "Which holiday will you be taking off?  Thanksgiving or Christmas?"  Nynex shares finished yesterday at 79 3/8, little changed from the 79 5/8 of Friday, Aug. 4, two days before the walkout began.  The bears say Nynex has the worst record of any Baby Bell for controlling costs at its phone company operations.  Second-quarter per-share earnings fell to $1.42 from $1.64, prompting many analysts to lower their full-year estimates.  Mr. Governali, who cut his yearly estimate by 50 cents, to $6.05, figures the bulk of the bad news has passed, but says he suspects it is "still too early to be bottom fishing" for Nynex shares.  Joel Gross of Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette is more enthusiastic.  "The stock is real cheap," he says, Nynex's management "is willing to admit it has problems," and its big capital projects to upgrade its network are nearly behind it.  Mr. Gross says he will be happy if the company comes up with a reasonable wage settlement, say, a total of 11% to 12% over three years, roughly in line with other Bells' agreements.  But "if the strike goes on for weeks or months," he says he might cool to the stock.  Robert Morris of Goldman Sachs says the strike shouldn't have any effect on 1989 earnings if it ends by Oct. 1.  While Nynex isn't for an investor with a six-month horizon, it offers a "longer-term opportunity," he says.  At the heart of the strike is Nynex's effort to shift some health-care costs to workers.  The Communications Workers of America believed it had neatly sidestepped the issue three years ago, when it agreed to a contract provision that postponed until this summer employee contributions to health care.  The union believed that the cost-sharing wouldn't go into effect until the contract expired on Aug. 5, and that the provision thus was moot.  Nynex argued successfully in court that the cost-sharing mechanism -- it ended up as a $10.27 weekly deduction from each union-represented employee's pay -- went into effect July 1.  The matter is on appeal.  Union members were angered by the dispute weeks before the strike began.  Other Bell companies have settled the health-care matter by agreeing to work with unions to set up "preferred provider" networks of physicians and hospitals that agree to limit cost increases, a step that Nynex appears to have nixed by insisting on the health-care cost-shifting plan in the 1986 contract.  Nynex and its unions -- 40,000 employees are represented by the CWA and 20,000 more by the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers -- seem intransigent.  A brief meeting between company and CWA negotiators a week ago only managed to infuriate both sides.  A CWA picket in Westchester County, N.Y., died last week of injuries he suffered after falling off the front hood of a car as it slowly crossed the picket line.  According to police, a car driven by an 18-year-old college student with a Nynex summer job may have bumped the picket, who then jumped onto the hood of her car, tried to bash in the windshield and lost his balance.  The death was the first picket-line fatality for the 51-year-old union.  "The longer the strike goes on, the greater the chance it could blow up in Nynex's face," says Jack Grubman of PaineWebber.  Nynex, he says, needs politicians, regulators and consumer groups on its side to win a hoped-for rate increase.  In early 1987, Nynex's New York Telephone unit began operating under an incentive regulation plan that removed a lid on profits but essentially required robust growth in the state economy and sharp cost-cutting at the phone company.  Neither happened.  New York Telephone has warned state regulators that it will ask them for a $900 million rate increase next February.  Nynex complains that the New York City area economy has been sluggish.  It also frets that competition -- in the form of private, fiber-optic loops such as Teleport Communications -- is taking a significant bite out of Big Apple and Boston business.  Mr. Grubman has little sympathy, saying: "Southwestern Bell has been in a depression and has been able to eke out quarterly gains.  Nynex ought to be able to do it, too."  Edward Greenberg of Morgan Stanley says he still finds Nynex attractive, because it has been selling at a relatively low multiple.  Nynex recently has traded at around 13 times earnings, compared with 15 for Pacific Telesis and 14 for Southwestern Bell, Bell Atlantic and BellSouth.  He dismisses talk of any long-term fallout from the strike.  "It's New York," he says.  "Labor relations are different here."  ---  Nynex  (NYSE; Symbol: NYN)  Business: Telecommunications  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $12.66 billion  Earnings: $1.32 billion  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: $1.42 vs. $1.64  Average daily trading volume:  343,440 shares  Common shares outstanding: 197 million  Traditional Industries Inc., disputing Federal Trade Commission estimates that the agency's settlement with the company could cost Traditional as much as $50 million, said it expects that total costs won't exceed $1 million to $1.5 million.  Traditional said its estimates are based on preliminary tabulations of questionnaires that were filled out by the company's customers to see if they were dissatisfied with their purchases of photographic equipment and services.  Those questionnaires were required as part of the settlement this month, and were due on Monday.  The results are being compiled by the accounting firm Ernst & Young, a Traditional spokesman said.  The FTC's investigation focused on allegations that the company was billing certain photographic services as "custom," which the government disputed.  The government also felt Traditional was failing to provide a three-day "cooling-off" period in which customers could back out of a purchase.  Traditional sells photo packages, which typically include a camera, family photo album, and photofinishing services.  They are usually marketed to newlyweds and new parents in rural and small towns through a network of 1,200 sales agents.  The FTC's estimate of the total cost to Traditional was based on the possibility of all Traditional's customers prior to last January seeking refunds, but the Traditional spokesman said that based on the preliminary tally of the questionnaires, that isn't likely.  "The company, confident that most of its customers were not dissatisfied with their purchases, agreed to the FTC's questionnaire procedure secure in the belief that the loss amount would not materially affect the company or its operations," the company said.  As part of the settlement, Traditional also had to set up a $250,000 trust fund to provide refunds to customers who purchased the photo packages between Jan. 1 and Sept. 1 of this year.  Toshiba Corp., agreed to buy Diasonics Inc.'s magnetic resonance imaging division for $167.5 million, eliminating one of only two major American competitors in a burgeoning medical diagnostic market.  The move creates a fierce competitor for General Electric Co., the only remaining big U.S.-based firm in the field.  It also underscores the continuing ability of Japanese companies to buy their way into key technology markets and the quickening pace of consolidation in the medical diagnostics industry.  The Japanese electronics giant's Toshiba America Medical Systems Inc. unit will acquire the Diasonics division, which accounts for about 40% of Diasonics's revenues, which totaled $86 million in the quarter ended June 30.  Magnetic resonance imaging is a relatively new technique that provides a better picture than traditional X-rays of the body's internal organs and tissues.  The technique relies heavily on powerful computers and advanced graphics.  Diasonics, which also makes other diagnostic equipment, was an early leader in the magnetic resonance field.  Since introducing its product in 1984, the South San Francisco, Calif.-based company has sold nearly 300 systems, which generally cost from $1 million to $2 million.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Diasonics stock closed at $3.6875, up 25 cents.  In buying Diasonics's business, Toshiba gains a major foothold in a market it considers critical to the future of medical diagnostic technology.  Toshiba's U.S. arm entered the market in 1988 and has since sold as many as eight systems, said Ronald B. Schilling, general manager of Toshiba America.  "Toshiba has said it wants to be a larger player in magnetic resonance," said Paul Brown, an analyst at Volpe & Covington, a San Francisco brokerage firm.  "This deal gives them good technology and easy access to market."  Toshiba also may have been frustrated in its efforts to penetrate the market for these expensive diagnostic tools.  It can take years to form relationships with hospitals, and such equipment purchases are often the subject of lengthy discussions.  "Toshiba is very aggressive in this country, in terms of the quality of their products and willingness to discount," said Charles R. Appleby, who reports on medical technology for HealthWeek, an industry journal.  "But they have a poor distribution and service network.  That's part of Diasonics's attraction."  For its part, Diasonics said it wanted out of the magnetic resonance business because it couldn't keep up with larger, far more diversified competitors.  "There's so much price competition from the majors," said Allan May, the firm's general counsel.  "We were profitable, but it wasn't our most profitable business."  Mr. May added that an important element in the deal was the existing relationship between Diasonics and Toshiba America.  The firms have worked together on several technology projects, and Mr. Schilling of Toshiba America formerly ran Diasonics's magnetic resonance imaging business.  Another difficulty for Diasonics was the cost of keeping pace with developments in the magnetic resonance field.  "When you're a smaller company, you've got to match the big guys step for step," said Mr. Brown.  "And not only in technology.  This is a big-ticket purchase, and customers expect a lot of support and a big distribution channel."  The dollar was near its highest levels of the day in late afternoon New York trading after shaking off a swift drop at the tail-end of London business that some traders attributed to a large sell order from a Southeast Asian central bank.  The selling strategy, witnessed several times before as volume thins toward the London close, pulled the dollar down a full pfennig and about one-half yen before rebounding late in the afternoon.  Traders said the sell order came from the Malaysian central bank.  Sterling, meanwhile, tumbled following news that the British merchandise trade deficit in July widened well beyond market forecasts.  The trade gap came in at a seasonally adjusted #2.46 billion, compared with June's revised #1.92 billion gap; the current account deficit widened to #2.06 billion from #1.52 billion in June.  The Bank of England intervened following the report to slow the pound's slide, but the currency remained weak against the mark and the dollar for the remainder of the global trading day.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9530 marks, up from 1.9395 marks late Tuesday, and at 143.15 yen, up from 142.20 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5717, down from $1.5890.  In Tokyo Thursday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 143.45 yen, up from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 142.35 yen.  For most of the trading day Wednesday, the U.S. currency was on a mild upswing, reaching highs of 1.9570 marks and 143.30 yen in late European trading as Tuesday's rumors that the West German Bundesbank was planning to raise interest rates gave way to more sober expectations that the central bank won't alter credit policy at its Central Bank Council meeting today A Bundesbank spokesman said no news conference is scheduled after the meeting of the Central Bank Council, indicating that West German monetary authorities aren't planning any policy proclamations.  On Tuesday, rumors of an imminent Bundesbank interest-rate boost helped the mark post strong gains against all major currencies except the pound.  The Bundesbank has raised key interest rates three times this year, with the last increase coming June 29, when it lifted the discount rate to 5% from 4 1/2% and the Lombard rate to 7% from 6 1/2%.  Traders in New York said a robust U.S. Federal funds rate, which climbed to 9 1/4% from 8 7/8% late Tuesday, also prompted dollar-buying by many traders who have been focusing on credit markets since last week's bullish U.S. trade report.  Federal funds are overnight loans of reserves among Fed member banks.  But overall, the market focused on sterling, as traders debated whether lofty British interest rates -- seen likely to remain high in the short term -- would save the pound from further losses after the dismal trade report.  Most traders are looking for continued declines.  James Bindler, a trader in the New York branch of Midland Bank PLC says: "The Bank of England will engineer an orderly decline of the pound, because for political reasons they can't support it by raising interest rates.  Higher interest rates will boost mortgage rates, and workers will push for higher wages to pay them off.  The end-result actually would be more inflation pressure."  In Asia, traders took little notice of remarks from Bank of Japan Gov. Satoshi Sumita, who reasserted that the U.S. and Japan agree that dollar levels which would interfere with the adjustment of trade imbalances are undesirable.  Mr. Sumita said the Group of Seven major monetary nations will take "an appropriate attitude toward the market," if the dollar goes too high.  G-7 nations include the U.S., Japan, Britain, West Germany, France, Italy and Canada.  Asked whether he was uncomfortable with current rates, Mr. Sumita refused comment.  Mark Morris, a corporate trader at National Westminster Bank in New York, said remarks such as those proffered by Mr. Sumita underline the G-7's determination to hold the dollar below two marks.  "There are still an awful lot of dollar bulls out there, but they can't make a move because they know that the central banks will chomp on a strong rally," he said.  Elsewhere, the Bank of Italy stepped into the Milan foreign-exchange fixing for the third day in a row, buying $10 million and 68 million marks in a bid to keep the lira from strengthening further within the European Monetary System.  A total of $53.1 million and 81.5 million marks changed hands in official trading.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery fell $2.10 to $365.80 an ounce in moderate trading.  Estimated volume was 3.2 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $366.65 an ounce.  Morrison Inc. said it expects per-share earnings in the first quarter ending Sept. 2 will be flat compared with year-ago earnings from continuing operations of 35 cents a share.  The Mobile, Ala., food-service company blamed the below-expectation results on problems with customer traffic and margin erosion.  It said it has intensified marketing, promotion and cost control efforts, and expects to overcome the problems in the family-dining division so that the remainder of the fiscal year will meet its goals.  For the year-ago fiscal first quarter, the company reported net income of $6.6 million, or 37 cents a share, including profit from discontinued operations of $410,000, or two cents a share, on sales of $185 million.  KODAK PLANS to cut its work force by about 4,500, or 3%, and to sell or consolidate a score of ailing businesses.  The move, Kodak's fourth restructuring since 1983, reflects the severe difficulties the company has had in containing costs.  Institutional investors applauded the move.  ---  Budget director Darman is looking at ways to raise billions of dollars by taxing such benefits as Medicare and military disability pay and by raising taxes on Social Security benefits.  ---  Many thrifts have lowered the rates they pay on deposits following the infusion of lower-cost funds into sick S&Ls under the new rescue bill.  ---  Securities-fraud investigators are looking at an arrangement under which Drexel may have in effect paid off some customers to induce them to buy hard-to-sell securities.  ---  Bristol-Myers faces a potentially damaging boycott by doctors and hospitals over its plan to advertise an infant formula directly to parents.  ---  The FDA is investigating Eli Lilly's manufacturing of brand-name drugs, and is broadening its separate inquiry of the generic-drug industry.  ---  Time outlined the second part of its two-step acquisition of Warner, offering the remaining shareholders securities valued at $6.07 billion.  ---  Goldsmith enlisted a big French insurer to acquire Farmers Group for $4.5 billion if his $21.19 billion bid for Farmers' parent, B.A.T, succeeds.  ---  CBS agreed to pay $300 million to broadcast the 1994 Winter Olympics, more evidence of the network's strategy to rely on big sports events.  ---  PaineWebber's chairman was called by a House panel to testify about the firm's dealings with HUD.  ---  Sales of domestic-made autos rose 1.8% in mid-August.  Most of the gain came from a greater number of cars made in the U.S. by Japanese firms.  ---  Stock and bond prices increased sharply and the dollar rebounded after Tuesday's sell-off.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average shot up 27.12 points to close at 2678.11.  ---  Air carriers' plans to raise fares have stalled, reflecting nervousness about a recent slackening in traffic.  But industry analysts expect the increases eventually to take effect.  ---  Britain's merchandise trade deficit widened in July to $3.34 billion, surprising analysts and government officials.  The pound sank on the news.  ---  Mexico's government hopes its decision to allow foreigners to invest in the state-controlled airline will demonstrate the country's new willingness to accept capital from the outside.  ---  Control Data's chief financial officer is leaving after three years of rescue work at the computer company.  ---  Digital Equipment plans to raise some prices and reassign thousands of workers to sales and service jobs.  ---  Ex-Drexel trading assistant Lisa Ann Jones was sentenced to 18 months in prison and fined $50,000 for perjury before a federal grand jury.  ---  Commonwealth Edison was ordered by Illinois regulators to refund to customers at least $200 million for construction cost overruns at the utility's Byron 1 nuclear plant.  ---  Exxon was sued by nine environmental groups that want a federal court to oversee the company's cleanup of the Alaskan oil spill.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 159,640,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2678.11, up 27.12; transportation 1437.77, up 4.27; utilities 216.30, up 2.96.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3288.04, up 28.00.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 131.68, up 0.56; spot index 129.50, up 0.05.  Dollar: 143.15 yen, up 0.95; 1.9530 marks, up 0.0135.  When asked to explain why bond values rise or fall on any particular day, bond traders will often explain the market by offering their interpretations of the day's economic data.  In contrast to investors, who make decisions based on the perceived underlying value of a security in the belief that price will eventually converge to true value, traders are primarily interested in anticipating short-term changes in price independent of the underlying value.  Bond traders care mostly about how new information will affect interest rates.  Whether the traders' collective understanding of this new information is right or wrong doesn't really matter to them.  Traders do not need to anticipate correctly what the economy is going to do over the next year -- they just need to know what their fellow-traders are doing that very second.  If all the other market participants are reacting to the release of unexpected economic data in a certain way, then any individual trader must incorporate their behavior into his own decision-making process no matter how irrational it may seem to him to be.  But when traders' opinions on the workings of the economy are taken seriously by policymakers and the financial press, dangerous things can happen.  Frankly, the bond traders' opinions have little or no value, except as insights into their curious macroeconomic beliefs and consequently as information about their likely behavior.  There are several reasons for this.  First, the indicator that traders used last month as the key to all understanding is often as forgotten as bell-bottoms the next.  Not long ago, the weekly money supply numbers were closely followed by traders.  If M-1 did something unexpected, bond prices rallied or broke.  But who cares about M-1 now?  Not bond traders.  During the last few years, the weekly release of money supply data has been a non-event.  Sometimes traders jump when the durable goods orders numbers are released, sometimes they don't.  If these numbers were once considered important, why are they ignored today?  If these numbers never should have mattered, why were they once closely followed?  During the past year and a half, bonds have supposedly traded off of changes in the price of: crude oil, stocks, the yen, soybeans and the CRB index futures contract, among others.  There is always a plausible explanation for the linkage.  It might be thought that changes in the price of some commodity, oil for example, or soybeans are proxies for inflation.  Higher commodity prices are then treated as a warning that bond prices will soon tumble -- because traders still confuse changes in relative prices, which are not inflationary, with changes in absolute prices, which are.  Second, traders are no more consistent about the meaning of these numbers than they are about which numbers to follow.  The monthly trade deficit number is still closely watched by traders.  However, the meaning they attach to it has completely reversed itself.  It used to be thought that a larger than expected trade deficit number was good for the bond market -- because slower export growth suggested that the economy was cooling.  A weaker economy, in turn, meant lower interest rates and higher bond prices.  But now the opposite conclusion is just as often reached.  A larger than expected trade deficit is now held to be bad for bonds because it implies an excess supply of dollars which should cause the price of the dollar to fall.  A decline in the foreign-exchange value of the dollar causes a decline in the demand for dollar-denominated bonds by foreigners which, in turn, precipitates a fall in bond prices.  At other times, traders say they believe that a rise in interest rates -- which depresses bond prices -- might strengthen the dollar, by making investment in the U.S. more attractive to foreigners.  And so, bonds could go down when the dollar is going up, too.  Third, even when consistent, traders can be wrong.  Many of the macroeconomic beliefs of bond traders are discredited Keynesian notions.  For instance, the idea that employment beyond some full employment level is inflationary is widely accepted among bond traders despite the lack of any real evidence for this proposition.  In fact, this idea is simply another example of the confusion between changes in relative and absolute prices.  To the extent that there is a relationship between the strength of the economy and interest rates, the unemployment rate is probably a poor guide, especially when the incentives to participate in the labor force change due to tax rate cuts.  During the Reagan years, there were many months where the unemployment rate did not move much but large numbers of new jobs were nevertheless created.  Fourth, the economic data released in most economic reports cover short periods of time, are preliminary, and often subject to substantial revision.  Yet, more attention is typically paid to preliminary numbers than to the presumably more accurate revised numbers even when the revisions have been substantial.  Wrong macroeconomic beliefs don't prevent traders from making money -- John Maynard Keynes, after all, was a successful trader.  He observed: "Thus, the professional investor is forced to concern himself with the anticipation of impending changes, in the news or in the atmosphere, of the kind by which experience shows that the mass psychology of the market is most influenced. . . .  The social object of skilled investment should be to defeat the dark forces of time and ignorance which envelop our future.  The actual, private object of the most skilled investment today is 'to beat the gun,' as the Americans so well express it, to outwit the crowd, and to pass the bad or depreciating, half-crown to the other fellow."  ---  Mr. Webb, a former trader, is an associate professor of finance at the McIntire School of Commerce of the University of Virginia.  Martin F.C. Emmett, in his first major appointments since becoming chairman and chief executive officer of Tambrands Inc., hired two executives with experience at consumer products maker RJR Nabisco Inc., his employer until 1983.  Charles J. Chapman was named executive vice president of Tambrands and president of its feminine protection division in the U.S. and Canada.  Raymond F. Wright joined as senior vice president and chief financial officer.  Most recently Mr. Chapman, 50 years old, was a principal in Spectrum Group, an investment firm.  He resigned as president of Nabisco Brands North America in an October 1987 realignment of the division.  RJR Nabisco was taken private in a leveraged buy-out led by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. earlier this year.  Mr. Wright, also 50, succeeds Peter J. Perkinson, who resigned.  Mr. Perkinson couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Wright had been senior vice president of finance at Nabisco's international division.  Before his Nabisco posts, Mr. Chapman was a group vice president of Chesebrough-Pond's Inc., heading various divisions including health and beauty products and packaged foods.  At Pond's, "He was very highly regarded.  Despite the onslaught of competition, he expanded the product line and did very well," says Deepak Raj, a Merrill Lynch & Co. analyst.  Mr. Wright's appointment signals a push toward tighter cost controls at the company, analysts said.  One person close to the company said overhead could be reduced 20% at Tambrands.  Mr. Emmett became chairman and chief executive officer of Tambrands in April after Edwin H. Shutt Jr. resigned, amid criticism that the company wasn't successful in expanding much beyond its mainstay product, tampons.  Russell Sprague, the retired chairman, returned to the top post on an interim basis about two months.  Mr. Emmett most recently worked as an investment banker, heading a unit of Security Pacific Corp.  Digital Equipment Corp., in an effort to shore up sagging profit margins, plans to increase prices on some products and reassign thousands of workers to sales and service jobs within the company.  A Digital executive said the price boosts would amount to 5% or less and would probably be announced in the U.S. next month.  Prices were increased 6% to 8% last month in Europe, where the dollar's strength has hurt margins.  The plan to reassign workers would shift employees to customer-service jobs from manufacturing and corporate overhead functions such as administration and finance.  Digital said in June that 4,000 employees would be reassigned in the year that began July 2 and that another 1,000 to 2,000 would be shifted in the year beginning July 1990.  Digital, based in Maynard, Mass., also said it told managers in finance, administration and other corporate support units to cut their budgets 10% in the current year.  They also were told to reduce staffing 25% within two years, a spokesman said.  The affected employees will be offered new jobs with the company and won't be laid off, the spokesman said.  Digital's world-wide payroll stood at 125,800 July 1.  The company said it had hired 4,000 people in its international operations, where business has been growing rapidly, but that total employment was flat in the U.S., where sales have been weak.  James M. Osterhoff, vice president for finance, said the company "has no plans for layoffs in this fiscal year."  Digital, like International Business Machines Corp. and Hewlett-Packard Co., has historically avoided layoffs in favor of retraining programs or retirement incentives.  Marc G. Schulman, an analyst with UBS Securities Inc., said he thinks Digital plans to keep its payroll flat at 125,000 for the next three fiscal years.  "The only way they are going to have layoffs is if the European business goes into the tank," he said.  Jay P. Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., said Digital's gross margins on product sales slipped from about 60% in fiscal 1988 to 57.5% in fiscal 1989, and he forecast further erosion to as low as 56% in fiscal 1990.  But, he added, "Those numbers are still better than almost any other company in the computer industry."  Analysts said Digital is likely to apportion the expected price increases among its products so that such highly price-competitive products as workstations wouldn't be affected.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Digital closed at $99.625, down 37.5 cents.  Convenient Food Mart Inc. said it voluntarily filed for protection under federal bankruptcy laws in the hope of stopping regional franchisers from dropping from its system.  The company filed for reorganization under Chapter 11.  Company officials said Convenient sought protection from the rising costs of defending itself in separate lawsuits brought by three franchisers in New York, California and Kentucky.  In May, the three franchisers individually sued the company in attempting to leave the system.  All are in the process of dropping their Convenient trade name, according to a Convenient lawyer.  The company also said it filed a suit in bankruptcy court against the three to prevent them from leaving the system.  Convenient contends that its contracts with the three franchisers are still valid.  Convenient also charges them with engaging in unfair competition, misappropriating trade secrets and conspiring to interfere with the company's contractual relations.  The company -- one of the nation's top convenience-store franchisers with more than 1,100 stores -- seeks payment of nearly $500,000 in franchising fees and more than $1 million in other damages.  David N. Missner, the company's bankruptcy lawyer, said that if the three succeed in breaking their contracts, that would have "a chilling effect" on the company's entire system.  "We are intending to put a stop to this now," he said.  "It affects the income of the entire company."  The three regional franchisers couldn't be reached to comment.  In the individual suits by the three, they charged, among other things, that the company's loss in a federal trademark case means their contracts with the company have been broken.  In February, a federal appeals court ruled that Convenient doesn't have exclusive rights to use the word "convenient" in its trade name.  Convenient's liabilities, totaling $41.6 million, exceed its assets by $16.5 million, according to company figures.  Secured liabilities include $12.8 million held by American National Corp. in Chicago and $6.4 million held by Exchange Bancorp. in Chicago, Convenient said.  Unsecured debt, totaling $18.3 million, is mostly held by a consortium of five insurance companies.  Two of the company's franchising-related units aren't part of the bankruptcy-law filing: Convenient Food Mart Franchising Co. and CFM Franchising Co.  The parent said both subsidiaries will continue to franchise stores and grant regional licenses to the extent that they're permitted by franchising regulations.  The parent also said these units have adequate funds in their ongoing businesses to provide continuing services to franchisees and regional franchisers.  Mr. Missner said he "couldn't say" whether state franchising regulators are likely to permit Convenient to continue selling franchises.  He added, however, "We aren't seeking to expand our base."  Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive of L.J. Hooker Corp., said the company has established $75 million in accounts receivable financing with Mellon Bank N.A., a unit of Mellon Bank Corp.  The financing, which will increase the cash flow of Hooker's retail stores, is separate from the $24 million infusion of debtor-possession financing provided last week by GE Capital Corp., a unit of General Electric Co.  L.J. Hooker, the U.S. subsidiary of Sydney-based Hooker Corp., filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection earlier this month.  Included in the filings were Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co., Hooker's largest retail chains.  "We've improved our relationship with Mellon to the point where the bank has resumed accounts receivable financing for the retail group," Mr. Sigoloff said at a creditors' meeting.  "This means that we will get a much faster return of the money to our stores, which will enable us to build back our inventory levels."  A Mellon spokesman said the bank has been holding discussions with L.J. Hooker but that it doesn't comment on the specifics of customer relationships.  At the creditors' meeting, it was also decided that representatives of Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. and Westpac Banking Corp. will serve as co-chairmen of the creditors committee.  In an interview, Mr. Sigoloff said that both Bonwit Teller and B. Altman have begun receiving new shipments of badly needed fall merchandise and that the stores will have wider merchandise selections by this weekend.  "Basically, these stores are operating on a cash-before-delivery basis," said Mr. Sigoloff.  "Until we can provide weekly cash summaries to the trade explaining where the money is coming from and where it is going, it's only fair that they don't give us credit.  We will get to that point, but we aren't there now."  Steve Stoller, chairman of Karin Stevens Apparel Group, said a Bonwit Teller buyer visited his New York showroom last week and presented a check for goods valued at $30,000.  "We're very pleased," said Mr. Stoller.  "What this means is that Bonwit Teller intends to stay in business."  Hooker, now being managed by a court-appointed provisional liquidator, has invested more than $1 billion in the U.S. since January 1986 in various retail chains, property and shopping malls.  Lackluster U.S. retail sales and a downturn in the Australian economy created cash flow problems, forcing its U.S. subsidiary to seek bankruptcy protection.  Last week, Hooker agreed to sell its two-thirds interest in Parisian Inc., a Birmingham, Ala.-based retailer, to management for $30 million to $40 million in cash plus the forgiveness of certain obligations.  As of March 31, Hooker had 1.9 billion Australian dollars ($US1.45 billion) and A$2.45 billion in assets.  London shares shrugged off disappointing U.K. trade data and rallied strongly from intraday lows, thanks to a lack of selling pressure, renewed speculative buying and a steady opening on Wall Street.  But stocks finished lower in Tokyo, with the Nikkei 225-stock average slipping back below the 35000 level.  "The market just wants to go up," one London trader said.  "There is a feeling that the trade figures are so bad they can't get any worse."  Britain announced a current account deficit of #2.06 billion ($3.28 billion) for July, far wider than market expectations of around #1.35 billion.  Imports surged to a record #10.19 billion in July from #9.79 billion in June.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index rose 11.6 to 2382.4, nearly 20 points above its low for the day.  Dealers said the market's descent after the trade data came out was due mainly to marketmakers trimming prices rather than to any outbreak of serious selling pressure.  In early afternoon, the market attracted what one dealer described as "nibbling buying interest," which soon matured into more pronounced bargain-hunting.  The Financial Times 30-share index advanced 9.6 to 1975.9.  Volume was 439 million shares, compared with 391.6 million Tuesday.  With a revival of investor interest, speculative plays once again took center stage.  "Players were looking for the laggards in the recent rally and gossiping about future corporate deals," one dealer said.  The bank and insurance sectors performed strongly.  Barclays ended 10 pence higher at 534 pence ($8.49) a share, National Westminster rose 5 to 345, and Lloyds climbed 5 to 408.  The rise was in response to a U.K. Monopolies and Mergers Commission report released Tuesday that examined the banks' credit card businesses.  Lloyds Bank decided to charge for credit card services in response to the report, and other banks are expected to follow suit.  Among insurance stocks, General Accident rose 16 to #10.16 and Guardian Royal climbed 12 to 230 in a technical reaction after recent losses.  Bass rose 24 to #11.47 as players continued to examine the underlying asset value of the company.  Retailer Great Universal Stores rose 23 to #11.57 on talk that the company will soon announce either a major reorganization or executive changes.  Around the London close, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 10.24 points at 2661.23.  Tokyo's Nikkei index fell 221.07 to 34893.28.  The index, which lost 26.48 points Tuesday, closed above 35000 for the first time ever last Thursday.  In Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index had fallen 37.83 points to 34855.45 midway through the morning session.  Wednesday's volume on the first section was estimated at 550 million shares, compared with 457.8 million Tuesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues 506-390, with 202 unchanged.  The Nikkei index closed the morning session at a record intraday high, helped by arbitrage and index-related buying, but volume was thin and the market failed to hang on to the morning's gains.  Traders attributed the losses to lower bond prices and a possible interest-rate increase in West Germany.  An official at Taiheiyo Securities said the loss wasn't large, considering that program trading has grown in popularity in the Tokyo market and routinely drives the Nikkei index up or down 100 or 200 points.  "Today's loss was just a little worse than a mosquito bite, but not more than that," he said.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which lost 5.63 points Tuesday, was down 9.43 points, or 0.36%, to 2644.02.  The second section index, which gained 19.65 points Tuesday, was up 8.76, or 0.27%, to close at 3288.57.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 34 million shares, compared with 30.6 million Tuesday.  Some traders said interest is shifting from the high-priced, smaller-capitalization issues that attracted investors for the quick profits they could yield to issues with strong earnings outlooks and lower price-earnings ratios.  In addition, a fund manager at a life insurance company said institutional investors are putting some new money into second-section issues and shifting some out of first-section stocks as well.  Financial, steel, shipbuiding utility and other electrical, and pharmaceutical issues were all generally easier at the close.  Gainers included housing issues.  Sekisui House advanced 60 yen to 2,390 yen ($16.81) a share.  Misawa Homes was up 10 at 2,670, and Daiwa House rose 20 to 2,660.  Nintendo advanced 300 to 19,000, and Sony rebounded from Tuesday's loss, rising 120 to close at 8,800.  In other Asian and Pacific markets, share prices closed lower in Hong Kong and Taipei and were higher in Sydney, Singapore, Seoul, Manila and Wellington.  Sydney shares jumped to a post-crash high as steady offshore buying sent resource issues soaring in moderate trading.  The All Ordinaries Index closed at 1737.9, up 13.2.  Elsewhere, shares closed higher in Paris and Zurich and lower in Frankfurt, Brussels, Amsterdam, Stockholm and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 22 Aug 21 Year  @ U.S. ...................... 314.2 313.9 +22.7  @ Britain ................... 711.2 712.8 +30.2  @ Canada .................... 427.1 430.0 +16.3  @ Japan ..................... 1568.7 1572.5 +10.4  @ France .................... 520.1 523.1 +17.5  @ Germany ................... 251.9 251.1 +21.1  @ Hong Kong ................. 1898.8 1890.7 - 6.4  @ Switzerland ............... 236.4 235.7 +36.7  @ Australia ................. 344.5 345.0 +18.7  @ World index ............... 535.5 536.9 + 8.3  Grumman Corp. of Bethpage, N.Y., said it will close its Tachonics Corp. microchip subsidiary after failing to find a buyer.  Grumman, a major defense and aerospace contractor, said Tachonics will close by year end.  The unit will complete existing contracts but no new orders will be accepted.  A Grumman spokeswoman said the company doesn't expect to keep any of the 47 Tachonics employees after the closing.  Tachonics, in Plainsboro, N.J., was formed in 1985 to make gallium arsenide chips for high-speed commercial electronics applications.  Grumman had sought a buyer for Tachonics over the past few months.  Its electronics systems division will continue to design gallium arsenide circuits for defense and aerospace uses.  In 1985, planners at General Motors Corp. realized they had a big problem.  Rival Chrysler Corp. was cleaning up with its car-like, front-wheel-drive minivans.  The closest thing GM had to match them was a show vehicle designed by Pontiac with gull-wing doors and a plastic skin.  Yesterday, GM formally launched a descendant of that van, the Chevrolet Lumina APV (for all-purpose vehicle).  It goes on sale next month along with two other versions, the Pontiac Trans Sport and, later, the Oldsmobile Silhouette.  Whatever else these front-wheel-drive vehicles are, they certainly are unique.  They look like space shuttles, are held together with glue and have hides made almost entirely of plastic compounds.  They are the largest mass-market vehicles ever produced with plastic bodies.  "We came into the market late," says GM engineer James Orndorff.  "We had to be unique."  Though the Chevrolet Corvette has had a plastic body for years, the Lumina, Trans Sport and Silhouette still represent a big gamble for GM.  The company's last mass-market car with an all-plastic body, the Pontiac Fiero, was a hit when introduced in 1984, and 102,000 were sold that year.  But quality woes and high insurance premiums dropped sales to just 47,000 vehicles in 1987, and GM killed the car last year.  Now, however, GM and a host of suppliers are betting millions that the vans will usher in a generation of boldly styled vehicles that use substantial amounts of plastic for exterior and structural parts.  "Eighteen months ago, the question was: Did plastic have a part in a body panel?" says Edward F. Gambrell, director of marketing for Dow Chemical's automotive materials group.  "Now, there's no question it has a part."  The question, though, is how big a part, and nobody expects GM's vehicles to trigger a wholesale rush to plastic cars and trucks.  That's because the risks of plastic for manufacturers are high, and the advantages to the consumer aren't terribly clear -- at least not in GM's vans.  Boosters of plastic say it allows lighter vehicles with better gas mileage, but the GM plastic vans will weigh in at about 3,500 pounds -- 200 pounds or more heavier than Chrysler's steel-bodied counterparts, which currently hold half the market for such vehicles.  Another advantage, the ability to produce different shapes inexpensively to accommodate varying consumer tastes, isn't evident either.  All three versions of the GM vehicle will look alike, though company officials promise that will change in the future.  GM did take advantage of plastic's flexibility to give its vans space-age styling that's difficult to duplicate in steel.  But Chrysler officials, perhaps predictably, argue that minivan buyers are a practical lot who don't want radical styling.  Chrysler officials sneer that GM's van is a "plastic pachyderm," which prompts GM executives, in a rare exchange of insults, to call Chrysler's van a "milk truck."  Even Chrysler, however, is testing plastic fenders on its minivans.  Other auto makers are quietly designing fenders, trunk lids and hoods out of various kinds of plastic or plastic-and-fiberglass "composite" materials.  The GM vans, however, are a leap compared to these baby steps.  The No. 1 auto maker isn't just substituting plastic for steel in a few parts.  It is designing a vehicle with huge plastic body panels and building it with an array of expensive new machinery tailored to plastic construction.  The symbolic importance of the GM minivan has intensified the fight between the steel industry and the plastics industry.  Plastics companies are subsidizing automotive design schools and working to develop engineering recipe books to encourage auto engineers to specify plastic instead of steel.  Steelmakers, in turn, are working hand-in-hand with auto makers to slash the cost of producing automotive parts, and sniping that plastic cars would litter the environment because they can't be melted down and recycled.  "The world-class competitors {in the auto industry} are steel-based," contends Peter T. Peterson, manager of the USX Corp. subsidiary that markets sheet metal to auto makers.  David Cole, director of the University of Michigan's Office for the Study of Automotive Transportation, says, "It's a real horse race" between the two materials.  Despite the GM vans, though, plastic may be losing ground because early expectations were too high.  Two years ago, auto executives surveyed by Mr. Cole's office expected that the exterior of the average 1995 car would be about 20% plastic.  This year, however, industry executives surveyed said the average 1995 car's exterior would be only 5% plastic, compared with about 2% today.  Most auto designers are focusing on improving steel design, says Mr. Cole, "instead of looking for magical solutions" in exotic plastics.  One problem is that the risks of plastic technology force unwelcome trade-offs.  To simplify an already-complex manufacturing process, the GM van has just one engine and transmission combination: a 120-horsepower, 3.1 liter V-6 with a three-speed automatic transmission.  Chrysler offers several different engine and transmission combinations in its minivans.  The top-of-the-line 1990 model will have a four-speed automatic transmission and a 3.3 liter V-6 engine that generates 25% more horsepower than the GM engine.  "Would I like to have a bigger engine?" asks James Westby, GM's APV project manager.  "Yes I would.  But ours is adequate."  And Mr. Westby says plastic technology could pay off big.  If GM can make quick, cheap design changes in future generations of minivans, it will be a big boost in the battle against rivals, particularly Japanese auto makers.  GM's challenge is convincing consumers that they, too, will enjoy big advantages from owning a futuristic, plastic-bodied van.  Usually, auto makers are mum about new models until just before they go on sale.  But GM has been showing off the minivans at auto shows and other events repeatedly since January in a campaign to head off worries about the plastic skin and the spaceship design.  At these showings, GM engineers go out of their way to demonstrate the van's less esoteric comfort features -- such as lightweight rear seats that flip out at the touch of a lever.  They've promised the van won't turn into a broiler on a hot day because the huge windshield contains a heat-reflecting metallic film.  They've insisted that the plastic bodies will be easy to fix: Plastic doesn't ding or rust, and damaged panels can be heated, peeled off and replaced at reasonable prices.  And GM officials stress that under the plastic skin is a sturdy steel frame that will protect passengers.  One issue that's come up repeatedly in these sessions is the van's unusual dashboard: Because of the vehicle's long, sloping nose, the dashboard is nearly a yard deep, and many drivers can't see over its plastic expanse to locate the front fenders.  GM planners insist that consumers who drove the van in clinics easily got used to the unusual perspective, even in parking.  GM also is taking pains to ensure that the innovative assembly system at the Tarrytown, N.Y., plant works properly.  The minivan's plastic body panels will be held onto a steel bird-cage frame by an array of screws and more than 2,000 inches of superstrong glue.  Now, the Tarrytown plant is working so slowly that the company expects output in the 1990 model year to total about 170,000 vehicles, only 76% of its planned capacity.  That has GM dealers frustrated, since output will be split among three divisions.  Because of the slow start, one company official says, GM may not know whether its new model is a success until 1991 or 1992.  Still, GM and plastics-industry officials are bullish.  Eldon D. Trueman, director of sales and marketing for Budd's plastics division, says: "Once this vehicle gets in consumers' hands, it's going to drive other producers to look seriously at an approach like this."  Stroh Brewing Co. said an Ontario agency banned it from running in major provincial daily newspapers full-page advertisments that criticize the pricing of imported U.S. beer.  The Liquor Licence Board of Ontario, which must approve any beer advertising appearing in the province, rejected Stroh's ad, which asked beer drinkers to write to their provincial members of Parliament to protest a recent increase in beer handling charges.  The agency informed Detroit-based Stroh in a letter that the ad "makes derogatory reference to the brewers of Ontario."  The ad, which Stroh planned to run in five Ontario newspapers, begins with the statement that "the brewers of Ontario have pressured your provincial treasurer . . . into raising the price of imported beer."  The ad continues to say "we believe the brewers of Ontario simply didn't want to lower their prices to compete fairly with Old Milwaukee" and concludes by asking readers to write to provincial politicians objecting to the price increases.  Last month, the province imposed a handling charge to cover the costs of distributing U.S. beer in Ontario, which raised prices about an average of 70 Canadian cents (60 U.S. cents) a six-pack.  Provincial authorities argued that while domestic brewers paid for their own distribution network, the costs of distributing imported U.S. beer weren't being covered.  Stroh joins other U.S. brewers in criticizing provincial restrictions on beer sales and marketing.  A Stroh spokeswoman said company officials have contacted the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative to discuss the possibility of launching a trade action.  Canadian and U.S. researchers plan to describe today their discovery of the defective gene that causes cystic fibrosis.  Discovery of the cystic fibrosis gene has been expected ever since late 1986 when American and British researchers found two genetic "markers" that lie near it on the genetic material found in every cell.  Final discovery of the gene will be announced at news conferences today in Toronto and Washington, a spokeswoman for the Hospital for Sick Children in Toronto said.  The discovery was to have been disclosed Sept. 8 when three reports describing it are to be published in the weekly scientific journal, Science.  The researchers and the editors of Science decided to announce the discovery today after the Reuters news service ran a report that the gene had been found.  Cystic fibrosis is an inherited disease, affecting the lungs and digestive system of about one of every 2,000 infants born.  Failure of various glands causes the lungs to clog up with secretions, leaving the child open to infections.  Failure of the pancreas gland interferes with digestion of fats.  The disorder was once fatal in childhood but modern treatment permits many afflicted children to live into adulthood.  Finding of the gene will be announced jointly by geneticists and molecular biologists from the Hospital for Sick Children in Toronto and the University of Michigan in Ann Arbor.  The Toronto-Michigan collaborators have been racing with molecular biologists at St. Mary's Hospital in London to make the discovery.  Discovery of the gene isn't expected to have any immediate impact on the treatment of cystic fibrosis.  A genetic test that can make a prenatal identification of a fetus afflicted with cystic fibrosis has been available for more than two years.  Finding the gene, itself, however, will open a new avenue of research.  Upon finding the defective gene, chemists should be able to find out what protein the gene is supposed to produce.  This, in turn, should tell researchers what the protein is failing to do that causes such widespread and lethal damage to the body.  From there, it is hoped, some means of preventing the damage might be found.  U.S. prosecutors have widened a securities-fraud investigation to focus on an arrangement under which Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. may have, in effect, paid off some customers to induce them to buy hard-to-sell securities from Drexel.  According to individuals familiar with the probe, investigators with the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office and the Securities and Exchange Commission are looking at purchases of certain securities of Storer Communications Inc. by some of Drexel's largest junk-bond customers.  At least one junk-bond fund manager has taken a leave of absence since the investigation into Storer securities began.  Ben Bayse, vice president and junk-bond portfolio manager of First Investors Management Co., which manages more than $2.5 billion of junk bonds, began his leave in May.  The purchases by Mr. Bayse and others of certain preferred shares of Storer occurred in late 1985 in connection with Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.'s acquisition of Storer.  Drexel's junk-bond department, then run by Michael Milken, sold about $1.47 billion in securities to finance KKR's acquisition of Storer.  Some of Drexel's largest junk-bond customers are understood to have bought large quantities of the preferred securities, which Drexel is said to have had difficulty marketing.  In exchange, these customers were given the opportunity to participate personally in a Drexel partnership that held Storer warrants as its major asset.  The warrants were sold to them at prices substantially below market value and earned them huge profits, according to people familiar with the investigation.  Mr. Bayse and his attorney, Jack Auspitz, didn't return calls.  Steven Anreder, a Drexel spokesman, said: "While we cannot comment on anything which may be the subject of an investigation, these reports deal with matters dating back to 1985 and which would for Drexel be covered in our firm's settlements with the government.  These allegations certainly were not known to us at the time and would have raised serious questions in the absence of mitigating circumstances.  In any event, we find leaks like this of ongoing investigations to be irresponsible and unfair."  Andrew Donohue, general counsel of First Investors, the New York-based mutual fund concern, said Mr. Bayse asked for -- and was granted -- a leave from the firm.  Mr. Donohue said that Mr. Bayse's departure is "personal to Ben" and that First Investors funds weren't in any way harmed by Mr. Bayse's activities.  He declined to elaborate on those activities.  But individuals familiar with the investigation said that two months after Mr. Bayse bought Storer securities for First Investors junk-bond funds, Drexel sold warrants to him for his personal account at prices substantially below market value through a Drexel partnership known as MacPherson Partners.  People familiar with the investigation said Mr. Bayse may have violated his fiduciary duty by failing to disclose to First Investors his personal stake in the partnership.  He has disclosed the stake in recent months and is understood to have agreed to turn over his personal profits from his MacPherson stake to First Investors.  These individuals said that MacPherson was established by Drexel's high-yield bond department in Beverly Hills at Mr. Milken's direction.  One individual described the partnership as "payola" for some of the customers who bought the preferred securities.  In a 98-count indictment in March, Mr. Milken was charged with racketeering, conspiracy and fraud.  Several of the charges are related to Drexel's role in the 1985 Storer buyout.  Mr. Milken is charged with causing Drexel to violate securities laws by buying and selling Storer common stock based on inside information it had because it was acting as Kohlberg Kravis's adviser.  While new charges cannot be brought against Drexel as a result of the firm's prior agreement to plead guilty to six felony counts, charges in relation to the Storer preferred stock could be brought against Mr. Milken and certain Drexel clients.  Arthur Liman, Mr. Milken's attorney, said, "Any such suggestion of wrongdoing by Michael Milken is totally untrue.  Two years of almost uninterrupted leaks are threatening the ability to provide a fair trial to Mike Milken."  David Solomon, former chief of Solomon Asset Management, is also understood to have personally benefited from the purchase of Storer warrants.  Mr. Solomon is said to have bought the Storer preferred securities for his fund in 1985 and the warrants for himself later.  Mr. Solomon has been cooperating with the government's investigation of Mr. Milken in exchange for a grant of immunity.  Neither he nor his attorney could be reached for comment.  Other customers who are said to have purchased the Storer preferred securities and participated in MacPherson Partners include Ostrander Capital Management, Boston, and Columbia Savings & Loan Association, Beverly Hills, Calif.  Participation in the partnership doesn't necessarily indicate a violation of criminal or civil law.  Legal experts say participation would only be a violation if managers of junk-bond portfolios personally owned the warrants and failed to disclose their ownership to clients.  Patsy Ostrander, who heads Ostrander Capital Management, declined to return phone calls.  Kenneth Heitz, general counsel of Columbia, said that all of Columbia's shareholders reaped substantial profits on both the preferred shares and the warrants and that no Columbia official benefited separately.  U.S. newsprint consumption by all users fell 1.5% in July to 953,730 metric tons from 967,960 a year earlier, according to a preliminary estimate by the American Newspaper Publishers Association.  The trade group said U.S. daily newspapers used 722,742 metric tons of newsprint last month, up 0.1% from 721,668 in July 1988.  Newsprint inventories for newspapers in the association's statistical sample averaged a 41-day supply in July, compared with a 51-day supply a year earlier.  The group said Canadian newsprint mills operated at 94% of capacity during the month and U.S. newsprint mills operated at 99.2% of capacity.  Istituto Finanziario Industriale, the Agnelli family holding company based in Turin, Italy, plans to buy back part of its privileged shares, an official said.  IFI, which controls 39% of the auto maker Fiat S.p.A., plans to ask shareholders to approve the buy-back at the Sept. 22 annual meeting.  IFI's ordinary shares all are owned by Agnelli family members.  Its privileged shares, which have voting rights only at extraordinary shareholders' meetings, are publicly traded.  The number of shares to be repurchased and the price range haven't been determined, and will be decided at the meeting, the official said, but noted it probably would be similar in size to buy-backs in the past three years; last year, for example, holders authorized IFI to buy back two million privileged shares valued at as much as 80 billion lire ($57.6 million).  Yesterday in Milan, IFI's privileged shares closed at 26,100 lire ($18.66), up 130 lire.  The IFI official denied that the planned buy-back was linked to Fiat's program authorizing through 1990 the purchase of as many as 60 million common shares and as many as 40 million preferred and savings shares, for a total of as much as one trillion lire.  Since the June announcement, Fiat shares have soared in Milan.  Like many thrift executives in the heyday of the Texas savings and loans, Paul Arlin Jensen enjoyed crisscrossing the country in style.  For Mr. Jensen, who sometimes posed as a neurologist to impress acquaintances, no run-of-the-mill Beechcraft or Lear would do.  His private plane was a Boeing 727, paid for with funds that federal prosecutors contend were bilked from two Texas savings and loans.  Now Mr. Jensen is hoping his less flamboyant side has impressed a federal court jury.  The jury began deliberations yesterday on 88 charges against him and six co-defendants accused of pocketing more than $166 million through a condominium-financing scheme that stripped $327 million from five savings and loans.  In closing arguments Tuesday, Assistant U.S. Attorney Roger McRoberts said his "particular favorite" among the charges is the one accusing Mr. Jensen of illegally transporting $2 million for the Boeing 727 purchase.  "Maybe instead of passing himself off as a neurologist he wanted to pretend he was president of American Airlines," Mr. McRoberts suggested.  For the jury, the tales of private jets, $4 million mansions and gold Rolex watches handed out like party favors were the juicy sidelights in a six-month lesson in how the thrift industry got where it is today.  The extravagances of the defendants would put the ignominious stars of the TV show "Dallas" to shame.  But the excesses were made possible by a more mundane and systematic problem than Hollywood would use: Savings and loans were flush with funds from brokered deposits -- certificates of deposit of $100,000 or more placed in specific institutions to draw favorable interest rates -- that made them ripe for fraud.  Mr. McRoberts told the jury that Mr. Jensen lured more than $60 million in brokered deposits into Lancaster First Federal Savings & Loan Association in the first three months that he controlled the thrift.  Prior to Mr. Jensen's acquisition in late 1982, the Lancaster thrift, located in a Dallas suburb, had no brokered funds.  Empire Savings & Loan Association of Mesquite, which lost the most money through the defendants' alleged scheme, saw its brokered deposits swell from $35 million in June 1982 to more than $240 million in December 1983.  In March 1984, Empire became the first Texas thrift ever closed by federal regulators.  "Without the money, there would have been no scheme to defraud," said Mr. McRoberts, one of five federal prosecutors assigned to the case, which was moved to Lubbock from Dallas on a change of venue requested by the defendants.  The prosecutors allege that Mr. Jensen and Empire's chairman, Spencer H. Blain Jr., received millions of dollars in kickbacks in exchange for providing loans for land acquisition and condominium construction concentrated along Interstate 30, east of Dallas.  The loans were based on fraudulently inflated appraisals, prosecutors said, and went to borrowers whose financial statements had been falsified to make the institutions appear creditworthy.  Lawyers for the seven defendants, including two real-estate appraisers, argued to the jury that the loans were a legitimate response to the real-estate boom sweeping Texas in the early 1980s.  The defense lawyers also argued that federal regulators encouraged thrifts to engage in risky lending to stay profitable.  Regulators then caused the bust, the defense lawyers contended, by hastily shutting Empire and the other thrifts.  "The government brought this case against these defendants to cover up their own colossal mistake," said Deborah Goodall, one of the attorneys for Mr. Blain.  Assistant U.S. Attorney Terry Hart took issue with Ms. Goodall's comment in his statements to the jury: "Is she arguing that Congress intended for Spencer Blain to get a $16 million kickback?" he asked.  Mr. Hart went on to remind the jurors that 100 other people, most of them borrowers, have been convicted and sentenced for crimes related to the condominium-financing scheme.  "This is the final step in the ladder, ladies and gentlemen," Mr. Hart said.  "What would truly be an injustice would be for those people to serve their time and for the people who made the most money to go free."  Switzerland's wholesale price index in July fell 0.3% from June, reflecting a decline in import prices, but rose 4.2% from July 1988, the government said.  The index, based on the year 1963 as 100, was at 180.1 in July.  In June, the index was up 4.6% on a year-to-year basis, and in July 1988, it was up 2.2% from a year earlier.  Britain's efforts to shrink its trade gap was dealt an unexpected setback when government figures showed a widening current-account deficit in July of #2.1 billion ($3.34 billion), up from #1.5 billion the previous month.  The monthly results surprised financial analysts and government officials alike, and set off a slide in the pound relative to the dollar and West German mark.  The upshot was solidification of the already widely held opinion that for months to come, the government will keep base rates at the current 14% or higher.  Beginning in June 1988, the Thatcher government pushed through 10 interest-rate increases in a campaign to cool off the British economy and quell the demand for imports.  A recent string of economic barometers has showed slowing economic activity, and even a lighter appetite for certain imports.  However, July's imports jumped #400 million from the previous month to #10.2 billion.  British exports slumped to #7.7 billion, #145 million lower than the previous month.  July's #2.5 billion deficit in merchandise was eased by a #400 million estimated surplus in so-called invisible items, which include services, earnings from foreign investments and official transfers.  Although the wider trade gap clearly was bad news for the U.K. economy, officials warned against attaching too much importance to it.  The Treasury said that the numbers may be adjusted downward later.  Britain's economic statistics often are revised, and even when they aren't, government officials question the reliability of a single month's figures.  Seasonal influences pushed up imports somewhat.  July usually brings heavy automobile purchases in Britain, which may account for a #78 million jump in auto imports in July.  Other distortions may have resulted from Britain's dock strikes, although government officials said it was difficult to measure the precise impact of the labor action.  Bill Martin, economist with UBS Phillips & Drew in London, said that despite the wider trade gap in July, "we're seeing a significant turning" in the British economy.  "Growth in the U.K. is falling," he said, adding that the trend will eventually whittle down the current-account deficit.  However, the continued strength in imports suggests that despite a slowing economy, foreign suppliers are hanging onto their share of the British market, raising questions about the U.K.'s long-term competitive standing.  A recent report by the Paris-based Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development concluded that in a majority of product groups, the U.K. lost world market share during the 1980s.  Separately, Britain's Central Statistical Office revised the figures for the 1988 current-account deficit, chopping it to #14.6 billion from an earlier estimate of #14.9 billion.  Howard J. Goberstein, a Treasury bond futures trader at the Chicago Board of Trade, pleaded innocent to federal charges of fraudulent trading and faces a Dec. 4 trial date.  That could be the first trial -- and therefore the first test of the government's evidence and legal theories -- stemming from the undercover investigation of commodities pit trading.  Mr. Goberstein, 33 years old, was named earlier this month in the government's sweeping indictments of 46 traders at the Board of Trade and Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  He was charged with racketeering, 24 counts of mail fraud and 103 violations of commodities laws.  The two other bond pit traders indicted, Melanie Rose Kosar and John Myskowski -- each on a single count of mail fraud and a single count of pre-arranged trading -- aren't scheduled to plead until next week.  They are both expected to plead guilty and possibly testify against Mr. Goberstein, according to defense lawyers.  FBI agent Michael Bassett, who posed as bond pit trader Michael McLoughlin, is expected to testify against Mr. Goberstein.  Dan Webb, Mr. Goberstein's lawyer, said his client is still trading, though only for his own account and not for customers.  Mr. Webb wouldn't comment on the case.  Anchorage agreed to sell its city-owned telephone system to Pacific Telecom Inc. for $412 million.  The deal requires approval by 60% of the city's voters.  An election is scheduled for Oct. 3.  If the sale wins approval, the city will use proceeds to pay $263 million in debt.  Pacific Telecom, Vancouver, Wash., also has agreed to retain for five years all current employees of the city's telephone company and to refrain from requesting new rate increases in that period.  In April, Anchorage requested bids on its telephone system, setting a minimum price of $400 million for its 115,000 lines.  Pacific Telecom was the sole bidder.  "We already are a major communications provider in the state of Alaska, and this fits well with our existing operations," said Brain Wirkkala, the company's treasurer.  Pacific Telecom, which owns a diverse group of communications concerns, earned $16.1 million on revenue of $160.2 million in its second quarter.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it downgraded its ratings on General Instrument Corp.'s 7.25% convertible subordinated debentures, due 2012, to Ba-1 from Baa-2 and on its commercial paper to prime-3 from prime-2.  The rating concern said the changes reflect General Instrument's program to provide more value for shareholders, which isn't likely to improve the company's leverage position in the intermediate term.  The program includes the recent buy-back of 6.8 million shares for $242 million.  Moody's said the company, though well-positioned in several key business segments, faces flattening earnings in the near term, as its debt load increases.  Based here, General Instrument has businesses in cable-television electronics, computer components, and wagering systems.  Thomas C. DeFazio, General Instrument's chief financial officer, said he was "surprised" that Moody's considered the buy-back of 20% of the company's stock "a significant enough event to cause the ratings change."  He said two other major rating concerns recently reaffirmed their grades on the company's debt.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, General Instrument shares closed at $31, down 37.5 cents.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Inter-American Development Bank -- $300 million of 8.4% bonds due Sept. 1, 2009, priced at 99.57 to yield 8.465%.  The noncallable issue is putable at par value on two dates, either in the 10th or in the 15th year.  The bonds were priced at a yield spread 20 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated triple-A by both Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  @ EUROBONDS  Hokkaido Electric Power Co. (Japan) -- $150 million of 9 1/8% bonds due Sept. 19, 1996, priced at 101.60 to yield 9.18% less full fees, via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd. Secured by statutory preferential right under the electric utility law of Japan.  Fees 1 7/8.  Mitsubishi Bank of Australia Ltd. (Japanese parent) -- $50 million of 9 1/2% callable bonds due Sept. 20, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 9.5% less full fees, via Mitsubishi Finance International.  Once-only call option Sept. 20, 1991, at par.  Fees 1 7/8.  Mercedes-Benz Credit of Canada Inc. -- 75 million Canadian dollars of 10 1/4% bonds due Sept. 21, 1994, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 10.31% less full fees, via Deutsche Bank Capital Markets.  Guaranteed by Mercedes-Benz Credit Corp. Fees 1 7/8.  Electric Power Development Co. (Japan) -- 65 million European currency units of 8 5/8% bonds due Sept. 27, 1996, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 8.72% less full fees, via Westdeutsche Landesbank.  Guaranteed by the government of Japan.  Fees 1 7/8.  Australian Gas & Light Co. -- 50 million Australian dollars of 16 1/2% bonds due Oct. 10, 1991, priced at 101.95 to yield 16.25% less full fees, via Credit Commercial de France.  Fees 1 1/4.  Hoesch International Finance BV (West German parent) -- 200 million marks of 7% bonds with equity-purchase warrants due Sept. 29, 1999, priced at 135, via Deutsche Bank.  Guaranteed by Hoesch AG.  Each 1,000 mark bond carries two warrants, exercisable from Sept. 29, 1989, through Sept. 28, 1994, into six company shares at 247 marks a share..  Dai-Ichi Katei Denki Co. (Japan) -- 80 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Feb. 29, 1994, with an indicated coupon of 0.375% at par via Banque Paribas Suisse.  Put option Feb. 29, 1992, at indicated 109 3/4 to yield 4.17%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Sept. 25, 1989, to Feb. 21, 1994, at 5% premium over closing share price Aug. 29, when terms are fixed.  MAZOWIECKI INDICATED Poland's Communists will get more cabinet seats.  Speaking at parliamentary caucuses, the Solidarity activist and prime minister-designate stressed that it would be risky not to reach agreement with the Communists, especially since they will control the army and security police.  He said "foreign policy will not be changed -- we are in the Warsaw Pact," but he vowed he would "never agree to be a puppet prime minister."  He is scheduled to be elected Eastern Europe's first non-Communist prime minister today and plans to present a government within a week  Bush indicated at a news conference that he is pleased with Gorbachev for intervening with Poland's Communists over their role in the new government.  ---  BALTIC PROTESTERS FORMED a human chain to repudiate Soviet rule.  Hundreds of thousands of residents linked hands across the three Soviet Baltic republics to mark the 50th anniversary of the Nazi-Soviet pact that ended their independence.  Lithuanians, Latvians and Estonians took up spots along a 370-mile route to demand that Moscow grant more freedom and admit it annexed their land by force.  Moscow concedes that a secret deal between Stalin and Hitler gave the Kremlin control of the Baltic states, but it maintains the nations joined the Soviet Union voluntarily.  Organizers expected 1.5 million of the republics' eight million residents to take part.  Initial reports indicated that more than one million had participated.  ---  Colombian police said they caught a pioneer of Colombian drug smuggling and another trafficker wanted in the U.S.  They also arrested five suspects in last week's assassination of a presidential candidate, which sparked the current crackdown.  Colombia's attorney general is expected to fly to Washington for talks on extradition procedures.  ---  Scientists sent final instructions nearly three billion miles to Voyager 2, hours before the spacecraft plunged into Neptune's magnetic field.  Earlier, Voyager sent back photos showing a blue rim on Triton, Neptune's biggest moon.  The spacecraft is scheduled to make its closest approach to the planet at about 8:56 p.m. PDT tonight.  --- South African police fired tear gas at Archbishop Tutu and several hundred children without warning after he had persuaded the youngsters to halt an anti-apartheid protest near Cape Town.  Tutu warned that South Africa is "on the brink of a major disaster" if the police aren't restrained.  A U.N. report said that although economic sanctions against South Africa are increasing, many loopholes exist to avoid them.  It said South Africa has used mislabeling, multination shipments and foreign registration to obtain and sell goods.  ---  Namibian guerrillas acknowledged they tortured political prisoners but invited observers to verify their claim that all such inmates are now free.  SWAPO says it released all its prisoners as part of a U.N.-sponsored plan to make Namibia independent of South Africa.  Former detainees charge the group still holds as many as 2,000 prisoners.  ---  Researchers are expected to announce today discovery of the defective gene that causes cystic fibrosis.  The breakthrough has been eagerly awaited since late 1986, when scientists found "markers" near the gene.  The discovery should permit research into prevention.  ---  Several supermarket chains said they wouldn't sell dairy products from cows treated with BGH, a genetically engineered growth hormone.  A coalition of consumer, environmental and farm groups has petitioned the FDA to halt the sale of such products until the long-term effects of the hormone can be studied.  ---  Pete Rose has reached an agreement with baseball Commissioner A. Bartlett Giamatti to settle accusations that the Cincinnati Reds manager bet on baseball games, sources said.  Rose, facing a possible lifetime ban, would be suspended.  Giamatti is expected to hold a news conference today.  ---  Spiritual leader Khamenei told Iran's Parliament to end its political differences and back Rafsanjani's proposed cabinet.  The president plans to drop the anti-Western Interior Minister despite a plea by a majority of deputies to keep him.  Debate on the issue is expected this weekend.  ---  A senior Chinese Communist blamed the rise of the democracy movement on party corruption and said the party should be purged of Western influences.  Meanwhile, the government removed the president of Beijing University, a center of unrest, and replaced him with a Marxist economist.  ---  Syria's militia allies threatened to shell any French warships that approach the Lebanese coast.  France says it has sent eight ships to the eastern Mediterranean to evacuate French nationals from Lebanon if necessary.  Meanwhile, Christian and Syrian forces fought sporadic duels around Beirut, killing one person and wounding 15. ---  Vietnam might send troops back to Cambodia if Phnom Penh requested them, Hanoi said.  Vietnam is scheduled to complete its withdrawal from Cambodia next month.  Last week, the Cambodian government said it might ask for the troops' return if it was threatened by Khmer Rouge guerrillas.  Peace talks in Paris are deadlocked.  When Frederick W. "Ted" Field cashed in his 50% interest in Field Enterprises Inc. in 1984, he used part of the $260 million he collected to produce a movie called "Revenge of the Nerds."  That investment was the first in a series of film-making, real-estate and other deals that have helped the elusive former race-car driver nearly double his fortune.  Today, he has a piece of the action -- about $40 million -- in Sir James Goldsmith's $21.7 billion bid for British-based B.A.T Industries PLC.  And Chicagoans are wondering what role Mr. Field might play in the future of the B.A.T unit that gave him his name and his wealth -- the Marshall Field's department store chain.  The bid for B.A.T is controversial in Chicago because of Sir James's stated intention to break up the British conglomerate, selling off its retail stores, including Marshall Field's and Saks Fifth Avenue.  Though already foreign-wned, the stores have been given considerable independence and support by B.A.T.  Mr. Field's good fortune has drawn the attention of leading takeover artists -- T. Boone Pickens, Carl Icahn and Sir James all have come to him for money when putting tender syndicates together -- and Mr. Field made good money on Sir James's offers for Goodyear and Crown Zellerbach before joining in his current bid for B.A.T. Born in Chicago 37 years ago, Mr. Field spent much of his youth in Anchorage, Alaska.  The son of Marshall Field IV and his second wife, the present Katherine W. Fanning, Ted Field lived with his mother in Chicago after his parents were divorced in 1963.  Three years later, she married Larry Fanning, a former editor of the Fields' now-defunct Chicago Daily News, and they set out for Alaska, where they took over the Anchorage Daily News.  After her second husband's death in 1971, Ms. Fanning succeeded him as editor and publisher, at times relying on infusions of cash from her wealthy son to keep the paper afloat. (She later went on to become editor, for five years, of the Christian Science Monitor.)  "Growing up in Alaska," Ms. Fanning says, "Ted had a lot of dreams about where his life would go.  One of them was to drive across the country."  On a break from the University of Chicago (one of "seven or eight" colleges his friends recall him attending), Mr. Field did just that and headed for California.  "He got to Newport Beach," his mother says, "and he just knew that he had found his place, his home."  Once on the Coast, Mr. Field cultivated passions that ranged from racing Porsche 935s to producing movies in Hollywood.  Marshall V, his 48-year-old half brother, set aside a fund at Field Enterprises, a former Field executive recalls, "that was Ted's movie fund.  He'd buy scripts at $50,000 a pop, and we'd just hope he wouldn't get to the bottom of the pile before he had a hit."  Though mocked as a rich kid when he entered car racing, Ted Field did well enough to win the Daytona 24-hour Pepsi Challenge as part of a three-man team in 1979.  Mr. Field hasn't given an interview in 10 years.  Robert L. Burkett, his spokesman, describes himself as "Ted's alter ego."  He says that "Ted wanted to prove something with his racing.  All the money in the world won't help you achieve in that sport, and he wanted to do something where his money wouldn't matter."  Eventually giving up racing, Mr. Field formed Interscope Communications, his umbrella for film making, real estate, trading and investments.  And although Hollywood is tricky, his instincts have paid off.  In 1985, he bought Panavision, the movie-camera company, from Warner Communications for $52 million, only to turn around and sell it to Lee International of Britain for $142 million in 1987.  While not always critically acclaimed ("That's not our goal," says Mr. Burkett, who is Interscope's senior vice president for corporate affairs), Interscope has had a number of box-office successes with such films as "Outrageous Fortune," "Cocktail," and "Three Men and a Baby."  And it is now one of the leading independent production companies.  Walt Disney Corp.'s hot Touchstone Productions recently acquired a first option on all Interscope film projects.  Mr. Field's workday usually begins before 6 a.m., when he starts trading stocks and commodities from the phone in his black Mercedes 560 on his way to his Murdock Plaza office in the Westwood section of Los Angeles.  He owns the building. (A security consultant he hired to help design his 14th floor office suggested, oddly, that a chute be installed that would use blasting caps to speed Mr. Field's exit in an emergency.  The moorings for the contraption actually were installed on the ground, but the chute was never put in.  Mr. Field has other escapes.  He breaks for lunch when the markets close at 1 p.m. Pacific Time, usually enjoying salmon two flights up at the Regency Club.  He doesn't take phone calls at the table.  Two evenings a week he plays basketball in a league.  And at some point nearly every day he plays tennis at home in Beverly Hills, where he lives with his third wife.  Nobody seems to think of him anymore as a race-car driver, though he still wears a bandage on his left hand to mask two fingers he hurt in a racing accident.  "He left his car-racing mode" in the early '80s, says Clay Hamner, the president of Montrose Capital Corp., in Durham, N.C. Mr. Hamner, who has invested money with Mr. Field, speculates the change had to do with getting older and more mature: "Ted is a serious investor now."  The Field family fortune was made by Mr. Field's great-great-grandfather, the original Marshall Field.  His Marshall Field & Co. opened here in 1856, as one of the nation's first -- and most successful -- department stores.  The store's legendary motto, "Give the lady what she wants," carried a promise of customer satisfaction that inspired a number of new practices -- deliveries, tea and dining-room service, a liberal exchange policy -- that became standards of retailing.  Today, despite the encroachments of Bloomingdale's and Neiman Marcus, among others, Marshall Field's maintains a leading, 15% share of the retail market here, analysts estimate.  B.A.T, which bought Marshall Field's in 1982, doesn't report results of its units.  But analysts estimate Field's sales were about $1 billion last year, with pretax earnings of about $67 million on an above-average retail margin of about 6.7%.  Despite the name, the Field family hasn't had much to do with Marshall Field's for quite a long time.  The trustees of Marshall Field I's estate sold 90% of the stock in the store to its officers and managers back in 1917.  And, though Marshall III and Marshall IV, Mr. Field's grandfather and father, were directors, no Field has had an ownership interest in the stores since the family's remaining holdings were sold following Marshall IV's death in 1965.  The bustling main store occupies a city block in Chicago's Loop and still has a turn-of-the century, 12-story atrium and a 6,000-square-foot rotunda decorated with Louis Tiffany mosaic glass.  Though the bargain basement is gone, Field's still caters to everyone from office clerks to the jet set.  "It's like going to visit a wonderful palace filled with good things for everybody," says Elizabeth Cittadine, a Chicago school administrator who worked part time at Fields in the 1970s while she was in graduate school.  She still takes her son to Field's Walnut Room at Christmas time for its trademark Frango-mint chocolate ice-cream pie and a look at the State Street windows and the 45-foot tree.  If Mr. Field should now turn out to be an ally in an effort that puts Marshall Field's into unfriendly hands, it would contribute to his local reputation as a spoiled young man with little concern for the effects of his moneymaking on others.  The last time the press-shy Ted Field had his name in the news was five years ago when he brought about the sale of another Chicago institution founded by Fields -- the Chicago Sun-Times, a paper launched in 1944 by Marshall III as a liberal alternative to the then-arch-conservative Chicago Tribune.  Ted Field took no active part in running the business, but he owned the paper in an unusual arrangement in which voting stock was split 50-50 with his elder half-brother Marshall V.  In 1983, Mr. Field wanted out of the Sun-Times and out of Field Enterprises' other ventures -- including five UHF television stations; Cabot, Cabot & Forbes, a Boston real-estate company; and World Book Encyclopedia.  Marshall V, who was the active chairman of Field Enterprises and, for 10 years, the publisher of the Sun-Times, put up some resistance to Ted Field's demands for liquidation, especially because they meant selling the Sun-Times.  But under the complex ownership agreement drafted by lawyers for their late father's estate and known as "the bible," Marshall had either to buy out his brother's share at a price matching the highest actual bidder or accede to his wishes to sell.  After vowing not to sell to the controversial Rupert Murdoch's News America Corp., in the end Marshall capitulated to the Australian-born magnate's $100 million offer, and each brother wound up with about $260 million for his Field Enterprises holdings. (Today, the Sun-Times is owned by an investment group led by Adler & Shaykin, a New York investment firm.)  Marshall V and Ted Field have always been a study in contrasts.  Nine years older than Ted, Marshall is a leading member of Chicago society, lives on an estate in Lake Forest and is president of the Art Institute of Chicago.  Virginia-born (his mother, the present Joanne Bross, is a member of the wealthy Bass family) and Harvard-educated, Marshall was groomed to run the family companies and, upon his father's death in 1965, took an active role.  Four years later, at the age of 29, he was named publisher of the Sun-Times and of the afternoon paper, the Chicago Daily News.  While he opposed Ted's liquidation demand, he was enriched by it.  And the half-brothers have subsequently done "equally well with their investments," according to a close associate.  Each is now estimated to be worth more than $450 million.  But the two have pursued quite different strategies.  "Ted will go for doubling his investment overnight, willing to lose his whole stake," the associate says.  "Marshall wants 12%, compounded annually."  When Ted bought flashy Panavision, Marshall acquired Muzak and My Weekly Reader.  While Ted pocketed $90 million from his resale of the camera company, Marshall has retained and fine-tuned the leading purveyors of background music and classroom newspapers.  Ted bought Green Acres, the Beverly Hills estate of silent-movie star Harold Lloyd. (He currently is reported to be buying comedian Joan Rivers's Bel-Air mansion for his second wife, Barbara.) Marshall bought Funk & Wagnall's Encyclopedia.  Marshall also bought out his brother's interest in Cabot, Cabot & Forbes and now presides over its $1.6 billion in real-estate assets.  Looked at a different way, Ted Field's eagerness to break up Field Enterprises may have cost the brothers a pretty penny.  By selling their UHF stations and World Book publishing operations before a run-up in media and publishing prices, one former associate estimates, the Fields failed to realize as much as $1 billion apiece.  "Ted and his lawyers gave the company 11 months to sell off everything," says the associate.  "The 'bible' allowed for them to hold unsold properties in trust until better prices came along, but he wanted it all then."  Mr. Burkett dismisses such criticism as "second guessing" and says Mr. Field has "no regrets for the prices he got.  The point is that he was able to take those assets and make them work for him."  And what of the possibility that Mr. Field might buy the Marshall Field's department stores himself?  "He could get the money to buy Field's in one day," says his sometime investment partner Mr. Hamner.  But close associates believe it unlikely that he has his eye on the retailer.  "He'd never buy it, it's the wrong name," asserts a family acquaintance, alluding to the rivalry between Ted and Marshall.  If the name of the store were Ted Field's?  "That's a different story," the associate smiles.  Ted Field isn't specific about his intentions.  Through his spokesman, Mr. Burkett, he says he has been a partner with Sir James in the past and that the B.A.T offer isn't a remarkable undertaking.  "It's pure coincidence" that B.A.T owns Marshall Field's, Mr. Burkett says.  But does that mean Ted Field definitely won't attempt to acquire the chain?  "It's not going to happen, but we never say never," Mr. Burkett responds.  Either way, Mr. Field's participation in the B.A.T offer -- which wasn't known to Marshall Field's management before The Wall Street Journal broached the subject -- should cause a stir in Chicago.  Philip B. Miller, Marshall Field's chairman and chief executive officer, is in the middle of a $120 million renovation of the State Street flagship store, which is an anchor for the city's $2 billion effort to revitalize its historic shopping street.  Mr. Miller, who has led the 24-store chain for six years and has become a major figure on Chicago's economic development commission, says neither Sir James nor Mr. Field is welcome here.  Mayor Richard M. Daley has sent letters to President Bush and Secretary of State James A. Baker III urging them to scrutinize Sir James's leveraged bid and the effects it might have on the 55,000 B.A.T employees in the U.S.  While he won't comment directly on the prospects of a takeover, Mr. Miller says B.A.T "bought Field's as a long-term, quality investment, and they're treating it that way."  He worries about whether a new owner -- burdened with debt, as Sir James's group would be -- would proceed with the huge renovation that is supposed to be finished in 1992.  And he also frets about the future of the chain's expansion plans in the Midwest and Texas.  Field's has just entered Ohio with a new Columbus store.  Mr. Miller, who has said that under the circumstances he now may try to buy Field's himself, says Marshall Field's has averaged 7% annual increases in comparable store sales over the past five years.  And he sees more growth ahead.  Speaking of his flagship, he says, "This will be the finest store in the world.  There will be nothing like it."  CBS Inc. agreed to pay $300 million to broadcast the 1994 Winter Olympics, further evidence that the network is betting the ranch on sports.  At a news conference, Neal Pilson, president of CBS Sports, said CBS was intent on getting the 1994 Winter Games, in Lillehammer, Norway, partly because CBS also has the 1992 Winter Olympics, in Albertville, France, for which it paid $243 million.  Mr. Pilson said the network wanted to take advantage of "this one-time only situation to combine our sales and marketing and production efforts on two Olympics {within} two years."  Olympics traditionally have been held every four years, with Winter and Summer Games in the same year.  But the International Olympic Committee decided to break the pattern and alternate Winter and Summer Games every two years, starting with the Lillehammer games.  The three networks originally were due to bid on the 1994 Winter Olympics next month, but one network source said the International Olympic Committee recently approached the networks and asked if any was willing to pay roughly $290 million for the 1994 rights.  According to the source, NBC, a unit of General Electric Co., said it didn't want to bid that high, but "wanted to be involved if the price was lower."  CBS said it was interested, and after negotiations with the committee, agreed yesterday to pay $300 million, having been told the other networks wouldn't be given another chance to bid.  Capital Cities/ABC Inc., which apparently didn't bid on the Lillehammer Olympics, declined to comment.  NBC issued a statement yesterday saying that, after review, the network had decided the Olympic Committee's minimum was "substantially in excess of what the value would be to NBC and its affiliates."  The price CBS has agreed to pay, while high, wasn't greeted with shock by Wall Street analysts.  Indeed, CBS insists it will make money on the 1994 Winter Games.  Peter Appert, a media analyst for C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc., said the $300 million agreement shows "CBS's willingness to bid up to get the sports franchise.  This is a high price, but it isn't outrageous compared to other recent Olympics fees."  After getting caught in a bidding war for the 1988 Winter Olympics in Calgary, for which it paid $309 million and had a loss of at least $65 million, ABC wasn't expected to go after the 1994 games.  NBC recently agreed to pay about $400 million for the 1992 Summer Olympics in Barcelona.  Summer Games normally cost more because viewership is generally higher.  An NBC source said NBC wasn't interested in bidding high for the Norway games, partly because the time difference will mean that many weekday events will have to be taped for prime-time showing, and so may attract less interest than live broadcasts.  For CBS, which hasn't broadcast the Winter Olympics since 1960, there are reasons why the price seems worth it.  After all, said an NBC spokesman, "CBS needs events like this.  You can't go out and buy a 'Cosby,' but you can buy special sports events."  "The Cosby Show" is one of several popular sitcoms that has entrenched NBC in first place among the networks in the prime-time ratings, while most weeks CBS is a distant second, and often third.  Indeed, CBS has been pursuing a special-events strategy, especially with sports, for some time in its efforts to turn the network around.  Last winter, CBS shocked the broadcast world by bidding $1.1 billion for the rights to four years of major league baseball, starting in 1990.  CBS also has exclusive or partial rights to the National Football League, college football, college basketball and the National Basketball Association, as well as leading golf and tennis events.  The network now heralds itself as "the undisputed leader in coverage of sports world-wide."  "This isn't a sports decision," said Mr. Pilson of the Olympics bid.  "It's a company decision.  We're looking to get this company No. 1 again in prime time.  We think the Olympics and major league baseball are building blocks in this process.  The costs are high, but the performance is more assured than with prime-time specials."  Major league baseball, particularly the league playoffs and World Series, will help CBS promote its new fall season.  The Winter Olympics fall during the February sweeps, a time when CBS-affiliated stations around the country take audience ratings that determine how much they can charge for ads.  Bristol-Myers Co. has become the target of an unusual and potentially damaging boycott by the medical community because of its plans to advertise a new infant formula directly to the public.  Though the quality of the product isn't in dispute, many pediatricians and hospitals say they won't recommend the new formula.  Moreover, they have stopped recommending the use of other Bristol-Myers formula products as well.  The scope of the boycott isn't yet clear, but the fallout for Bristol-Myers could be severe.  The company is a major producer of infant formula, with 35% of the $1.6 billion U.S. market, and most parents' purchases are based on doctors' recommendations.  The controversy comes just weeks before the planned debut of an advertising blitz for the new formula.  The product, a joint effort of Bristol-Myers and Gerber Products Co., is being made by Bristol-Myers and marketed as Gerber Baby Formula.  The product itself hasn't come under fire, but many pediatricians are incensed by the ad campaign because formula makers traditionally have avoided direct pitches to parents.  Doctors fear the ads will encourage women to give up breast-feeding.  Not surprisingly, physicians also aren't eager to give up their considerable influence in the formula market.  A number of doctors have embarked on a letter-writing campaign, telling Bristol-Myers they won't recommend the new formula.  Many others are also boycotting Enfamil, Bristol-Myers's leading formula made by its Mead Johnson subsidiary, as well as other Bristol-Myers formulas.  One doctor, Frank Oski, says he was so angry he kicked the Mead Johnson sales representative out of his hospital and told her not to talk to his residents.  Dr. Oski, who practices in Baltimore, is also refusing to accept the Bristol-Myers perks -- such as providing scholarships for residents -- that have earned infant formula makers a reputation as being the "helpful ally" of the health-care profession.  Another pediatrician, Thomas Philpot, Rockledge, Fla., says he's so disappointed in Gerber that he no longer plans to recommend any of its baby food products.  "I'm convinced that Bristol-Myers's decision is a serious mistake and feel compelled to take serious action," says Paul Dworkin, a pediatrician in Farmington, Conn.  Though there doesn't appear to be any organized effort behind the boycott, interviews with more than 25 doctors around the country suggest it is widespread.  Among hospitals that also are protesting, those that have stopped using Enfamil routinely in their nurseries include Yale New Haven Hospital, New Haven, Conn.; Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine, Baltimore, and St. Luke's Hospital, Kansas City, Mo.  "This could be very dangerous for Gerber and Bristol-Myers," says Al Ries, chairman of Trout & Ries, a Greenwich, Conn.-based marketing consultancy.  Mr. Ries says Bristol-Myers's rivals will use the boycott to their own advantage.  "The industry will go out of its way to bad-mouth the new product."  Executives at Bristol-Myers acknowledge they have had their hands full responding to a flood of letters from angry doctors.  But the New York-based pharmaceutical giant says it believes the controversy will blow over in time.  Company executives say Bristol-Myers is simply adapting to a changing marketplace in which mothers are exercising more authority when it comes to infant formula selection.  "Mothers are viewing these products more as consumer-oriented brands," says Don Harris, president of Bristol-Myers's nutritional group.  "At this point in time with regard to routine infant formula, there are some mothers and some physicians who are quite willing for the mother to make the decisions in that category," he says.  The controversy over direct advertising erupted last year when Nestle S.A.'s Carnation unit broke with industry tradition in an attempt to crack the market with its Good Start and Good Nature formulas.  The American Association of Pediatrics strongly criticized Carnation and the company dropped what it billed as an "information" campaign about Good Start. (Carnation still advertises its Good Nature formula for older babies directly to consumers.) Until the latest flap over Gerber and Bristol-Myers's proposed advertising campaign, doctors hadn't tried to wield their economic clout.  As if in anticipation of the wrath of the medical community, Bristol-Myers and Gerber have tried to sidestep the controversy with ads that in fact emphasize the importance of breast-feeding.  But the ads suggest that if mothers can't or don't want to breast-feed, the Gerber formula is the next-best thing -- a claim that leaves many doctors gasping.  "I was even more upset and emotionally charged after seeing it," says David Boettger, a pediatrician in Salt Lake City. (Bristol-Myers has been previewing the ad campaign with many physicians.)  In an effort to put out the fire, Bristol-Myers executives have been working overtime, traveling the medical circuit in an apparent attempt to placate as many doctors as possible.  One top executive, in fact, is traveling to the hospital at the University of South Florida at Tampa to meet with staff pediatricians today.  "He's probably going to apologize for this whole thing.  He'll say that Mead Johnson doesn't advertise its product directly to consumers," says Philip Adler, a pediatrician at the University of South Florida.  "But it's not going to wash with me.  I'm going to show them I'm really angry.  If they persist, they're going to suffer some economic consequences."  If the discontent with Bristol-Myers spreads, it could play to the favor of its major competitors.  They include Abbott Laboratories, which has a 48% share, and American Home Products, which has a 10% share.  An Abbott spokeswoman said yesterday that the company has no plans to change the way it markets infant formula.  Bristol-Myers, however, insists its ads, created by WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson unit, are responsible and go out of their way to promote breast-feeding.  "There's apprehension about change," Mr. Harris says.  "We would not be making this move if we did not have the extensive research to show that there is a large silent majority of doctors out there who support this."  ---  Ad Notes....  GOODBYE GOOFY: General Motors Corp.'s Chevrolet division plans to discontinue a series of ads that used Walt Disney Co. characters to tout the new Chevy Lumina family of vehicles after a few ads this fall launching the new Lumina APV minivan.  Chevy officials said the Disney campaign was a success, but it was time to move on.  Chevrolet began using Disney characters this spring as part of a joint promotion with Disney's new Disney-MGM Studios Themepark at the Walt Disney World resort near Orlando, Fla.  J.P. MORGAN FINALISTS: A spokesman confirmed that J.P. Morgan narrowed its ad agency search to three finalists for its $8 million to $10 million account: Backer Spielvogel Bates, Della Femina McNamee WCRS and TBWA.  The three agencies have been given creative assignments, and a winner will be chosen within about a month, the spokesman said.  Chiat/Day/Mojo and Lintas were among the other agencies that had been considered.  SUIT SETTLED: Marketing Corp. of America and its Ally & Gargano unit settled their suit against Ally's former president, William W. Bishop.  The suit charged Mr. Bishop with violating a non-compete clause by wooing away the Waldenbooks account from Ally when he joined Woodbridge, N.J.-based CHC Advertising; Mr. Bishop countersued.  According to terms, both suits will be dropped, CHC will pay an undisclosed amount to Ally, and it won't solicit certain Ally clients.  A CHC spokesman said, "the legal bills of pursuing the suit would have been greater than the settlement cost, and payments will be made over a two-year period.  This will in no way hinder CHC's new business efforts, even those involving Ally clients."  ACCOUNT SEARCH: National Bancshares Corp. of Texas, San Antonio, Texas, hired Oxtoby-Smith, New York, to act as consultant for an ad agency search.  National Bancshares' account is valued at $3 million to $4 million.  Westar Group Ltd. said it agreed to sell its 5.3% stake in Westcoast Energy Inc. but will first offer the stock to its own holders as part of a preferred-share redemption plan.  Westar, a diversified natural resources company based in Vancouver, British Columbia, said it will offer either C$26.97 (US$22.98) in cash or 1.449 Westcoast Energy shares for each of a series of cumulative redeemable exchangeable preferred shares that yield C$2.6875 a year.  The company said it currently owns about 2.58 million common shares in Westcoast Energy, a Vancouver natural-gas pipeline operator and oil and gas producer.  The offer values the stock of Westcoast Energy at C$18.61 a share.  The far-reaching thrift-rescue legislation, signed by President Bush two weeks ago, is starting to take a significant bite out of savers' returns.  In just the past two days, many of the thrifts offering the highest yields across the country have lowered their deposit rates by at least 25 basis points (a basis point is one-hundredth of a percentage point), according to Noberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote Money Markets, a New York firm that tracks rates.  Some insolvent thrifts, which are just starting to receive lower-cost funds from the federal government because of the legislation, have dropped their deposit rates as much as 50 to 65 basis points, and have stopped buying high-priced brokered deposits.  In contrast, most large banks have slightly increased their deposit rates in the past three weeks.  Bids for deposits in the money markets yesterday showed "a clear impact of the new bailout plan, in terms of rate reduction," Mr. Mehl said.  That's good news for the thrift industry and for the Resolution Trust Corp., the new government agency charged with disposing of broke S&Ls.  If thrifts can eliminate just half of the premium they have to pay in comparison with commercial banks, their core earnings could jump 25% to 50% or more, and the Resolution Trust Corp. will have an easier time peddling the insolvent institutions to acquirers.  "It's happening.  It's exciting," says William Gibson, the normally reserved president of American Federal Bank of Dallas.  But the trend spells an eventual end to the bargains offered to depositors by both desperate and healthy thrifts, and a sharp reduction in business for the brokers who helped those depositors find the highest yields.  "There's hardly any Texas premium left," moans William Goldsmith, a deposit broker and president of Professional Asset Securities Inc. in Solana Beach, Calif.  What's worse, he adds, some of his best clients, thrifts under Resolution Trust conservatorship, have taken themselves off his marketing list in the past several days, apparently because they have been able to tap the government corporation's coffers.  He won't name them, but two obvious beneficiaries of Resolution Trust funds are University Savings of Houston and Gill Savings of Hondo, Texas, two of the biggest basket cases under government control, and perpetually among the highest bidders for deposits.  As of Monday, University dropped its rates on certificates of deposit to 8.25% across the board.  Six-month CDs had been 8.75%.  Gill has decreased its rates for large six-month CDs to 8.75% from 9.4% since Aug. 1.  The trend at Gill and University reflects infusions of Resolution Trust deposits, says William Roelle, the director of the agency's division of resolutions and operations.  So far, the trust has plowed $921 million into 11 thrifts, replacing high-cost brokered deposits with money having an initial rate of 8.79%.  That rate may be reduced soon, because rates offered by healthy institutions are starting to fall as competition from insolvent ones fades.  The trust doesn't want to price its deposits lower than normal retail rates.  The impact of the trust's actions will soon accelerate, because the agency plans to deposit as much as $15 billion by the end of September in the highest-yielding thrifts in its conservatorship program.  Mr. Roelle says sharp rate drops can be expected at these institutions, but cautions that "it will take time to see the impact on everybody's cost of funds."  Moreover, there are about 350 troubled or weak S&Ls that aren't in conservatorship, and may need to bid for deposits to maintain liquidity.  But thrift experts are betting that the national impact will be significant -- and long-lasting -- because the thrift rescue is having positive effects other than the Resolution Trust's infusion.  Most S&Ls can't grow much because of new capital restrictions, so demand for deposits is very weak.  Also, many depositors, reassured by the bill's passage, are flocking back to troubled thrifts, without demanding a high premium.  MeraBank of Phoenix, Ariz., for instance, has dropped its six-month CD rate to 8.55% from 9.8% in the past three weeks.  Five of its biggest Arizona competitors are in conservatorship, and are under marching orders from the trust to decrease rates as aggressively as the market allows.  Meanwhile, depositors appear to have relaxed, after making heavy withdrawals from MeraBank when some of its financial problems were disclosed several months ago.  "I don't think the RTC has pumped any money in, but things have begun to subside because the public realizes the (rescue) has the full faith and credit of the government behind it," says Gene Rice, MeraBank's chairman.  Similarly, Gibraltar Savings of Beverly Hills, Calif., has stopped offering to top its competitors' deposit rates by a full percentage point.  It experienced a run on deposits when its insolvency became apparent earlier this year, but has since entered conservatorship, restored its deposit base to the 1988 level and sold some assets to increase liquidity.  Gibraltar, Merabank and at least one-third of the rest of the thrift industry have greatly reduced or even stopped mortgage lending because of their lack of real capital.  They won't have any great need for new deposits until they have been bought by strong companies or laboriously rebuilt their capital position.  Apart from some pockets of high demand for deposits by certain troubled or restructuring thrifts, "there will be a secular decline in demand for CDs" by S&Ls, predicts Richard Pratt, chairman of Merrill Lynch's Capital Markets Group.  Healthy or recapitalized thrifts are already benefiting.  "We're starting to see some positive effects from the bill," says James Montgomery, chairman of one of Gibraltar's most direct competitors, Great Western Savings of Beverly Hills.  Because of weak loan demand and because "we're seeing more sanity in the marketplace," Great Western has recently been driving deposit rates down by five to 10 basis points each week, while giant World Savings of Oakland, Calif., has been reducing rates by 10 to 15 basis points.  Kenneth Thorn, president of United Savings Association of Texas, a thrift that was recapitalized last year by a group led by Lewis Ranieri, says his thrift has been aggressively reducing its rates, managing since late July to cut in half the premium it pays over the yield offered by large Texas banks.  "The psychology of the marketplace has changed," he says.  One result of that change is that United's interest spread has improved by 45 to 50 basis points, Mr. Thorn says, increasing profitability.  If the whole portfolio reprices at current rates, that would mean an additional $5 million a year in net income, he estimates.  "Nobody was making money at the old rates," he says.  A federal grand jury indicted two former co-owners of Guaranty Federal Savings & Loan Association of Dallas on charges that they conspired to defraud the thrift of $10 million.  Paul Sau-Ki Cheng, 34 years old, and Simon Edward Heath, 35, are accused in the 17-count indictment of causing the thrift to lend $10 million on an over-valued piece of Florida property that they owned through Pacific Realty Corp.  Messrs.  Cheng and Heath, who could not be reached for comment, had been under investigation for at least seven months by the Justice Department's Bank Fraud Task Force in Dallas.  Spokesmen for the U.S. Department of Justice could not be reached for comment on details of the charges.  Guaranty Federal was placed in receivership by federal thrift regulators in September 1988 and was acquired with two other thrifts in a joint venture led by Temple-Inland Inc. of Diboll, Texas.  The institution is now known as Guaranty Federal Savings Bank.  A House panel asked the chairman and chief executive officer of PaineWebber Group Inc. to testify in the congressional investigation of influence-peddling at the Department of Housing and Urban Development.  In addition, PaineWebber disclosed that one of its first vice presidents, Lance Wilson, a central figure in the unfolding HUD scandal, asked to be relieved of his daily responsibilities at the firm.  PaineWebber, which said it granted Mr. Wilson's request for administrative leave with pay, also said it will "cooperate fully" with congressional investigators.  PaineWebber announced two weeks ago that it was conducting an internal investigation of its HUD-related activities.  The announcement followed disclosures that the company had obtained a lucrative contract last year to serve as a HUD financial adviser even though a HUD panel had recommended that the contract go to another firm.  Mr. Wilson, who was senior HUD official until 1984, advised PaineWebber on its contract proposal.  Yesterday, the securities firm's chairman and chief executive, Donald Marron, was asked to testify Sept. 27 before the House Government Operations employment and housing subcommittee, which is probing the HUD scandal.  Mr. Wilson has been subpoenaed to appear that day, but has notified lawmakers that he will invoke his Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination.  In a letter to Mr. Marron released yesterday, Rep. Tom Lantos (D., Calif.), the panel's chairman, asked the firm to be prepared to disclose findings from its internal study.  And in references to Mr. Wilson, the lawmaker wrote that PaineWebber should also describe "company policy on influence-peddling by its employees to secure contracts," as well as any limitations it places on outside consulting work by employees.  "Conversations with PaineWebber officials indicate that they intend to cooperate fully with the subcommittee," said Stuart Weisberg, the panel's staff director.  A PaineWebber spokesman said James C. Treadway Jr., the firm's general counsel, "is the appropriate person to testify" before the congressional committee.  Mr. Treadway, a former member of the Securities and Exchange Commission, is leading the firm's internal investigation and "is the most experienced PaineWebber executive on this subject," the spokesman said.  "The internal investigation is still under way and we have not yet uncovered any evidence of wrongdoing or, for that matter, anything inconsistent with the firm's high standards of business ethics," he said.  The subcommittee is investigating reports that Mr. Wilson did HUD-related consulting work for private interests while at PaineWebber.  Further, the panel is probing whether he played a role in getting HUD to award the $1.3 million financial-adviser contract to the firm.  A former PaineWebber vice president, Henry Edelman, said Mr. Wilson had provided him with "technical advice" in putting together the company's proposal to advise HUD on the sale of government securities.  Mr. Edelman said Mr. Wilson also "promoted" the use of then-HUD Secretary Samuel Pierce's former New York law firm, Battle Fowler, in connection with the sales.  Mr. Wilson had been Mr. Pierce's executive assistant at HUD.  After leaving HUD, Mr. Wilson became involved as an investor in HUD projects and reaped substantial profits from his activities, according to HUD documents.  He joined PaineWebber in 1986.  Last week, Mr. Wilson's Washington attorney, Raymond Banoun, said in a letter to Rep. Lantos that some lawmakers had "adversely prejudged" Mr. Wilson and were intent on vilifying him.  Yesterday, Mr. Banoun said that Mr. Wilson didn't want PaineWebber "caught in the middle" and that he requested a leave so that he would be "freer to talk."  The PaineWebber spokesman said yesterday: "Our decision to grant Mr. Wilson an administrative leave in no way implies any wrongdoing on his part or PaineWebber's part and to conclude otherwise would be inaccurate and inappropriate."  Calgene Inc., a biotechnology company, said it may have found a way to increase a potato's immunity to certain viruses.  The Davis, Calif., company said initial results from field tests with Russet Burbank potatoes in Idaho indicate that potato plants engineered for resistance to two common potato viruses are showing "consistent immunity" to them.  Currently, the viruses reduce the U.S. potato crop.  Calgene disclosed the results at the first symposium on the Molecular Biology of the Potato, held in Bar Harbor, Maine.  Earlier this year, the company received a patent on a genetically engineered tomato that remains firm longer than untreated tomatoes.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  BARBIE, A WELL-GROOMED PLATINUM BLONDE standing less than a foot tall, arrived in 1959 as toylands first "fashion doll."  Her debut was greeted with skepticism.  No child (or, more importantly, no parent) would buy a full-fashioned doll, the experts said.  Last Year, Barbie and her well-dressed playmates produced more than $450 million for Mattel Inc. of California.  In 30 years, children have bought and dressed more than 500 million of them.  Mattel figures that 90% of girls aged 3 to 11 own at least one Barbie.  Ruth Handler, whose husband, Elliott, had started Mattel, created Barbie, naming her after their daughter Barbara.  When Barbie caught on (351,000 were sold the first year at $3 a copy) Mrs. Handler produced Barbie's friend Ken, named for their son, a gallery of companions and a stable of pets and favorite cars (the latest, a Ferrari).  Barbie, who began as a teen-age fashion model, has appeared as a ballerina, a nurse, a flight attendant, an astronaut, a candy striper, a TV newscaster and a rock star.  Each role, of course, meant a fresh wardrobe.  Mattel sells some 20 million new outfits a year at $1 to $8 apiece.  The Handlers themselves did not fare quite as well.  In 1974, the Securities and Exchange Commission descended on the company, charging that it had been reporting false earnings to keep the stock price high.  The Handlers were forced out as directors and co-chairmen (but not as stockholders) and left saying they "deeply regretted" any damage.  But Ruth Handler hadn't lost her creative touch.  After undergoing a mastectomy in 1970, she found that no one was producing suitable prostheses.  So she designed her own, called "Nearly Me," and thus began another successful business.  And doll makers didn't forget the Handlers.  This year they were inducted into the toy industry's Hall of Fame at a New York gala.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ NEGATIVE  @Hechinger Co. $ .27 $ .40 (4) $ .42 (10) 32.50  @Deere & Co. $1.30 ... $1.44 (15) 9.72  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  JACK KILBY HADN"T ANY NOTION what a fight he'd have with Robert N. Noyce, or that the two of them would start the second industrial revolution when the idea for the microchip came to him in July 1958.  Kilby logged the idea while working alone at his Texas Instruments lab in Texas, and he filed for his patent on Feb 6, 1959.  Noyce had his similar idea six months later at Fairchild Semiconductor in California and filed for his patent on July 10, 1959.  A long fight began.  A microchip is a circuit body the size of a match head that is encased in a silicon wafer.  Before its arrival, workers using tweezers under a magnifying glass, had to solder wire circuits together with tools the size of toothpicks.  Kilby is credited with the idea of integrating circuits on a chip; but Noyce found the way to join the circuits by printing.  Kilby's product had its debut at a trade show on March 24, 1959, and it "wasn't a sensation," he said in T.R. Reid's book "The Chip."  Some predicted production problems.  These problems were licked by April 26, 1961, when Kilby learned that the Patent Office had granted Noyce's patent.  It later named Kilby the winner.  But on Nov. 6, 1969, the board reversed again, picking Noyce.  The U.S. Supreme Court in 1970 denied Kilby's appeal request.  But that was the legal brawl.  In 1966, the two companies held a summit, agreeing to license each other, and jointly other companies, ti make the chip.  The U.S. space program gave the chip early impetus and its use soon extended to pocket calculators.  From there, it became popular in a string of miniature products from radios to wrist watches.  Currently, annual world chip sales exceed $42 billion, up from $9 billion in 1981.  During that time, the U.S. share has declined to about 40% from 57%, while Japanese companies have increased their slice to 46% from less than 30%.  Local Federal Savings & Loan Association said it was acquired by the Collier family of Naples, Fla., for $15 a share, or $26.4 million.  The Colliers first offered to buy the thrift in November.  Export orders for Taiwanese goods in July eased 4% to US$5.3 billion from June but rose 4.7% from a year earlier, the Economics Ministry said.  Export orders in the first seven months rose 8.4% to US$37.6 billion from a year earlier.  The U.S. remained a leading destination for Taiwanese exports, taking orders of US$2.03 billion from local manufacturers in July.  This sum, however, represents a 9.3% decline from the previous month and a 4.9% decline from July 1988.  Europe ranked second with US$901 million in July, compared with US$817 million in June and US$755 million in July 1988.  Japan placed orders of US$844 million in July, up 21% from a year earlier and 9.2% from a month earlier.  Hong Kong had orders of US$418 million from Taiwan manufacturers in July, up 3.9% from June but down 4.1% from July 1988.  Sluggish exports and surging imports reduced South Korea's trade surplus with the U.S. between January and July 43% to $2.66 billion from $4.66 billion a year earlier, the Office of Customs Administration said.  In the first seven months of this year, South Korean exports to the U.S. rose 0.3% to $11.42 billion from a year ago, while South Korean imports from the U.S. rose 30% to $8.76 billion.  The report said South Korea's trade deficit with Japan narrowed by 6.8% to $2.32 billion from $2.49 billion a year ago, because of rising exports to Japan.  South Korean exports to Japan jumped 16% to $7.33 billion.  Imports from Japan rose 9.4% to $9.65 billion, according to the office's final statistics on a customs-clearance basis.  The U.S. and Japan are South Korea's two top trading partners.  RB&W Corp. said it completed the sale of its powdered-metal products division in Coldwater, Mich., to a unit of Metal Powder Products Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.  RB&W, which makes and distributes cold-formed parts, said the division didn't strategically fit into its plans.  The company added that proceeds of the sale would be used to reduce debt and as working capital.  Quanex Corp. said it completed its acquisition of Nichols Homeshield, Aurora, Ill., for $87 million.  Quanex is a specialty-metals manufacturer.  Nichols Homeshield is an aluminum products manufacturer.  Enclean Inc. said it agreed to acquire all the stock outstanding of Correct Maintenance Corp., Portage, Ind., in a cash, note and stock transaction.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Both Enclean and Correct Maintenance are industrial and environmental cleaning services concerns.  Japan's economy continues to expand vigorously, led by corporate fixed investment and personal consumption, the Bank of Japan said.  Mining and manufacturing production is growing steadily, the central bank's monthly report said, and "The capacity utilization rate is rising further, and labor market conditions continue to tighten."  The Bank of Japan has repeatedly cited concern lately about the inflationary implications of tightening supply in labor and goods markets.  It noted further moderate rises in wholesale prices in August, but said consumer prices were lower, led by less expensive, perishable foodstuffs, while domestic commodity prices also declined slightly.  Bell Atlantic Corp. said it had extended the company's stock repurchase program through December 31, 1991 and increased the authorized amount from $450 million to $1 billion.  Automobile production in West Germany surged 25% in July to 319,500 vehicles from 258,039 a year earlier, the Association of the German Automobile Industry said.  The association said there were 16 work days in July 1989, three more than in July 1988.  The number of personal cars rose 23% to 297,400 from 241,095.  The July rise follows a 12% year-to-year boost in June, when auto output reached 461,000 units.  The July data brought the total number of cars produced in the first seven months of 1989 to 2.9 million units, up 6% from 2.7 million units a year ago.  Anton J. Campanella, president of this telecommunications concern, was elected a director, increasing the board's membership to 15.  Investment bankers Alan D. Schwartz, 39 years old, and Uzi Zucker, 53, were elected to the executive committee, the 10-member policy-making arm of both the holding company and the Bear, Stearns & Co. investment banking firm.  Paul G. Schloemer, chief executive officer and president of Parker Hannifin Corp., was named a director of this consumer products concern, increasing the board to 12 members.  Carl Singer was elected chairman of this maker of household appliances, fans and heaters, increasing board membership to six.  Currently he is chairman of Fundamental Management Corp., which owns about 23.2% of Robeson.  Harold Weiss, who had been chairman of Robeson, remains president and chief executive officer and a member of the board.  The company said it decided to divide the responsibilities to facilitate growth.  W. Lawrence Weeks, formerly president of South Side Steel of Pittsburgh, was named president and chief executive officer of this steel bar producer effective Sept. 1.  Mr. Weeks, 54 years old, succeeds John G. Roberts Sr., 62, who will continue as a director of the corporation.  John A. Meyers was elected to the board of this maker of personal care products, succeeding Robert J. Wright who resigned to become chairman of the Ontario Securities Commission.  Mr. Meyers, who currently is chairman of his own firm, J.A.M. Enterprises, recently retired as chairman of the Time Inc. Magazine Group.  Japanese banks are sending mixed signals on their lending stance toward China.  At a Tokyo news conference, Kuniji Miyazaki, chairman of the Federation of Bankers Association of Japan and president of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank, said banks are prepared to resume negotiations with China over two syndicated loans -- if the Chinese approach them.  Japanese bankers said the loans were near the signing stage when talks were interrupted by China's crackdown on its pro-democracy movement in June.  But a Japanese banker in Hong Kong who is involved in one of the loans was more skeptical.  "The syndicated market hasn't yet recovered," he said.  "So far I can't find any reason to go ahead with this transaction."  He said it's unlikely the loans will proceed until the World Bank and other multilateral lending institutions are prepared to unfreeze new lending to China, a stance they've taken since the Tiananmen massacre.  After Mr. Miyazaki's news conference, officials at the Federation of Bankers Association and Dai-Ichi Kangyo said his statement doesn't represent the association's view.  Moreover, bankers said the Chinese have made no request to resume discussions.  One Japanese banker in Tokyo said that Mr. Miyazaki's statement may prove to be little more than a gesture to Beijing.  "He felt the necessity to express a positive stance" with an eye to the future, the banker said.  "He took advantage of the timing."  In the past week the Japanese government has ended a freeze on existing aid projects to China and lifted an advisory against travel to China, with the exception of Beijing.  In light of these decisions, Mr. Miyazaki "doesn't want to be regarded as so conservative or negative toward China," the Tokyo-based banker said.  At a July news conference, Mr. Miyazaki rejected any discussion of the two loans.  The loans are a $120 million syndicated borrowing for a Chinese state petrochemical company called Sinopec, and a $25 million syndicated loan to the People's Bank of China, the country's central bank.  The Sinopec loan is intended to refinance existing debt, and the central bank loan is project-related.  The Chinese borrowers had asked the Japanese institutions to arrange the loans before Tiananmen.  Before early June, some of Japan's largest banks were involved in the loans, including Dai-Ichi Kangyo, Industrial Bank of Japan, Sanwa Bank and Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan.  Chemical Bank and Morgan Guaranty were also participating.  Officials at two Japanese banks said the Asian Development Bank is participating in the loan to the central bank.  Mr. Miyazaki said that consideration of other new loans must await the recovery of "economic and social stability" in China, as well as "the recovery of longstanding relations with other countries."  The banking association said that statement does represent its position.  Most bankers in Beijing, Hong Kong and Tokyo say they are waiting for the multilateral lending institutions and Western governments to shift their stance on China before they would be willing to advance new loans.  Many Japanese bankers, wary about being accused of opportunism, say they won't provide new money until other banks move as well.  "No foreign bank would dare to start now," another Japanese banker said.  France's Thomson-CSF, joining the wave of restructuring in Europe's defense-electronics sector, is close to acquiring most of N.V. Philips's European assets in the field, the companies said.  The value of the transaction, which both sides hope to complete by year end, wasn't disclosed.  Thomson-CSF, 56%-held by state-owned Thomson S.A., wouldn't disclose how it plans to finance the acquisition of the divisions, which have total annual sales of four billion French francs ($605.9 million).  The transaction was approved by the French and Dutch governments.  The move comes at a time of deep restructuring in the European defense-electronics sector, marked in the past few months by the planned takeover by West Germany's Daimler-Benz AG of Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H. and a joint takeover bid for Britain's Plessey PLC by Britain's General Electric Co. and West Germany's Siemens AG. Thomson-CSF officials say these moves led the French group to seek opportunities for expansion to maintain its ranking as Europe's biggest defense-electronics group.  Defense electronics accounted for 92% of Thomson-CSF's 1988 sales of 33.5 billion francs.  "Thomson is first in Europe in defense electronics, but our competitors were catching up," a Thomson official said.  "Philips wanted to sell its activities in that field, so we thought it was in our interests to talk with them."  Indeed, the Dutch electronics giant has been restructuring its activities and shedding assets to focus on telecommunications and civilian electronics.  Philips said it believed that the future of its European defense-electronics activities was best ensured by placing them under the control of the European leader in the field.  Under the current discussions, Thomson would buy a sizable majority stake -- estimated at about 80% by financial sources -- in Hollandse Signaalapparaten BV, or HSA, the European market leader in naval command and control systems.  Philips would retain a minority interest, but it's unclear what will happen to the 1% the Dutch government currently holds in HSA, which also makes radar and fire control systems as well as military telecommunications equipment.  HSA had 1988 sales of about 900 million guilders ($408.2 million), but Philips officials wouldn't confirm rumors that it has been unprofitable for the past couple of years.  By gaining control of HSA, Thomson would acquire two HSA units, one based in West Germany, and one, Philips USFA BV, based in the Netherlands.  For security reasons, however, the encryption activities of Philips USFA, which develops coded message systems for the armed forces, will be excluded from the transaction.  Thomson also seeks to acquire a 100% stake in the defense activities of France's Telecommunications Radioelectriques & Telephoniques SA, or TRT, and a minority stake in the defense activities of Philips's Belgian unit, MBLE. Philips currently controls only 49% of TRT, and neither side would disclose details of the TRT transaction.  A Philips spokesman said "a certain number of measures will be taken, but we can't talk about them today."  Trading in TRT shares was suspended last week on the Paris Bourse, when rumors of the impending transaction first surfaced.  TRT's defense activities accounted for about 38% of TRT's 1988 sales of 4.1 billion francs and are believed to be profitable, although TRT as a whole posted a 1988 loss of 47.4 million francs.  Its defense activities include opto-electronics, munition electronics and radio-navigation and communications equipment.  MBLE's defense business, in the field of military telecommunications and radar computers for aircraft, accounted for only about one quarter of its 1988 sales of about 200 million guilders.  Boots Co., which earlier this month raised its offer for Ward White Group PLC to #900 million ($1.42 billion) from #800 million, said it gained control of its target.  Its final offer was 445 pence ($7) a share, up from 400 pence.  The British pharmaceutical group said it received acceptances representing 67.39% of Ward's ordinary-share capital.  Ward, which sells auto parts, bicycles and do-it-yourself home products, opposed the bid, but failed in an attempt to construct a management buy-out alternative.  "We now look forward to meeting Ward White's management and staff and working with them to develop the businesses," Boots said.  Boots said it also received acceptances for 63.56% of Ward's convertible preference shares.  Under the offer, there is an alternative under which Ward holders can opt to take one new Boots share plus 145 pence in cash for every Ward share.  The partial share alternative involves the issue of as much as 140 million new Boots shares.  Boots said dealings in the newly issued shares are expected to commence today.  In trading on London's stock exchange, Boots shares were down two pence at 295 pence each; Ward fell one pence to 443 pence a share.  Japanese drug makers are scrambling to avoid being left out of the pharmaceutical industry's global consolidation.  Analysts and industry sources are predicting a wave of overseas expansion and takeovers by Japanese drug companies in the shadow of last month's giant mergers between Bristol-Myers Co. and Squibb Corp. in the U.S., and SmithKline Beckman Corp. of the U.S. and Beecham Group PLC of Britain.  Unlike those multibillion-dollar, international deals, Japan's largely domestic pharmaceutical companies seem more likely to focus on small or medium-sized U.S. or European drug makers that have good sales networks but may lack a wide range of products.  Such companies would be relatively affordable, yet offer instant access to key foreign markets and a broader sales base for generic products.  For Japanese drug makers, analysts say, gaining access to the international market will be essential to their long-term success.  Although Japan's pharmaceuticals market is about as large as the one in the U.S. -- both had sales of about $27 billion in 1987, the last year for which complete Japanese figures are available -- the Japanese market is more fragmented and intensely competitive.  There are many national drug makers, but none are as large as the biggest U.S. or European manufacturers.  Few now have big overseas operations, their research lags behind overseas competitors, and drug imports to Japan outpace exports 3-1.  The Japanese industry's ambition to expand abroad showed this week when Fujisawa Pharmaceutical, one of the Japanese drug industry's leading anti-ulcer, diabetic and hypertension drug producers, made an unsolicited, $650.8 million bid for the 70% of Lyphomed Inc. it doesn't already own.  The $31-a-share offer values Lyphomed, based in Rosemont, Ill., at $929.7 million.  Lyphomed said it has taken the offer under consideration; industry experts in the U.S. believe the takeover will be completed.  By buying Lyphomed, analysts said, Fujisawa will be diversifying away from the antibiotics field, where competition has been high and profit margins are low.  With sales of $127.9 million in calendar 1988, Lyphomed is only about a tenth as large as Fujisawa, which had sales of 208.6 billion yen ($1.46 billion) in the year ended March 31, 1989.  Lyphomed's profit has been hurt recently by manufacturing problems.  But analysts said that if Lyphomed's earnings rebound to 1987 levels, the acquisition eventually could add 30% to 50% to Fujisawa's bottom line and boost its industry-trailing profit margins.  "Lyphomed has high profit margins with generic drugs, the me-too drugs," says John Wilson, an analyst at James Capel & Co.'s Tokyo office.  Still, the $650 million price tag Fujisawa has attached to the company will use up Fujisawa's entire cash reserve.  That may be a tough pill to swallow, but a Fujisawa spokesman said the acquisition is an integral part of the company's aim of becoming an international company and breaking free of Japan's insulated domestic market.  "In order to expand one more step, we can't just remain in Japan," said the spokesman, Tameaki Yoshida.  While Fujisawa was spelling out the terms of its offer for Lyphomed, another Japanese company, Ajinomoto Co., was putting the finishing touches on a pact to buy OmniChem S.A., a generic-drug and chemical maker based in Belgium.  Ajinomoto, one of Japan's largest food companies, said it will pay 3.78 billion Belgian francs ($92.6 million) to OmniChem's current owner, Belgium's Gechem S.A.  This week's takeovers follow Yamanouchi Pharmaceutical Co.'s $395 million acquisition in March of Shaklee Corp., a door-to-door health-food and cosmetics concern.  In addition, a number of Japanese concerns have been expanding their joint ventures, production and even research operations abroad.  "Takeovers are on their mind," says Mitchell Cybulski, president of Bristol-Myers's Japanese unit.  "At least the major {Japanese} companies are thinking about it," adds Fujisawa's Mr. Yoshida, noting: "We will be one step ahead of them."  One major reason for merging is to achieve the economies of scale that come with size, both in research and in sales.  Drug-development costs are rising, and Japanese companies need to be larger to justify the expenses necessary to produce new drugs.  That is particularly important because Japanese companies, hampered by regulatory constraints, traditionally haven't been great innovators of drugs.  Rather, they have tended to copy or improve on other companies' developments.  Kidder, Peabody & Co. broke up its 115-person futures trading operation, reassigning most employees elsewhere in the firm and setting up a separate program-trading division.  The unannounced moves, confirmed by Kidder officials yesterday, are part of a continuing restructuring of Kidder under Michael A. Carpenter, the president and chief executive officer of the brokerage concern brought in by its parent company, General Electric Co., in January.  The formation of a program-trading division, moreover, underscores Kidder's recent plunge into stock-index arbitrage and other computerized trading strategies.  Index arbitrage is a strategy involving the rapid swapping of stocks and stock-index futures, done to take advantage of small and fleeting price differences between the two markets.  Despite continued controversy over such trading and the market volatility it can cause, Kidder has been beefing up its program-trading computer operations under managing director John P. Sun, 33 years old.  Kidder, in fact, has been the biggest program trader this summer on the New York Stock Exchange, surpassing even Morgan Stanley & Co., the traditional program-trading powerhouse.  Mr. Sun, under the realignment, will head both program trading and a new global-portfolio trading group that will use Kidder's own money in such computerized trading strategies as index arbitrage in Japan and Australia, the firm said.  Kidder said the realignment will result in a "relatively small number" of layoffs, understood to be fewer than 20.  Apart from those assigned to the new program-trading unit, futures personnel will be reassigned to the firm's equity or fixed-income departments, Kidder said.  Thus, for example, a bond futures broker will be based in the bond-trading department.  Almost all of Kidder's futures personnel are involved in financial futures, though there are a small number of energy-futures traders who also will be reassigned.  A Kidder official said the changes are being made "to allocate our resources more effectively in this important area" and to position the firm for the "global markets of the 1990s."  Anchor Glass Container Corp. said its board unanimously rejected as "inadequate" an unsolicited $20-a-share offer from Vitro S.A., and said it has had preliminary talks with other parties about a possible transaction.  The offer is valued at about $251.4 million for the 89% stake Vitro doesn't already own.  While urging shareholders not to tender their shares to Vitro, Anchor, which is based in Tampa, Fla., also adopted a poison pill, or takeover defense plan, to gird against Vitro.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Anchor said its board is considering various options, including a restructuring or recapitalization of the company, the sale of assets, a leveraged buy-out or merger.  Vitro, a Monterrey, Mexico-based conglomerate, quickly responded that Anchor's adoption of a poison pill "suggests that the board will try to deprive the Anchor shareholders of the opportunity to accept" its offer.  An individual close to Vitro said it plans to ask a Delaware Chancery Court to invalidate the anti-takeover measure to allow its tender offer to proceed.  Vitro also said that it reserved the right to re-evaluate its "full and fair" offer if the battle for the company drags on.  It referred to what it called a "deteriorating situation" at Anchor, pointing to mounting losses as well as Anchor's disclosure that it is in default under its bank agreements.  In explaining its decision, Anchor said the offer was inadequate and not in the best interest of the company or its shareholders.  An outside spokesman for Anchor said the finding was based on an analysis by its financial adviser, Morgan Stanley & Co., as well as the preliminary talks with "a number of friendly entities."  But Wall Street analysts said they think Vitro's offer was generous and they didn't think Anchor would draw a higher bid.  "Another offer is a very, very remote possibility," said Edward Schollmeyer, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc. Anchor closed unchanged at $20 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Still, an attorney for Anchor said the shareholder rights plan was designed to buy time.  "Basically, we're finding out what other alternatives are available and the rights plan is designed to give us the time to do that," said Morris J. Kramer, an attorney with Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom, which represents Anchor.  The plan would be triggered if a shareholder obtained 20% of the company's shares.  The rights would entitle shareholders, except for those with a 20% or greater stake, to purchase shares at half price and dilute the hostile bidder's stake.  Vitro, however, in its response, disputed Anchor's ability to recapitalize, noting that Anchor "previously stated that it cannot pay any dividends because of covenants in its debt agreements.  Anchor's supposed alternatives are simply not credible."  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission voted to allow the New York Mercantile Exchange to open a futures market in residual fuel oil.  The new contract calls for the delivery of 1,000 barrels of residual fuel oil, which is used mostly as a fuel for electric-power plants and other industries as well as tankers and barges.  Deliveries must be made in a specified area along the Gulf Coast of Texas.  CFTC officials called the residual-fuel-oil contract a logical addition to the exchange's energy-futures contracts, which account for more than 11% of all futures trading.  U.S. retail sales of software for personal computers rose 8.8% in the second quarter to $658 million, an industry report said.  The study, prepared by consultants Arthur Andersen & Co. for the Software Publishers Association, is based on sales data from 139 U.S. software publishers.  International sales grew 27% in the period, the report said.  "The European software market is now booming like the American market did a year ago," said Ann Stephens, research director for the trade group.  Sales of software for Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh computers continue to outpace systems based on the MS-DOS operating system, the report said.  Word-processing software sales grew 33%, the survey added.  To understand Thomas Foley in Washington, D.C., watch him in Washington state.  In one Washington -- the one of capital-gains taxes, the budget deficit and August heat and humidity -- Rep. Foley has gained a reputation as a cautious politician, a man who can carefully analyze a situation from all sides before prescribing a course of action.  In this other Washington, where a farmer lights a bonfire to take the chill off an August evening and where the wheat fields meet the blue spruce trees at the far horizon, are the origins of a man who grew up in a liberal Democratic family surrounded by conservative Republican neighbors.  A brief trip with the new House speaker to his eastern Washington congressional district provides hints of the forces that shaped him and his politics, filling in a portrait of a man secure and comfortable with himself.  Rep. Foley, still enjoying a honeymoon as speaker, is broadly praised for reducing the partisan strife in the House and for getting the chamber back to business after the upheaval that saw a speaker resign in disgrace for the first time ever.  A student of history, Mr. Foley is disappointed that he has few strong memories of the history of which he has just been a part.  "It's sort of a blur, less distinctive in my mind than I expected," he says.  "It seems like two years or three years instead of a few months."  Mr. Foley knows he must cast his attention forward.  Now that he has shown he can make the legislative trains run on time, he has to indicate what he wants those trains to carry, putting his mark on legislation.  He has made House passage of a package of ethics reforms this fall a top priority and staked out such stands as opposition to a cut in the taxes on capital gains, a fight he acknowledges is uphill.  But he offers few long-range goals.  He does speak, with emotion, of the distress he feels over the growing underclass in U.S. society, "the alienation and separation of economic classes in this country."  He adds: "I would really like to bring about some amelioration of that.  If it continues to grow, it could weaken the fabric of American democracy."  The son of a Spokane judge, Mr. Foley, who is 60 years old, was spared the personal sting of the Depression that so shaped his predecessors as speaker, Thomas O'Neill and James Wright.  "Growing up in the '30s, I remember relative great comfort," he says.  But now, riding in a white Lincoln Town Car along two-lane highways winding through the rolling wheat fields of the Palouse region in southeastern Washington, through towns with names like Dusty and Rosalia, Mr. Foley recalls being shown another side of life.  During those years, his father would take the family on Sunday drives -- but not only to the countryside.  The sights included the county poorhouse, soup kitchens and shantytowns where Mr. Foley says he saw "men standing in line waiting for a five-cent glass of buttermilk to keep themselves alive."  "It was a constant sort of effort to show me the circumstances of people less comfortable than ourselves," he says.  "If he hadn't made these efforts, I can understand how people lose total touch with the circumstances of others."  His father never preached the point, but "the lesson was there," Rep. Foley says.  But as much as Mr. Foley would like to put aiding the underclass high among the House's priorities, he acknowledges that the days when a speaker can singlehandedly advance an agenda are gone.  Senior lawmakers no longer offer new ones the counsel that the late Rep. Michael Kirwan (D., Ohio) offered when Mr. Foley was a freshman: "Trust the leadership, follow the leadership and do not make a single mistake."  "The most powerful job I ever had was when I was a deputy prosecuting attorney," he muses.  "I'd just sign a piece of paper and a man went to jail. . . .  Everything in Congress now operates in terms of a consensus.  It's very much a collective undertaking, accommodating the views of other people, learning what is necessary to get their support."  Mr. Foley learned to understand and accommodate views different from his own as a young boy, both from his father -- the impartiality of Judge Ralph Foley is legend in Spokane even today, four years after his death -- and his surroundings.  The neighborhood where he grew up was solidly Republican.  His mother put a National Recovery Act sticker in the window, but only in the back of the house.  "We had an outpost, frontier Democratic Party identity," he recalls.  "The fact my family was Democratic was excused the way some strange religious practice was."  As a youth, he engaged in a kind of sandbox political debate, ardently defending Franklin Roosevelt to his next-door neighbor and playmate, the son of the Spokane County GOP chairman.  The friend would taunt him by digging furiously with a shovel while chanting, "Free enterprise," and then resting on the shovel and saying, "WPA."  Young Thomas Foley would rebut by doing just the opposite.  Returning home now to his largely rural district, Mr. Foley has the same presence that is familiar to those who know him in the nation's capital.  He is always gracious and proper, but never stuffy or unapproachable.  In meetings with constituents, Mr. Foley makes little effort to hide his Eastern sophistication.  Wheat farmers pepper him with questions about world politics, and he responds with detailed analyses of the situations in Poland, the Soviet Union and China -- and assesses the new Japanese prime minister to boot.  When one wheat farmer expresses fear about automatic budget cuts that would crimp agriculture programs, Speaker Foley assures him that will probably be avoided this year, but could be a problem next year.  "You can do something about it, or you can sit back and watch the train wreck," he responds, plainly indicating that he won't sit back.  Yet he mixes easily with these people.  At a coffee klatch, he recognizes faces and recalls names with ease.  He glides through the crowd, happily addressing one by one the smaller circle of voters moving with him.  Certainly, some Republicans hope Mr. Foley will become such a national figure that he'll lose touch with the voters here.  "We're concerned he'll be playing up to the more liberal wing of his party, rather than representing his conservative district," says Robert Yates, a Republican precinct committeeman.  But even most Republicans think he has been good for the district and take pride in the new speaker.  And Mr. Yates acknowledges, "the people of this district would be foolish not to vote for him because of the power he does wield."  Rep. Foley, who stands six feet four inches and weighs more than 240 pounds, is very careful about his appearance, changing clothes as many as three times a day.  Dressing casually for a watermelon feed at a 1,000-acre wheat farm northeast of Walla Walla means changing from a gray pin-stripe suit to a blue blazer and gray slacks, each jacket with a neatly folded white handkerchief peeking from the breast pocket.  Another time, spotting a television camera waiting for him at an Elks hall here in Walla Walla, where he is to address the Rotary Club, he instructs his driver to circle the parking lot so he may don his suit jacket before emerging from the car.  No matter how hard he tries, though, he usually ends up looking comfortably rumpled, his back shirttail hanging out, like a little boy who has been playing after church in his Sunday best.  Indeed, there's a lot of little boy in Thomas Foley.  He still relishes with glee the memory of a favorite present from a Christmas long ago, a Royal Canadian Mounted Police uniform.  He loves gadgets and proudly shows off his latest addition, a cellular telephone that folds to pocket-size, with the same delight.  He misplaces his reading glasses with such regularity that aides carry extras.  Most voters here find these enthusiasms and mannerisms endearing, and are proud that the man they have chosen to represent them for the past 25 years has been chosen to lead the House.  Mr. Foley may be "Mr.  Speaker" in the Washington far away from here, but sitting at a picnic table in the glow of fields of newly harvested wheat, brilliantly illuminated by the setting sun, he's affectionately addressed as "Tom."  "It's a real honor to have the speaker from our district," says Wayne Klindworth of nearby Connell.  "He's done very well by us," adds Bob Schwerin, the patriarch of this family farm.  "He's still our man."  ENSR Corp. said its consulting and engineering division received a contract from Exxon Corp. to coordinate the marine-toxicology studies of the Valdez oil spill.  Terms weren't disclosed.  ENSR is an environmental-services concern.  Alexandra Penney, editor-at-large at Bertelsmann AG's Bantam Books unit, has been named editor-in-chief of Conde Nast Publications Inc.'s Self magazine.  Ms. Penney, whose appointment is effective Sept. 11, succeeds Anthea Disney, who abruptly announced her resignation Monday, citing "personality conflicts" at Conde Nast, a unit of Advance Publications Inc.  Ms. Penney is the author of several books including, "Great Sex" and "How to Make Love to a Man."  In a statement, Ms. Penney said, "I think the magazine can help us trust, know, and respect ourselves in a new way in the 90s."  She has served as a marketing consultant to Ralph Lauren, Estee Lauder, and Revlon, among other beauty product companies, as well as serving as a past beauty editor for Conde Nast's Glamour magazine and as a contributing editor for Conde Nast Traveler magazine.  Self, a monthly women's life style and health magazine, is Conde Nast's third-largest magazine in terms of circulation.  Total paid circulation had been climbing in 1988, but in the 1989 first half, it dropped 4.2% to 1.2 million.  Newsstand sales were down 13%, but subscriptions jumped 7.2%.  NBC said it signed up Continental Airlines and Buick as promotional partners for its massive campaign with Sears, Roebuck & Co. to promote new fall shows.  At a news conference, General Electric Co.'s NBC also described the structure of its previously announced nationwide sweepstakes that will award $2 million in cash and prizes and give four people one-time appearances on new NBC prime-time series.  "We'll see how well they can talk, but the goal is to give the winners at least one line {of dialogue}," said John Miller, senior vice president, NBC Entertainment.  Also, said Mr. Miller, "Each winner will be the star of an instant commercial, which will show them in sunglasses saying, 'NBC and Sears made me a star, and there's still time for you to play. . .'"  Starting Sept. 3, contestants will go to one of the nation's 825 Sears stores to enter, or fill out forms in Sears ads, answering one question about each of NBC's five new prime-time shows (Big Clue: the answers are all the actual names of the shows).  NBC said that once a week for four weeks, the network will pick a Sears store at random.  The person submitting the first correct entry at that store will win a television appearance, plus a week's trip to Hollywood for two, a tour of the NBC studios and a number of prizes, including Sears merchandise.  Additional prizes -- including $100,000 in Sears gift certificates and 20 Buick Reattas -- will be awarded to other contestants, but only after entry blanks nationwide have been pooled for weekly drawings.  The tie-in with Continental includes a giveaway of 300 pairs of plane tickets.  The airline is also running an in-flight videotape that promotes NBC's new fall shows plus displaying ads for the network in its magazine and on ticket counters.  Continental is a unit of Texas Air Corp. and Buick is a division of General Motors Corp.  CAE Industries Ltd. said its Link Flight Simulation unit, based in Binghamton, N.Y., received a six-year, 385 million Canadian dollar (US$327.5 million) contract from the U.S. National Aeronautics and Space Administration to supply training facilities.  The electronic aviation equipment maker said NASA has the option to extend the contract, the total value of which could reach C$600 million over 10 years.  Mark Lawrence, an analyst with Prudential-Bache Securities Canada Ltd., said the NASA contract is important to CAE, because the company lost three other large U.S. military simulation and training contracts to competitors.  "Link has traditionally been one of NASA's main contractors, which was one of the attractions for CAE in acquiring Link," Mr. Lawrence said.  CAE acquired Link and three other training concerns from Singer Co. last August.  Under the NASA contract, the CAE unit will upgrade space-shuttle mission training facilities at the Johnson Space Center in Houston, develop training systems for the proposed manned-space station, and provide a range of other training services.  CAE said Link will serve as prime contractor and act on NASA's behalf to acquire and develop necessary training equipment.  The contract is the largest awarded to CAE since it acquired Link.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, CAE shares closed at C$14.25, up 62.5 Canadian cents.  Your Aug. 1 headline "Corporate Polluters Paying the Price" should have read "Corporate Polluters Paying the Price, Twice."  Corporate policyholders first paid insurance premiums and are now paying environmental cleanup costs.  Insurance companies have succeeded in some but far from all of the insurance-coverage cases in nullifying the insurance they sold to U.S. corporate policyholders.  Lawyers for insurance companies announce with some pride that few corporate policyholders can afford the cost of a lawsuit to get the coverage they bought and paid for.  Further, rather than providing protection in case of major losses, insurance companies are spending millions of dollars to prove that their policyholders are so reprehensible that insurance coverage should be denied.  It is a Kafkaesque world in which insurance companies avoid their contractual obligations by proving their policyholders are "bad guys."  Nearly 50 years ago, Justice Cardoza wrote: "To restrict insurance to cases where liability is incurred without fault of the insured would reduce indemnity to a shadow."  Eugene R. Anderson  New York  ---  I am a farmer and a geologist currently getting my master's degree in environmental management from the State University of New York College of Environmental Science and Forestry in Syracuse, N.Y.  For years I've been interested in environmental ethics, and the one disturbing thing I've observed in regard to the Superfund Law and its associated mentality is the lack of responsibility that all society must take for our pollution problems.  The Superfund Law errs in pointing the finger at industry and making it solely responsible for the problems, when in fact we all are responsible.  Recent legislation has been approved by the New York State Senate that would protect the state's farmers from strict liability for groundwater contamination caused by non-negligent use of agricultural fertilizers and pesticides.  If this is being considered for farmers, why should it not also apply to industry?  The time has come for people everywhere in the world to realize that we are all responsible for our polluted environment, and that the time is now to pay for the preservation of our environment and planet.  William S. Hecht  Skaneateles, N.Y.  The on-again, off-again bond offering by Washington Public Power Supply System appears to be back on again.  Maybe.  Washington Public Power Supply, which owns the dubious honor of the biggest municipal-bond default in history, said its proposed $450 million refunding has been rescheduled for after Labor Day.  A spokesman for WPPSS, known derisively on Wall Street as Whoops for its 1983 default on $2.25 billion of bonds, declined to be more specific.  The system's re-entry into the public bond market had originally been scheduled for this week.  It was delayed after the bond trustees received a letter from Chemical Bank, trustee for the defaulted bonds, claiming that holders of those bonds should get part of the new offering's proceeds.  "There are ongoing conversations between the Supply System, its underwriters, and the Bonneville Power Administration," the federally subsidized power agency that would back the new bonds, a WPPSS spokesman said.  The new issue is designed to refinance at lower interest rates bonds issued to build plant Nos. 1 and 3 of the five nuclear power plants that WPPSS built.  Those bonds aren't in default.  The Commerce Department ruled that Japanese companies are exporting drafting machines and parts at unfairly low prices.  In a preliminary ruling under the U.S. anti-dumping act, the department said imports of drafting machines used by architects, designers, engineers and others, have been sold in the U.S. at prices 86.91% below "fair-value" by Mutoh Industries Ltd. and other Japanese manufacturers.  Fair value is considered the price in the home market or the cost of production.  If the U.S. International Trade Commission determines, following a separate inquiry, that the imports are injuring a domestic industry, the U.S. will assess anti-dumping duties on the Japanese products.  The imports totaled about $23.8 million last year.  Vemco Corp., San Dimas, Calif., a U.S. manufacturer of drafting machines, filed the trade complaints last April, alleging unfair import competition.  Pending the final Commerce Department and ITC decisions, importers of the Japanese-made equipment will be required to post bonds or cash deposits to cover anti-dumping duties that may be assessed later.  The final decisions in this case are expected later this year.  Neoax Inc. reported that second-quarter net income doubled and said it closed the sale of its Fairfield Manufacturing Co. unit, resulting in a $70 million gain.  The company, which provides services related to hazardous waste, posted net of $287,000, up from $139,000 a year earlier.  Preferred-stock dividends exceeded net income, so Neoax didn't post earnings per share.  Revenue climbed 14% to $50.3 million from $44 million.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Neoax shares closed at $12.25, up 25 cents.  The company acquired its continuing operations as part of its purchase in March 1988 of IU International Corp., and its financial statements show a number of businesses -- including Fairfield Manufacturing -- as discontinued operations.  Neoax sold Fairfield for about $147 million to Lancer Industries Inc., formerly McLean Industries Inc. Fairfield, with about $100 million of sales in 1988, makes custom gears and gear systems.  Neoax will record the $70 million gain in the third quarter and will be able to shelter most of it with tax-loss carry-forwards.  Lancer, based in New York, recently emerged from reorganization proceedings under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  BANK OF MONTREAL said it plans to raise 200 million Canadian dollars (US$170.1 million) through a public offering of non-cumulative Class A preferred shares Series 4.  The issue will carry an initial dividend of 9%, which could rise if the common share dividend increases, and will be redeemable for cash or common shares after 10 years, the bank said.  Lead underwriters are Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc. and RBC Dominion Securities Inc. Bank of Montreal said proceeds of the issue will be used to redeem C$175 million of C$2.50 Class A preferred shares Series 2, which yield about 10%, with the balance to be added to the bank's general funds.  Metals Exploration Ltd., an Australian mining company controlled by financier Alan Bond, said it agreed to sell its 55% stake in the Forrestania nickel project in Western Australia to Outokumpu Oy of Finland.  Outokumpu agreed to pay $12.5 million Australian dollars (US$9.5 million) initially and a royalty based on the project's performance.  Your Aug. 2 editorial about the hanging of Lt. Col. William Higgins is a clarion call of absolute sense.  We should use military means selectively and with vigor to demonstrate our resolve, and to make terrorists and their supporters fully realize that the price for American victims is very, very high.  If this means some Moslem civilians become casualties, so be it; they are accessories as well as co-victims of Moslem fanaticism.  Terrorists have waged war on Americans for years.  Meanwhile, our government talks tough, then flinches, blinks and becomes paralyzed.  Mark B. Leeds  New York  ---  I take issue with the first sentence in your editorial about the "execution" of Lt. Col. Higgins.  I've noticed that, in general, the media seem to use the term "execution."  They've been taught this term by the "Moslem fanatics" whom you refer to in your editorial.  The use of this term absolutely infuriates me.  I thought perhaps I was wrong, so I checked my Webster's with the following results:  Execute -- "To put to death in compliance with a legal sentence. . . ."   Execution -- "A putting to death as a legal penalty. . . ."   Clearly, Lt. Col. Higgins was murdered, not executed.  At the time our embassy was seized in Tehran, the media referred to the Moslem fanatics holding our people as "students."  Clearly, these were not students, these were terrorists.  The point here is not a quibble over correct usage of the English language.  The point is that we appear, even in the smallest ways, to allow these terrorists to set our agenda.  The sum of all these small things adds to our massive impotence.  Power that cannot be projected and utilized with effect is, in a real sense, no power at all.  We spend hundreds of billions of dollars to maintain a massive military establishment.  Yet we are told that the Joint Chiefs of Staff counsel not to use any part of this establishment against those who sponsor the "Moslem fanatics" who hold our people.  I suggest that we pay Lt. Col. Oliver North the pension he has earned and, if we have to balance the books somehow, deduct the money paid to Col. North from the salaries of the Joint Chiefs.  Ronald Reagan's invasion of Grenada and his strike at Libya were clear examples that we can strike if we have the will.  It is also clear that when we do strike effectively, we have nothing to fear from world opinion and much to gain.  We're reading the wrong verses of scripture.  The time for turning the other cheek is past.  It is time now for "an eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth. . . ."  There always will be reasons for not using our power.  The reasons for using it have become overwhelming.  B.V. Traynor  Bakersfield, Calif.  ---  While I deeply regret the death of Col. Higgins, I am equally disturbed by the way your newspaper continues to identify the group actually responsible for his killing.  Specifically, you identify this group as "Moslem kidnappers," while in fact they are a fundamentalist group based in Lebanon with clearly defined political, not religious, objectives.  The group even has a name -- Revolutionary Justice Organization -- as you reported later.  I fail to see the rationale for labeling them as Moslem kidnappers, especially since Islam does not teach kidnapping and killing.  The members of the Revolutionary Justice Organization may subscribe to the religion of Islam, but their motivations and actions are politically driven.  Should we really be identifying them with Islam as opposed to their political objectives?  Wouldn't it be unfair to label the IRA terrorists as Catholic terrorists?  Also, the Revolutionary Justice Organization may be pro-Iranian, just like Somoza, Zia and Marcos were pro-American.  Should we then be labeling Somoza's human-rights violations, Zia's hanging of Bhutto and Marcos's alleged killing of Aquino as pro-U.S., when the American people clearly opposed such actions?  How can we then link Iran to a specific action by a political group, simply because it happens to be pro-Iranian?  Isn't it a little premature to drag Iran into this affair when we don't know if the Iranian people actually supported the killing?  In fact, Iran's president has condemned the killing.  Razi U. Amin  New York  Lucky Goldstar International Corp. of South Korea has signed a barter trade agreement with Stankoimport, a state-run Soviet industrial complex in Moscow, to swap $200,000 cassette radios for heavy duty lathes.  Lucky Goldstar International, trading arm of the Lucky Goldstar Business Group, had relied on Japanese general trading companies to broker its imports of Soviet-made machine tools.  The company said it expects to sign agreements valued at $10 million with Soviet companies this year.  When Joseph Maccaquano rushed his 21-month-old son, Joseph, to a Secaucus, N.J., hospital in March, he never dreamed he would have to fight to get his only child back.  But after physicians had tended to a broken leg, a state social worker arrived to tell Mr. Maccaquano and his wife, Kathryn, that their little boy might not be allowed to go home.  The social worker told Mr. Maccaquano he was suspected of abusing the child.  He said "the injury couldn't have happened the way I said," recalls Mr. Maccaquano, a warehouse worker who says the child apparently fell in the kitchen just a few feet from him.  Two private physicians -- a pediatrician and an orthopedic surgeon -- swore in affidavits filed in Superior Court in Jersey City that they saw no evidence of abuse and that the family seemed to be a loving one.  But a third physician -- a state employee -- was suspicious.  He said the boy's injury was a spiral fracture, a type caused by twisting and thus often associated with abuse.  After two weeks in the hospital, the child was allowed to go home, but only after Mr. Maccaquano agreed to move out of his house temporarily, and only after he and his wife had agreed to undergo psychological testing intended to establish their fitness as parents.  Mr. Maccaquano, a 33-year-old former high-school football coach, lost 18 pounds during the period and had trouble sleeping.  He took a leave of absence from his job because of anxiety over the ordeal.  "They make you feel like you did something wrong, even though I know I didn't," he says.  Mrs. Maccaquano, a legal secretary who sought help from her boss, attorney Richard Seltzer, believes the boy might have been taken away if the couple hadn't aggressively fought the agency.  For three months after Mr. Maccaquano moved back home, a social worker from the New Jersey Division of Youth and Family Services made unannounced visits.  Then, last month, the agency closed the case.  In a letter to the court, it said the child "appears well cared for and happy with his parents, and there have been no further reported incidents of physical abuse."  The agency won't comment, and it isn't clear whether it reached an opinion about the boy's injury.  It is clear, however, that the child-protection system throughout the country has come to wield tremendous power over families.  All it takes to launch an investigation in most states is an anonymous phone call.  Teachers, physicians and other child-care professionals are required by law in every state to report suspected abuse.  And evidence that wouldn't hold up in a criminal court can, in family court, cost parents custody of a child.  Many children have been taken away from their parents in civil proceedings where no parallel criminal case was ever brought.  In an investigation, "the individual is hurled into a legal system that is ponderous, slow-moving and largely insensitive to the accused," says Paul Birzon, a New York family lawyer.  Family-law attorneys often are exasperated that the rules of evidence are so much looser in family court than in criminal cases.  "If you are the defense, you've got everybody working against you," says Alan Hoffenberg, a Chicago family-law attorney.  "Chances are the judge will admit every piece of evidence for safety's sake and then decide a case on evidence that shouldn't have been allowed."  Moreover, child-dependency cases are civil matters in which the outcome is contingent on a "preponderance of the evidence" -- a lesser burden than in criminal cases, which require proof "beyond a reasonable doubt."  Such a system is necessary, authorities say, to protect children from abuses that are hard to detect and harder still to prove.  "There is absolutely a sacrifice of civil liberties," says Howard Davidson, the director of the American Bar Association's Center on Children and the Law.  "The alternative is we sacrifice the ability to protect children."  Adds Donald Bross, legal counsel for the C. Henry Kempe National Center for the Prevention and Treatment of Child Abuse and Neglect, in Denver: "We've never had a child die of an investigation."  Children do still die, however, and the system operates unevenly.  In many instances -- such as the publicized case of Lisa Steinberg, killed by her adoptive father in New York -- even repeated reports of abuse have been inadequately pursued by overburdened authorities.  A phone call from a concerned neighbor can avert tragedy.  Yet some families claim to have been subjected to unwarranted and excessive intrusions into their privacy by abuse investigators, based on scant evidence, suspicious circumstances, or unsubstantiated allegations of neighbors or acquaintances.  While statistics aren't available on the frequency of false accusations, a growing number of parents and lawyers are complaining that officials, in their zeal to minimize child abuse, are trampling the rights of parents and ensnaring innocent people in investigations.  Florida and several other states, reflecting such concerns, have recently passed laws against making deliberately false accusations of child abuse.  Angry parents are pushing for other changes in the child-protection laws.  Some want agencies to discuss their investigations and open some of their files; they are currently prohibited by law from doing so.  Others want attorneys to be provided for accused parents who can't afford representation.  Parents' rights groups, such as Victims of Child Abuse Laws, are getting bigger and better organized.  The Maccaquanos are among those suing child-protection agencies.  The Maccaquanos' suit, in New Jersey Superior Court, alleges the state Division of Youth and Family Services violated their constitutional right to privacy, liberty and due process of law.  They seek $1 million in compensatory damages and a like amount in punitive damages.  The interest government takes in the welfare of children represents a gradual but dramatic turnabout from the days when parents were considered autonomous in disciplining their children and the public was largely oblivious to child abuse.  "A hundred years ago, there really weren't child-protection agencies; the assumption was children belonged to their parents, and they would make the decisions about their welfare," says Nancy Thoennes, a researcher at the Association of Family and Conciliatory Courts in Denver.  "We've come a very long way from that in deciding what rights children have."  The first child-abuse case of record was investigated in New York in 1874 by the American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals, according to the American Humane Association.  A year later -- as a direct result of that case -- the first law was passed to protect children, and the New York Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children was formed.  Today, most any corporal punishment might be construed by some as abuse.  And government is regarded by law as the child's ultimate protector, with a mandate to intercede for children who are reported to be in danger.  Now, some judges readily admit that, if anything, they are biased against parents.  Dade County Circuit Court Judge William Gladstone, who has handled hundreds of abuse cases in Miami, reflects the attitude of many judges.  "I'm much more worried about the rights of children than the rights of parents," says the jurist.  "In my view, children have all the rights.  Parents have obligations."  And in many instances, parents are treated as if they are guilty of crimes against their children merely because of an anonymous phone call or other evidence too flimsy to hold up in a criminal proceeding where defendants have the right to confront their accusers.  Such was the case with Margaret and Steven Gran, a Minneapolis-area couple.  Mrs. Gran was sitting her children down to dinner four days before Christmas six years ago when police knocked on the door.  They presented Mrs. Gran with a warrant issued by a Minnesota district court for the emergency removal of the children.  Police picked up one tiny daughter, waited as the mother coaxed a sobbing child out from under the bed, and took them both away to a facility called the "Home Away for Tots."  The children were away from home for 16 days altogether, part of which time they were in the custody of relatives.  The court order, it turned out, was issued on the basis of a tip that Mr. Gran had sexually abused one of the children, a tip the Grans ascribe to a vengeful neighbor.  Subsequently, a social worker interviewed the family and concluded that suspicions were unfounded.  On his recommendation, the children were returned to their parents and the investigation was dropped.  The Grans nevertheless had to agree to seek counseling.  And by the time the youngsters were returned home, "they weren't the same children," says Mrs. Gran.  "They were traumatized."  The Grans sued the Hennepin County, Minn., child-protection division, but lost.  A federal judge ruled that the agency enjoyed qualified immunity from lawsuits.  Although it had violated state regulations, it had acted reasonably and hadn't, in any event, violated the Grans' constitutional rights, the court ruled.  The U.S. Supreme Court refused to hear an appeal of the case.  As awareness of child abuse increases, many wonder how well the child-protection system will hold up.  For one thing, it casts a very wide net.  Teachers and school administrators in Atlanta were stunned by the arrests in May of three teachers -- two for failing to report child abuse and one for making a false statement to a police officer in connection with a teacher's failure to report abuse.  Under the statutes that require teachers, health-care workers, day-care operators and other caretakers of children to report "reasonable suspicions" of child abuse, failing to report is a misdemeanor punishable by up to a year in prison and a $1,000 fine.  Charges have been dropped against two of the Atlanta teachers.  The third, however, is charged with failing to report that a child had confided to her that she had been molested by her father.  School officials say they are particularly distressed that the charges were lodged even though the state apparently hasn't established that the abuse actually occurred.  Now, Atlanta educators predict an epidemic of spurious abuse complaints from teachers trying to protect themselves.  "If your kid comes in and says 'Daddy popped me one,' you may have a social worker on your doorstep," says Warren Fortson, attorney for the Atlanta Board of Education.  "Teachers are in a panic.  They will be reporting anything and everything."  Another danger lies, many believe, in the increasing reliance on the testimony of children.  "It is very unusual for a court to find that a child is not competent to testify," says Mr. Hoffenberg, the family-law attorney, even where it has been shown that the child isn't mature enough to recount events.  Moreover, lawyers and psychologists say it is tougher than ever to determine whether a child is telling the truth.  "Ten years ago, we could be 99% sure if children said they were sexually abused, that they were," says Kathryn Kuehnle, a Tampa psychologist.  But children today are more precocious, she says.  They are more aware of child abuse, more likely to fabricate stories.  Their testimony, coached perhaps, can be potent ammunition in a divorce case, or a malicious weapon against disliked teachers or adults.  Steven Blackford, a firefighter and paramedic, faced a mandatory minimum sentence of 25 years in prison on felony charges of sex abuse based on allegations made by his seven-year-old daughter after a bitter divorce.  Mr. Blackford, who passed a polygraph test, ultimately was acquitted in 1986 of sexual battery and indecent assault in Broward County Circuit Court in Fort Lauderdale.  But not before he had spent $25,000 defending himself and had been temporarily suspended from his job.  "I was chronically depressed and drinking too much," recalls Mr. Blackford, who sought counseling during his ordeal.  Most child-abuse investigations and allegations extract a high price on children, families and the accused.  William Waldman, director of the New Jersey Division of Youth and Family Services, acknowledges that "even discreet investigations can cause scars.  We train our workers as best we can, but these cases are very difficult to get to the bottom of."  Even today, Mrs. Gran worries about her parenthood skills and blames the stress of her ordeal six years ago for her current separation from her husband.  She says her children are afraid of police and fearful of losing their parents.  Some experts despair of the effects of child-abuse hysteria on parenthood.  Domeena C. Renshaw, a psychiatrist who runs a sexual dysfunction clinic at Loyola University of Chicago, says the national preoccupation with child abuse has made many parents afraid to touch their own children.  She says she sees a critical need "to salvage healthy touching."  Many professionals worry that poor families -- who are more likely to come under the scrutiny of social-service agencies and who lack the wherewithal to hire good lawyers and the sophistication to fight the system -- may suffer particularly from its excesses.  "When you have sufficient resources to litigate the hell out of a case, you can win, but many times that's not the case," says Alan Dershowitz, a Harvard Law School professor and authority on civil liberties.  Some families with the ability to fight back have achieved at least symbolic victories over agencies they claim have violated their rights.  But agencies remain generally immune to lawsuits, except in extreme circumstances.  Palm Beach County, Fla., Judge Robert M. Gross and his former wife, Cynthia, recently obtained an out-of-court settlement from state abuse investigators and others who wrongly accused Mrs. Gross of child abuse.  Their infant son was admitted to a hospital, critically ill, and was misdiagnosed as an abuse victim.  He died, and the grieving parents were subjected to a criminal investigation.  An autopsy eventually ascribed the baby's death to sudden infant death syndrome.  The Grosses sued in 1986 in Palm Beach County Circuit Court, alleging that officials had falsely accused Mrs. Gross of abuse and that they illegally took custody of the baby -- thereby preventing the parents from helping to make decisions about his medical care.  In agreeing to the settlement, officials did not admit to any wrongdoing.  The Grosses donated the settlement money to the SIDS Foundation.  I appreciate the interest you showed in recognized brand names in your Aug. 15 article "Warming Over Once-Hot Designers," but you failed to mention that I have personal control of the marketing and positioning of the brand name DVF. Therefore I have decided to terminate agreements and contracts that did not fit into my long-term strategy.  Currently, important negotiations are under way that will fulfill my business goals.  I will be happy to share this information with your newspaper in the near future.  Diane Von Furstenberg  Chairman and CEO  Diane Von Furstenberg Studio  New York  In regard to your July 28 article "College-Completion Rates Are Said to Decline Sharply": To an affluent, upper-middle-class observer, perhaps the drop in completion rates is baffling.  However, to financially beleaguered lower-middle- and lower-class college aspirants the reason is appallingly obvious: cost.  The nation's colleges and universities are pricing themselves far beyond the means of most Americans.  When I attended a Midwestern state university, tuitions increased every year for the four years I attended.  From just 1979 to 1989, in-state tuition rose by more than 128%.  Cost increases at private schools have been even more severe.  It is not at all unusual for a four-year degree to cost upward of $50,000.  Add to this the savaging of aid programs for higher education over the past eight years, and it should be no surprise that fewer Americans are able to complete degrees.  It takes longer to graduate when so much of your time and energy must go toward food and shelter for yourself, and, increasingly, toward hefty university salaries.  Many of us, and apparently an increasing number, simply cannot withstand the cost squeeze.  Unable to yield blood, even the most resolute stone eventually must crumble.  Robert Russell  Madison, Wis.  It's barely 8:30 a.m., and American deal makers already are working hard at Claridge's, one of this city's toniest hotels.  Corporate buy-out specialist Henry Kravis is munching toast in a dining-room corner with British financier Jacob Rothschild, a partner of Sir James Goldsmith in his daring $20.99 billion assault on Britain's B.A.T Industries PLC.  Out in the hotel's lobby, U.S. investment banker Jeffrey Rosen bids farewell to a Wall Street colleague heading for the New York-bound Concorde.  Mr. Rosen, climbing into a chauffeur-driven car, remarks how it's tougher to hustle new clients during his own weekly Concorde commuting because there now are so many rival American bankers aboard.  "They race to either end of the aisles," the Wasserstein, Perella & Co. executive grumbles.  "Nobody gets to eat any more because everyone's so busy trying to do business."  American firepower and money are pouring into what's suddenly the world's hottest takeover market.  For the first time in memory, the value of pending and recent acquisitions in Europe exceeds that of the U.S.  Scores of Wall Street lawyers, corporate raiders and arbitragers are joining veteran American investment banks such as Goldman Sachs & Co., Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Morgan Stanley & Co. Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. this month made its maiden European foray by moving to buy up to 15% of British conglomerate BTR PLC; KKR is eying several other candidates.  The American invasion promises to bring the Yankees huge fees, shake up the cozy corporate establishment here and increase Europeans' reliance on one U.S. innovation: junk bonds.  But some Yanks, eager to cash in on Europe's merger mania and woo desperate chief executives, make bad decisions and stumble into culture clashes.  The Brits, for example, aren't always enamored of the Americans' aggressive manners and hardball tactics, and they aren't as hungry for all-cash tender offers as are U.S. investors.  American deal makers are seeking greener pastures abroad because domestic targets have become scarcer and pricier.  New tax-law restrictions and mounting public antagonism toward highly leveraged bids also are making such transactions harder in the U.S.  Europe, by contrast, offers a cornucopia of undervalued corporations and a wave of industrial restructuring stemming from its drive toward a single market by 1992.  In Spain, U.S. investment banks took a huge chunk of the recent batch of bank mergers.  Shearson helped Italian financier Carlo De Benedetti make a pioneering, albeit unsuccessful, hostile bid for the giant Belgian holding company Societe Generale de Belgique last year.  Europe's takeover fever rages hottest in Britain, home of the biggest European stock market, half of the continent's publicly held companies and its largest collection of industrial giants.  Last year, three U.S. investment banks vaulted into the ranks of the top 10 U.K. takeover advisers.  Goldman Sachs took first place after becoming the first U.S. firm to act as sole adviser on a major British bid: the $393 million sale of British Caledonian Group to British Airways.  Over 500 American bankers, lawyers and other takeover specialists now do deals in Britain, twice as many as in 1986, reckons Philip Healey, editor of the U.K. publication Acquisitions Monthly.  For the newest-comers from America, the Concorde serves as a trans-Atlantic commuter express -- offering easy access to Europe plus a captive audience on the way.  On a recent morning, a number of U.S. bankers and lawyers sip coffee or champagne from tall-stemmed crystal in the elegant first-class departure lounge at London's Heathrow Airport.  They will board the New York-bound Concorde last because they hold prized seats in the front rows, which afford more room to maneuver and allow anxious deal makers a full frontal view with which to size up their fellow passengers.  "You can basically work the plane if you're sitting up front," explains Mr. Rosen.  One laggard is Tom Campbell, another Wasserstein Perella executive.  Unlike his suit-clad fellow male passengers, he wears a polo shirt, faded jeans, a scruffy blue blazer, loafers -- and no socks.  "I was going to be here two days," he says, but wound up staying in London a week, and "I've run out of suits."  But even flying the world's fastest passenger jet isn't a sure-fire way to speed trans-Atlantic deals.  In May, bad weather forced a Concorde packed with European industrialists and U.S. financiers to land in Bangor, Maine.  Among the passengers: acquisitive U.S. investor Irwin Jacobs and Antoine Riboud, chairman of France's BSN S.A., Europe's third-largest food maker.  Mr. Riboud was headed for New York just to have lunch with Mr. Kravis, hoping to pre-empt competitors with a swift purchase of KKR's five RJR Nabisco Inc. cookie and cracker units in Europe.  "We were on the ground for a couple of hours in a plane with no air conditioning.  It was hot and sticky," recalls Louis Perlmutter, an American banker aboard as Mr. Riboud's adviser.  The marooned jet bore "significant captains of industry, all of whom command legions, and they couldn't get off the damn plane."  The French business titan didn't know where Bangor was.  Mr. Perlmutter, a partner at Lazard Freres & Co., showed it to him on a map.  Despite the three-hour delay, Mr. Riboud finally made it to his lunch with Mr. Kravis.  A month later, he bought the RJR units for $2.5 billion.  Though the Concorde brings Wall Street and Europe's financial capitals closer, it is a major misconception to assume that the two continents are similar.  Rudolph Agnew, chairman of British mining giant Consolidated Gold Fields PLC, advises U.S. deal makers to "act as an American when you're in America and as a Brit when you're in Britain."  Consolidated's ability to use the best of both worlds this month helped it block a hostile bid from Minorco S.A. and set up a friendly, $5.5 billion takeover by Hanson PLC.  An over-aggressive U.S. tactic, for example, may have helped defeat Americans in the roughly $3 billion duel for Gateway, Britain's third-largest retailer.  Isosceles PLC, a consortium of disgruntled U.K. shareholders, won Europe's biggest leveraged buy-out last month by edging out U.S. bidders led by Wasserstein Perella and Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea.  Some British institutional investors were turned off when the Americans tried to bully them into accepting a friendly bid by threatening to create a stalemate with the large minority stake the Americans owned, according to people familiar with the deal.  Wasserstein Perella's Mr. Rosen rejects the notion as unfounded, but Britain's Takeover Panel this month chastised the U.S. firm for raising stalemate fears.  The Yankees, by offering cash, also may have misjudged British investors' preference for an equity element in a bid.  Isosceles offered a mixture of cash and equity.  The Wasserstein Perella group showed "some naivete to think that cash is God," says Jeffrey Gordon, a takeover lawyer at the London office of the U.S. firm Mayer, Brown & Platt.  Similarly, New York investor Asher Edelman's inexperience in Britain may have helped spoil his recent pursuit of retailer Storehouse PLC. Mr. Edelman built up an 8.1% stake, then dropped a provisional $1.19 billion bid in June when management rejected his overtures.  He might have won institutional support by lining up his financing first, suggests one American banker, who adds: "Not having the money in place made it easier for the Brits to tell him: 'Get lost.'"  From his sailboat off the coast of France equipped with phones and facsimile machines, Mr. Edelman scoffs at the comment.  "I feel I have spent enough time in England, two of out of the last three months . . . to understand the landscape," he says.  The arbitrager moved his main investment operations to Europe last November after years of roaming Wall Street.  He says he still may pursue Storehouse by a proxy battle or by urging "other people to make takeover bids."  KKR's Mr. Kravis spent over a year seriously stalking big deals here before targeting BTR. KKR debated with Consolidated Gold about organizing a friendly leveraged buy-out during the Minorco bid.  The negotiations fell through, however, when the U.S. buy-out specialists "got into a debate over whether they could buy shares here," recalls a knowledgeable individual.  "In the heat of a takeover battle like that, you don't have time for such debates."  A KKR spokesman declines comment.  Clashes in style are most obvious when both Yanks and Britons advise U.K. companies on defense tactics.  The British prefer tried-and-true methods, such as a government antitrust probe, over rash steps that might antagonize institutional holders, who wield much more clout in takeovers here than in the U.S. Americans, on the other hand, sometimes offer an endless array of options.  Most U.S. defense maneuvers routinely require shareholder approval in Britain and hence aren't often feasible.  Joseph Perella of Wasserstein Perella tossed out idea after idea during Consolidated Gold's late-evening defense sessions.  He would ask, for instance, "Why doesn't the company just make an acquisition?" recalls Mr. Agnew, the mining giant's chairman.  The U.S. banker's stream of proposals typically would stop the meeting for 20 minutes as U.K. investment bankers explained why such moves were virtually impossible under British takeover rules.  "Oh, I see," Mr. Perella would reply.  Asked for comment, Wasserstein Perella executives contend that Consolidated Gold management encouraged the brainstorming, and that some innovative approaches resulted.  Though Britons may sneer at the Americans' bravado and glitz, they can no longer afford to ignore them.  Sir James's highly leveraged offer for B.A.T, a diversified giant known for Kool cigarettes and Saks Fifth Avenue stores, may mark a milestone in the Yank invasion of Europe's M&A scene.  The bid, the second largest in corporate history, would generate fees of about $80 million for U.S. firms Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Bankers Trust Co., hired to mastermind its hefty debt package.  Propelled by the Goldsmith deal and others, Europe's junk-bond market may surge nearly five-fold to about $7.5 billion -- and at a faster clip than the much bigger U.S. counterpart.  The threat of American-style breakups sends a shiver through clubby corporate Britain.  With size no longer a safety net, half of the U.K.'s 100 biggest industrial companies could face dismemberment.  The bid for B.A.T, following KKR's $25 billion buy-out of U.S. tobacco and food giant RJR Nabisco, "must put just about everybody {in Britain} on the table," says Allen Sheppard, chairman of Grand Metropolitan PLC, the food and liquor conglomerate that bought Pillsbury Co. for $5.75 billion last January.  He vows to repel any predator with a management counterbid that "would have to break off bits of Grand Met in order to keep the central parts" -- a U.S. technique unheard of in British boardrooms until very recently.  British politicians and business groups, railing against highly leveraged financing, are demanding that the government block the Goldsmith deal and erect higher roadblocks against this U.S. export.  Corporate raiders using leveraged buy-outs "are looking to break up companies to put money in their own coffers," argues Colin Southgate, chairman and chief executive of conglomerate Thorn EMI, another possible target.  "They are tempted by pure greed."  Leverage isn't the only U.S. technique ruffling Europe's feathers.  Take corporate snooping.  U.S. investigators Kroll Associates, known in American takeovers for seeking damaging information about clients' adversaries, came to London in 1986.  Kroll, now probing the Goldsmith group for B.A.T despite the bidders' howls of outrage, assisted Consolidated Gold in fighting off South African-controlled Minorco.  Visitors to Minorco's London offices saw strangers with telephoto lenses shooting the entrance.  Phones made odd clicking sounds until a U.S. antitrust ruling killed the Minorco bid in May.  Kroll never engages in illegal phone tapping, although it does check out senior executives' business reputations, replies Patrick Grayson, who runs its London office from a suite formerly occupied by Britain's intelligence arm, MI5.  Yields on most certificates of deposit rose modestly again this week, as interest rates in general halted their recent decline.  The average yield offered by major banks on a six-month CD of less than $50,000 increased just slightly to 7.94% in the week ended yesterday from 7.92%, according to Banxquote Money Markets, an information service based here.  A one-year CD of less than $50,000 yielded 7.90%, up from 7.84%.  Six-month and one-year maturities are the most popular among individual investors.  Longer-term yields remain lower than short-term.  The average yield on a two-year CD of less than $50,000, for example, was 7.86%, up from 7.77%.  Noberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote, called the latest changes "minor increases" and said he expects yields to "continue to move in a very narrow range at least until the end of summer."  Interest rates in general have held fairly steady in the past two weeks, following a steady decline since late April.  Early in the summer, many economists expected the Federal Reserve to ease credit quickly in response to a declining economy.  Recent data, however, have indicated that the economy isn't slowing as much as expected.  At Monday's auction, the yield on three-month Treasury bills declined slightly to 8.27%, while the yield on six-month bills rose slightly to 8.29%.  "Everybody's treading water now," said Robert J. Hutchinson, senior vice president of Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. in New York.  "The feeling is that rates have stabilized until Sept. 1, when the next round of economic reports starts."  In the latest week, the average yield on three-month CDs of less than $50,000 remained at 7.95%.  Yields on CDs with maturities of one year and less sold by major brokerage firms declined.  Brokerage firms, which negotiate rates with the banks and thrifts whose CDs they sell, offer some of the best yields.  The average yield on a broker-sold three-month CD, for example, was 8.66%.  The average yield on two-year CDs sold by brokers rose nearly a fifth of a percentage point to 8.43%.  Average yields on large-denomination CDs, generally $90,000 and up, also rose.  On a three-month CD of more than $90,000, for example, the average yield rose to 8.19% from 8.16%, while on a one-year deposit the average yield rose to 8.13% from 8.06%.  On bank money market accounts, the average yield fell a bit on deposits of less than $50,000, to 6.99% from 7.01%, while on deposits of more than $90,000, it remained at 7.48%.  The sole remaining prime property site in central Hong Kong was bought recently for 2.7 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$34.6 million) by a local real-estate firm; it had been expected to fetch at least HK$5 billion.  But that was before China's rulers massacred the students in Beijing and thus put a fearful question mark over Hong Kong's entire future.  On the other hand, the sale did go through, with five rivals bidding.  The truth is, the international -- and local -- financial community has not yet made up its mind whether Hong Kong's economic miracle can survive the assumption of control by China in 1997.  No one should have been surprised by the behavior of the Chinese regime in June.  Many of those who constitute it have been around since the takeover of China by the People's Liberation Army in 1949.  In the immediate aftermath of the regime's establishment, more than three million landlords and members of the old bourgeoisie were murdered.  Other periodical convulsions -- the Great Leap Forward and the Cultural Revolution -- numbered their victims in the millions.  By comparison with the big killings of the past, the June massacre and the executions that followed are modest.  The difference is that this entire crisis was covered by the world's media.  Television images brought home to the outside world, not least in Hong Kong, the cruelty of which the Beijing regime is capable, thus underlining the finality of handing over Hong Kong's six million people to Beijing's pitiless rule.  Britain had a poor hand to play when it set about negotiating a deal with the Chinese about Hong Kong's future after 1997.  It might have been much stronger if, a century ago, Britain had secured sovereign rights over the whole of the territory.  But with a freehold only over Hong Kong Island, which is not itself physically viable, and a lease over the rest, Britain had to negotiate.  Once Britain was no longer willing to use the language of force, Hong Kong had to revert to what the rulers of China regard as "normalcy" but which we think of as a system that makes no economic sense at all.  The British government did negotiate a complex treaty in which the capitalist and socialist systems are to coexist for 50 years and all kinds of guarantees are provided for the survival of freedom for Hong Kong.  Even now, some people in Hong Kong, and indeed in the British Parliament, believe these provisions can be strengthened, and the new British foreign secretary, John Major, has asked for fresh talks.  But old China hands have always argued that after 1997 what happens in China, for good or ill, will happen in Hong Kong.  This was just as true before the Beijing massacre as after it.  Where does that leave the people of Hong Kong, who have raised themselves, in the past 25 years, from Third World poverty to First World affluence?  About 3.25 million of them have Hong Kong British passports, but these do not automatically entitle the holder to reside or work in Britain, let alone to British citizenship.  There is little chance of a British government granting that right.  No one doubts that the Hong Kong Chinese would flourish in Britain.  But a sudden intake of millions of Chinese would impose social and economic burdens, particularly in jobs, housing and education, which Britain cannot bear, and might unleash a cultural transformation the British public could not accept.  Hong Kong people really do not need to be told these facts of life, for they themselves are similarly unwilling to give open-ended access to the Vietnamese boat people.  Britain may try to spread the burden by persuading other powers -- the U.S., Canada, Australia, Singapore, for instance -- jointly to take in all Hong Kong citizens if the worst came to the worst.  But if a catastrophic suppression of Hong Kong liberties were to occur, it would do so after the transfer of sovereignty, at which point the Beijing regime would be in a position to stop anyone from leaving.  Equally, it is not what the Hong Kong people want.  They are looking for a Western right of abode in the here and now.  Like anyone else, they want to plan their lives.  Hence many are taking advantage of self-interested offers from Australia and Canada to take in those with scarce technical skills.  The brain drain is expected to reach 50,000 this year.  Two fairly desperate alternatives are being canvassed.  One is to persuade China to renew the lease at a colossal rental, running into billions of U.S. dollars a year.  The Chinese are not interested.  And why should they be?  They expect, come 1997, to milk Hong Kong for anything that is going and retain the rights of an owner-occupier.  A still-wilder plan is to move the entire community to one of the islands of Southeast Asia or even in northern Australia.  The difficulty is that Hong Kong's prosperity came precisely from its proximity to China.  The odd thing is that, in all this speculation about Hong Kong's future, the voice of its people has been heard only informally.  This is because it is still run as an old-fashioned British crown colony.  The governor exercises the real authority, while the Legislative Council is partly appointed by him, partly elected.  There are some very skillful politicians in Hong Kong, such as Dame Lydia Dunn and Martin Lee.  But there is no local prime minister or president, no one seen by the world as "Mister Hong Kong" or "Ms.  Hong Kong."  Until now, Hong Kong people have put business before politics and preferred to shelter behind Britain as their spokesman.  That, in my judgment, will no longer do.  The democratization process should be speeded up dramatically and the colony should aim to have universal suffrage and a democratically elected prime minister in place by the end of next year.  My guess is that a strong yet flexible Hong Kong prime minister could deal more successfully with the communists than a dying colonial power with other things on its mind.  The Chinese do not hold all the cards.  They have no desire to take over an empty shell in 1997.  They expect Hong Kong to supply them with huge quantities of much-needed hard currency, and with the expertise to broaden the free-enterprise areas they plan along China's coasts.  The likelihood, then, is that most economic and some political and legal freedoms will continue in Hong Kong after 1997 because it will be in China's interests to maintain them.  The main change will be moral.  Though one of the world's largest financial communities, Hong Kong has remained remarkably uncorrupt.  That is Britain's finest achievement there.  But the legacy will not last.  The current regime in Beijing is as corrupt as any of its predecessors.  It will expect to get a slice of Hong Kong's offshore trading.  To that extent, the surrender of Hong Kong will merely mean a return to Chinese "normalcy."  It will be messy and occasionally exasperating but it will not be the end of the world.  That is why it is important for Hong Kong to find an acknowledged leader as quickly as possible.  Democracy is the rallying force that will keep this community together, and the more it hangs together the less risk that its gifted citizens will hang separately.  ---  Mr. Johnson, author of "Intellectuals" (Harper & Row), is a British journalist and historian.  Bond investors, overwhelmed by a huge supply of debt securities, continued to bid bond prices lower.  But the erosion of stock prices halted, while profit-taking sent the dollar lower.  Long-term bond prices fell nearly three-quarters of a point, or about $7.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The price decline pushed the yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond above 8.20% for the first time since late June.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 3.99 to 2650.99 in light trading despite being down much of the day.  The dollar fell despite higher interest rates as rumors circulated about a possible West German rate rise.  Such a move would dilute the attractiveness of dollars for some foreign investors.  Yesterday's report on July durable goods orders didn't answer any investors' questions about where the economy is going.  Overall, orders in July fell 1.9%.  But June's orders were revised upward to a 1.4% gain from 0.4%, and orders for nondefense capital goods in July were up 5% after a 5.1% increase in June.  Those numbers are considered indicative of a healthy economy, reducing chances that the Federal Reserve will allow interest rates to fall further.  Stocks slumped early in tandem with bond prices.  But lower stock prices attracted buying in the afternoon, pushing the industrial average into positive territory near the end of the session.  Traders said the dollar's decline began late in European trading when sell orders were placed in a thin market.  When the dollar slipped below 1.95 marks, it triggered stop-loss orders that pushed the currency even lower.  In major market activity:  Stock prices edged up in thin trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 141.9 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers 835-629.  Bond prices slipped.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose to 8.25%.  The dollar fell against most other major currencies.  In late New York trading, the currency was quoted at 1.9395 marks and 142.20 yen, compared with 1.9577 marks and 143.10 yen late Monday.  Bonding Update  A good father-son relationship  Does have its advantageous perks:  I'm teaching my ten-year-old to bat  And he, me, how a computer works.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Bottle Cry  I've reached that point in life when it  Would fill my heart with glee  If some clerk in a liquor store  Would ask for my ID.  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Daffynition  Speaker's trial run: address rehearsal.  -- Len Elliot.  A small rebound by technology stocks helped the Nasdaq over-the-counter market withstand selling of financial stocks and finish nearly unchanged.  Traders said there was no major industry-specific news driving the buying of some of the OTC market's largest technology issues.  The stocks, which have been weak in recent weeks, just seemed cheap to investors, the traders said.  The buying supported the Nasdaq OTC Composite Index, which ended up a scant 0.03 to 458.36.  The composite tumbled as low as 456.49 in intraday trading.  Volume remained tepid, with only 119 million shares changing hands.  Advancing issues trailed decliners, 857 to 1,077.  Microsoft, the market's fourth-largest stock in terms of market capitalization, or price times shares outstanding, was among the biggest gainers in the technology group, adding 2 1/4 to 58 3/8 on 450,000 shares.  A company spokesman said there was no news to account for the gain.  One trader said that as computer and software stock prices began to firm during yesterday's trading, short sellers of Microsoft were forced to buy shares to cover their positions.  Short sellers expect a stock's price to fall and attempt to profit by borrowing shares to sell immediately.  The investors hope to replace the borrowed shares later with stock bought at a lower price.  If prices begin to rise instead, the short sellers often buy shares to "cover" their positions.  The activity in technology stocks lifted the Nasdaq Industrial Index 0.69 to 444.53, making it the market's strongest sector.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of the biggest nonfinancial issues was up 2.40 to 430.77.  Meanwhile, the Nasdaq Financial Index lost 1.79 to 456.97.  Lance Zipper, head of OTC trading at Kidder Peabody, said that if the bond market improves today, the late buying that pushed OTC share prices up from their lows could drive the Nasdaq composite higher.  "If we get a little bit of a rally in the bond market, the rally we had {yesterday} could broaden," Mr. Zipper said.  Technology stocks dominated the OTC market's most-active list.  Apple Computer added 5/8 to 42 7/8 on slightly more than one million shares.  The company said it was awarded a five-year contract valued at more than $164 million by a Honeywell unit to supply personal computers to the military.  Other technology stocks that gained included Sun Microsystems, which rose 1/2 to 15 1/4 on one million shares.  Lotus Development added 1 to 26 1/4, and Intel advanced 1/2 to 29 1/4 on more than two million shares.  Oracle Systems gained 3/8 to 18 on 711,200 shares.  Lyphomed topped Nasdaq's most-active list, ending unchanged at 30 1/4 on volume of 2.2 million shares.  The stock has been active since Japan's Fujisawa Pharmaceutical offered on Monday $31 a share for those Lyphomed shares it doesn't already own.  MCI Communications was second on the most active list, with two million shares changing hands.  The stock gained 1/8 to 37.  Standard & Poor's gave the company's commercial paper an A2 rating and made positive remarks about MCI's prospects.  A proposal to acquire HCC Industries for $8.50 a share drove the company's stock up 1 3/4 to 8 on 67,000 shares.  The proposal comes from a group that includes current HCC shareholders and certain members of senior management.  Shareholders cooperating with the group hold a total of about 48.8% of HCC's shares.  Colorocs gained 7/8 to 6 7/8.  This newspaper said that Colorocs hopes to win a larger share of the U.S. color-copier market from leader Canon, with a smaller, cheaper and faster machine.  Success of the Colorocs copier could help the company become profitable in the fourth quarter, after years of losses, one analyst said.  The American depositary receipts of Canon, a Japanese concern, slipped 3/4 to 64 1/8.  Pop Radio gained 2 to 24 on 106,200 shares.  The company said it expects to report pretax profit for its fiscal year ended June 30 of about $1.3 million, its first profitable year since going public in 1985.  In fiscal 1988, the company reported a loss of $2.7 million.  HDR Power Systems dropped 1 1/8 to 4 5/8 after announcing that it expects both earnings and sales for the fiscal first quarter ending Oct. 1 to be lower than year-earlier net income of $290,871, or 15 cents a share, on sales of about $2.9 million.  Separately, the company reported fiscal fourth-quarter net income of 22 cents a share, compared with 15 cents a share a year earlier.  Jiffy Lube International slipped 1/8 to 2 3/8 on 248,000 shares.  The company reported a loss for its first quarter ended June 30 of $5.3 million, compared with a loss of $211,000 a year earlier.  CAROLCO PICTURES Inc. Co-Chairman Andrew Vajna is negotiating the sale of his 36% stake in the company to Mario Kassar, the company's other co-chairman.  Mr. Vajna, who was Hungarian born, separated from his wife five months ago and wants to spend more time in Hungary, a person close to the company said.  An earlier edition transposed the identities of the co-chairmen.  (See: "Carolco's Kassar Seeks to Sell Stake to Co-Chairman" -- WSJ Aug. 22, 1989)  Ameritech and the Communications Workers of America said they would resume contract negotiations tomorrow afternoon, the first meeting since the union struck the company Aug. 13.  CWA District 4 Vice President Bob Johnson in Cleveland had called on Chicago-based Ameritech bargainers to revive talks after receiving "signals from the company indicating they are interested in resuming negotiations."  The union warned Ameritech that the five telephone units and a service company "must be willing to come prepared to bargain, not stall."  A union spokesman said wages have been the biggest stumbling block.  Ameritech phone companies, he said, have offered much of the increase as a lump sum payment, rather than adding the amount to the wage base.  A spokesman for Ameritech said informal contacts had been made by both sides over the past two days.  The company, he said, is "delighted" that the CWA is ready to resume talks, but it firmly believes "the offer on the table when the strike began is a good one."  Ameritech expects to use that offer as the "basis for negotiations," the spokesman said.  About 40,000 workers are represented by the union.  Separately, negotiators for Bell Atlantic Corp. and the CWA continued to work out differences in local issues.  The union represents about 41,000 employees of the Philadelphia-based company.  The two sides were working under a midnight deadline.  Last week, the company and the CWA reached tentative agreement on major issues throughout Bell Atlantic territory, including wages, benefits and pensions.  Bell Atlantic and the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) have yet to resolve differences in New Jersey where some 9,000 employees are represented by the union.  No progress was reported in the strike against Nynex Corp. where both sides are locked in a bitter dispute over health-care benefits.  The CWA represents about 40,000 of that company's workers, and IBEW represents an additional 20,000 workers.  Tuesday, August 22, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.29% three months; 8.25% six months; 8.22% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.60% 90 days; 8.52% 120 days; 8.45% 150 days; 8.37% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 21, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.99% 13 weeks; 7.85% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.22%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.13%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.17%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  The Delaware Supreme Court vented some anger and disgust at the demeanor of takeover specialists, citing one New York lawyer for contempt and rebuking another.  Alexander Metviner, the attorney and arbitrager representing Oppenheimer & Co. who bolted from the courtroom last spring and had to be chased down by bailiffs, was fined $1,000.  Separately, the court dropped its contempt proceedings against Barbara Robbins, a partner in the law firm of Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz, but scolded her colleague, Herbert Wachtell.  The court found Mr. Metviner in civil contempt because he lied about smuggling a cellular telephone into the courtroom during a hearing on the Polaroid-Shamrock takeover battle.  Mr. Metviner has admitted he knew that such devices were banned from Delaware courtrooms.  When arrested and confronted by court officials, he first claimed that his cellular phone had been hidden in some bushes outside the building, but later he admitted having had it with him in the courtroom.  "You blatantly lied to us," said Justice Andrew D. Christie.  "We need to send a strong message that the court won't tolerate this kind of inappropriate behavior."  Mr. Metviner, who appeared nervous and drained at his hearing yesterday, apologized to the court for what he called a "pressured and stupid mistake."  He said the proceedings had made him "look like a liar to the world."  In the other case, Ms. Robbins provided a copy of a confidential document about the takeover battle for Time Inc. to a reporter for the New York Times.  Ms. Robbins, who was representing Warner Communications Inc., admitted in a letter to the court that she had provided the document, which contained investment bankers' estimates of the prices that Time's magazines might command if sold separately.  However, she explained in the letter that she thought the document could be made public since it hadn't been stamped "confidential" or "filed under seal."  In dismissing her case, the justices said they found her action "innocent and inadvertent."  But they lashed out at Mr. Wachtell, a senior partner in the firm, who had spoken during the hearing for about 20 minutes in her defense.  Justice Andrew G.T. Moore II expressed the court's displeasure that, in his lengthy remarks, Mr. Wachtell failed to offer any apology.  Justice Randy J. Holland was irritated at what he called the firm's "audacity" in submitting 138 pages of documents on the matter only one day before the hearing.  Justice Henry R. Horsey added that he found the assigning of six lawyers to Ms. Robbins's defense an example of "overkill" that is "becoming ridiculous."  Ms. Robbins said she was "gratified" by the outcome and declined further comment.  Mr. Wachtell didn't offer any comment on his upbraiding.  Deere & Co. reported a 21% rise in earnings for its fiscal third quarter despite an operating loss in its lawn and grounds-care line.  The farm and industrial equipment maker reported net income of $98.2 million, or $1.30 a share, for the quarter ended July 31, compared with $81 million, or $1.14 a share, a year earlier when there were 5.7 million fewer shares outstanding.  Sales for the quarter totaled $1.69 billion, up 21% from $1.39 billion.  For the latest nine months Deere reported earnings of $277 million, or $3.69 a share, compared with $206.2 million, or $2.97 a share, before an accounting gain.  Sales totaled $4.49 billion, up 16%.  Despite the record third quarter, investors expressed disappointment.  Deere stock fell 87.5 cents, to close at $60.125 in heavy trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Karen Ubelhart, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., said Wall Street had been expecting higher per-share earnings of around $1.40, and termed the loss in the lawn and grounds-care line a surprise.  Deere's earnings announcement disclosed that its Horicon, Wis., plant that makes that type of equipment had been closed for five weeks during the quarter, as it sought to reduce inventories following lower sales attributed to last year's drought and slowed consumer spending.  Accordingly, although sales of farm and industrial equipment were stronger than she expected, Ms. Ubelhart reduced her per-share estimate for the year to $5.25 from $5.63.  Deere said retail demand for lawn tractors and related equipment had improved during the latest quarter.  North American demand for farm equipment was "much stronger" as 20 million acres returned to production after last year's drought, the concern said.  Still, higher production costs kept margins flat.  Retail demand for industrial equipment remains modestly higher than in 1988, Deere said, but called its overall sales mix "less favorable compared with last year."  Deere introduced a new line of farm equipment last fall and increased prices from 3% to 5%, but Provident Bank analyst James Peirce said that while pricing is "much improved, it is still not where the industry would like to be."  He said 5% to 10% price increases on agricultural equipment "would make the industry far happier."  Deere also confirmed yesterday that it recently laid off about 100 employees at its Waterloo, Iowa, foundry after Chrysler Corp. and General Motors Corp.'s Pontiac division had reduced engine-block orders.  Before Congress comes back, maybe we can all take a deep breath and try to think a little about the taxation of capital gains.  Up to now the discussion has been dominated by one big irrelevancy, the neglect of one important relevancy and the strong assertion of doubtful propositions.  The irrelevancy is the question whether rich people get more capital gains than poor people.  That is irrelevant because it mixes up two quite different questions.  The first is how much rich people should be taxed.  The second is how a particular kind of income should be taxed.  If we want rich people to be taxed more, we have an efficient means to achieve that -- namely, the income-tax rate schedule.  If reducing the tax on capital gains is a good thing on other grounds, the fact that some rich people would benefit disproportionately would not be an argument against it.  Opponents of a cut in the capital-gains tax weaken their logical and moral case by resorting to the demagogic argument that the cut would mainly benefit rich people.  The real argument on equity grounds against cutting the capital-gains tax is not that it would benefit the rich, but that it would leave some people paying less tax than other people with the same income.  It is inequitable to reduce the tax on a person who earns a million dollars of capital gains -- not because he is rich, but because the reduction leaves him paying less tax than a person who earns a million dollars playing basketball, and who is also rich. (In Washington we still consider a person who earns a million dollars to be rich.)  Although the distribution of gains by income levels is irrelevant to the equity of the case, it is not, of course, irrelevant to the politics of the case -- that is, to explaining why the idea of cutting the capital-gains tax seems irresistible.  Public-choice theorists have shown us that a cause that is intensely desired by a minority will generally prevail over the tepid objections of a majority.  And that will be especially true if the minority is rich.  The relevant fact that is being ignored is that capital gains already are taxed less than most other forms of income.  That is because the tax on capital gains is deferred until the gains are realized and the gains are permanently relieved of income tax if the owner dies without realizing them.  The gain from deferral is simply a reflection of the fact that a dollar today is worth more than the promise of a dollar in the future.  The following example illustrates the point: Suppose a person in the 28% income bracket invests $1,000 in an asset that yields 10% interest every year.  Each year he earns 10% interest, pays tax of 28% on that and reinvests the remainder.  At the end of 10 years he has $2,004.23.  Now suppose another person invests $1,000 in an asset that pays no interest but rises in value by 10% each year.  At the end of 10 years his asset is worth $2,593.74 and he sells it.  He pays 28% tax on the gain of $1,593.74 and is left with $2,147.49, or over 7% more than the interest earner.  It is as if he had paid an annual tax of 20.57% rather than 28%.  The longer he holds the asset and the higher the interest rate, the more this deferral is worth.  The value of deferring tax payments makes the common proposal to reduce the capital-gains tax more on assets held for a long time than on assets held for a short time incomprehensible.  The tax already is lower on assets held for a long time.  Presumably the preference for long holding periods is supposed to appeal to the popular prejudice against speculation -- which is only that, a prejudice.  Sometimes the argument is made that giving a preference for long-held assets encourages long-term thinking.  This reflects a confusion, common in all kinds of discussion these days, among what may be called holding, valuation and fruition.  Suppose that on Jan. 1, 1990, I start an enterprise to develop a radically different software program.  I believe that after research, development, testing, engineering and penetration of the market the enterprise will begin to make a lot of money in the year 2000.  Fruition will not come until then.  But if investors in the market become aware by July 1, 1990, that this enterprise is going to make a lot of money 10 years later, the value of the company will jump at once, not wait until 2000.  That will be the time of valuation.  I could take my gain on July 2, 1990, or in 2000, or at any other time.  The length of my holding period will tell nothing about how "long-term" my thinking was.  A lower rate of tax on capital gains is often justified as a way to increase investment, particularly in "risk-taking."  Presumably, that is what lies behind the claim that cutting the tax will raise economic growth.  This proposition needs to be divided into two parts.  One is that the tax change will increase total investment.  To do that it must increase total saving.  It will increase the after-tax return on saving invested in forms most likely to yield capital gains.  But this is a weak reed to lean much weight upon.  Whether increasing the after-tax return to saving in general increases saving, whether increasing the after-tax return to a particular kind of saving increases saving in total, whether increasing the after-tax return to this particular kind of saving is more effective in increasing saving than is increasing the after-tax return to other kinds of saving or to saving in total -- all are unanswered questions.  Particular attention is given to "risk-taking."  But I never hear any discussion of the question, "What's so great about risk-taking, after all?"  People love to point to the marvelous successes of some risk-taking enterprises.  But the essence of risk-taking is that it also involves some marvelous losses, which we never hear about.  If we compare two potential investments, one that promises to yield a sure 10% and one that promises equal possibilities of a 30% gain and a 10% loss, is there any reason for public policy to prefer the latter?  Is there any reason to think that investors are "too risk-averse"?  A good tax system would neither prefer nor penalize risk-taking.  The chief implication of that for the taxation of capital gains is the need to provide more liberal deduction of capital losses.  Even the case for this probably has been reduced by the development of financial institutions that can diversify and offset losses with gains.  What greases the path for cutting the capital-gains tax today is the apparent need for revenue today coupled with the belief that cutting the tax will increase the revenue.  This subject has been hashed over a great deal.  I think that the conclusions are inescapable.  No one knows with confidence what the revenue effect of cutting the rate would be.  Viewed in relation to the revenues and revenue needs of the federal government over a long period of time, the net effect, whether plus or minus, is most probably negligible.  Only the fact that we now look at the federal budget one year at a time, and often it seems one month at a time, makes the revenue consequences at all interesting.  Finally, we come to the only clearly valid part of the case for "reform" of the capital-gains tax.  That is the fact that with inflation, the present tax imposes very high taxes on real gains.  Thus, if an asset rises by 10% in a year, when prices rise by 5%, a tax of 28% on the nominal gain is a tax of approximately 56% on the real gain.  Two points must be made about this, however:  a) If the real gain is large relative to the inflation rate, and if the holding period is long, the value of deferring the tax will exceed the excess burden due to the inflation.  b) The taxation of nominal interest earnings in a period of inflation imposes a similar excess burden.  In the simplest case, if you have a savings account paying 5% interest in a period of 5% inflation you are paying an infinite tax on your zero real income.  Indexing capital gains for inflation would probably be a reform.  One has to say "probably" because the tax system is so full of anomalies and inequalities that one cannot be sure that correcting one will not worsen others.  If indexing is what comes out of Congress this year it probably will be a gain, offsetting the cost of the public miseducation and disinformation that has been released on this subject during the past two years.  ---  A former chairman of the president's Council of Economic Advisers, Mr. Stein is an American Enterprise Institute fellow.  Mazda Motor Corp. aggressively raised the prices on some of its 1990-model cars in line with its efforts to develop a more upscale image.  The Japanese auto maker boosted U.S. base prices as much as 8.9% on the redesigned 1990-model 323 subcompact scheduled to go on sale next month.  Mazda also significantly raised base prices on the least expensive versions of its 626 sedan and MX-6 coupe compacts by adding an AM-FM cassette stereo as standard equipment.  The $12,459 sticker price of the base 626 1990-model will be 8.8%, or $1,010, more than the base 1989-model.  The $12,270 price of the base MX-6 model represents a 7.7%, or $880, increase.  The smallest price increases came on Mazda's most and least expensive models.  The base price of the 1990-model Mazda 929 sedan will rise 1.7%, or $400, to $23,300.  The base-model 323 hatchback's price rose 2.3%, or $150, to $6,599.  But the 323 SE model's 1990 base price jumped 8.9%, or $680, to $8,329.  Mazda said on a "comparably equipped" basis, the prices of its 1990 cars will rise an average of 2.9%.  The company hasn't released prices for its 1990-model light trucks.  The base price of the hot-selling MX-5 Miata convertible, introduced earlier this summer as a 1990 model, will remain $13,800.  Mazda's aggressive pricing strategy runs counter to some other import brands that are minimizing their price rises to remain competitive in the U.S. market.  Nissan Motor Co. already restructured its entry-level Sentra car line by eliminating some models and making standard equipment optional on other 1990 versions.  Honda Motor Co. and Toyota Motor Corp. haven't released their 1990 prices.  West German luxury sports car maker Porsche AG announced earlier this month a price freeze on its 1990 cars.  Porsche also eliminated its least expensive model.  British luxury car maker Jaguar PLC hasn't released its prices yet, but officials in London said they plan to keep the 1990 price of the XJ-6 sedan close to the discounted 1989 price of $39,000.  Meanwhile, the Big Three auto makers plan to raise prices of their 1990 models 3% to 9% even though sales have declined this year.  Mazda's pricing moves are part of an effort to create more of an upscale image for its cars.  When Mazda entered the U.S. 20 years ago, it used a "great little car" theme to position products as a lower-priced option to domestic and other Japanese cars.  "As time goes on, more and more car buyers will be looking for more than low prices and high value," said George McCabe, group vice president, sales and marketing for Mazda's U.S. sales and marketing arm.  "They're also going to be searching for the intangibles inherent in a premium quality brand."  Mazda officials said they are studying the feasibility of adding a luxury car sales division in the U.S. similar to Toyota's Lexus and Nissan's Infiniti car lines.  Mr. McCabe also predicted that Mazda will sell 370,000 cars and trucks in the U.S. by the end of this year and 401,000 next year.  Most of the increase, he said, will come from the new Miata convertible and added production of the 626 model at Mazda's Flat Rock, Mich., assembly plant.  A seat on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was sold for $440,000, down $60,000 from the previous sale Aug. 1.  Seats currently are quoted at $435,000 bid, $474,000 asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $550,000, set in March of this year.  Fluor Corp. said its Fluor Daniel unit received a contract from Dallas-based Kimberly-Clark Corp. to design and build a tissue mill in Loudon, Tenn.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The mill is scheduled to be completed in February 1991.  Fluor is an engineering, construction and technical services company with investments in coal and lead.  APACHE Corp., a Denver-based oil and gas concern, said it is calling for redemption of its $69 million of 8 1/2% convertible subordinated debentures, due 2006, at a price of $1,059.50 for each $1,000 face amount, and accrued interest, making the total price $1,092.79.  Holders also can convert the bonds to stock at $11.125 a share.  Apache said the move will strengthen its balance sheet and increase cash available for operations about $4 million a year.  COCA-COLA BOTTLING CO. CONSOLIDATED said it intends to purchase its 12 1/8% subordinated notes due 1995 as part of its efforts to reduce the average cost of debt.  It said it will buy back the notes at $1,060 per $1,000 principal amount.  The Charlotte, N.C., company said Salomon Brothers will act as the dealer-manager for the tender offer.  It said repurchase of all $87.4 million notes outstanding would result in an extraordinary charge of about $7 million in the third quarter.  Pathe Communications Corp., Beverly Hills, Calif., reported a loss of $27.2 million for the second quarter, compared with net income of $7 million, or 63 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue slipped to $76.8 million from $79.4 million.  The latest results include a special gain of $2.4 million from extinguishment of debt.  The year-earlier quarter included a gain of $7.5 million from sales of assets and subsidiaries.  The film company, controlled by Italian financier Giancarlo Parretti, said it is continuing to restructure operations and began production of films through its Pathe Entertainment unit during the quarter.  Pathe said it expects to issue $60 million in stock to Renta Inmobiliaria S.A. in the third quarter, as approved by shareholders June 16.  That, in addition to advances and increased lines of credit, will enable Pathe to "adequately meet its financial commitments," the company said.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Pathe fell 12.5 cents, to $3.125.  Sears, Roebuck & Co.'s flashy new electronic home-shopping system is happily undercutting a prominent member of its Sears Financial Network, Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  A growing number of Dean Witter's nearly 8,000 brokers say they're furious at Sears for funneling investment business to a Dean Witter competitor that charges investors a fraction of the commissions they must levy.  The issue is Prodigy, an electronic information and transaction system that lets people shop at home from their computer terminals.  That includes buying and selling stocks, bonds and other financial instruments without having to call a broker at Dean Witter or any other firm.  Prodigy is jointly owned by the retailing concern and International Business Machines Corp.  The riled Dean Witter brokers see Prodigy eroding their franchise.  The unkindest cut is that Sears, which acquired Dean Witter eight years ago, isn't even using Dean Witter to process the trades made through Prodigy.  It prefers the Pershing division of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Inc., a securities subsidiary of Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S., which competes with Sears's Allstate Insurance Group unit.  "Imagine my surprise when the neighbor I've been pitching investment ideas to tells me about this new service owned by Sears that lets him buy and sell whatever he wants on his home computer and it will cost him 75% to 80% less than what I can charge and even less than a discount broker charges," says a Dean Witter account executive on the West Coast.  "Then my neighbor says, 'Doesn't this hurt you?'"  The unfolding conflict between Sears and Dean Witter illustrates how competitive the quest for revenue has become on Wall Street.  In this case, two arms of the same company are stepping on each other's turf while wooing the same customers.  Indeed, brokers say Sears employees have visited Dean Witter offices to explain how Prodigy works.  "There's nothing to prevent a Dean Witter client putting a 200-share order through Dean Witter and a 1,000-share order through Prodigy and it already happens," says Reece Musick, a former Dean Witter broker.  The arrangement that permits such a thing "doesn't make a lot of sense," he adds.  Asked about the apparent rivalry between Prodigy and Dean Witter, a Sears spokesman in Chicago says: "That's a question for Dean Witter.  If they feel there's been an adverse impact, they'll let us know.  It's their call."  So far, Dean Witter officials say they see only promise from Prodigy, which costs $9.95 a month plus the local phone bills incurred from its use. (Prodigy's software sells for less than $50 and a modem needed to connect a personal computer to the phone system costs about $100).  "We understand brokers think there is a bit of a conflict," says James Flynn, a Dean Witter spokesman.  "But our strategy is to use Prodigy for leads" in pursuit of new customers.  "We get anywhere from 1,200 to 2,000 leads a month" from Prodigy.  But the brokers tell another story.  Several Dean Witter financial planners, who requested anonymity because they fear retribution from the firm, say Prodigy is a major threat to them in the same way it hurts travel agents who lose business to Prodigy users making airline reservations.  "We're a full-service brokerage network promoted by Sears that charges the full commission and rarely discounts," says a Dean Witter broker.  "Yet here we are competing with our parent company.  Discount firms charge 40% to 50% less in commissions than we do.  But Prodigy charges as much as 75% to 80% less."  For instance, compare commissions on a purchase order for 1,000 shares of a $50 stock, such as General Electric Co.  "If you go to Dean Witter, the full commission will be about $609," says a Dean Witter broker.  "If I'm lucky and very good, I may be able to provide a discount of 50% to $305.  If you go to a discount broker, it will cost you about $191.  But the guy sitting at home using Prodigy will pay only $150.  Even when you add his monthly rental charge for Prodigy and local phone bills, the entire Prodigy system is less then a full commission trade at Dean Witter."  While the policy toward commission discounts can differ at Dean Witter offices, brokers almost never get the chance to provide discounts exceeding 50% of the full commission.  "Each office is different," says Thomas Wagner, a former Dean Witter broker in New York.  "In our office, the branch manager had a no-discount policy."  So what's the risk of Dean Witter clients switching to Prodigy and Pershing?  "That's a risk every day," says Mr. Flynn of Dean Witter.  "But that just doesn't happen.  Chances are if you're talking to a Dean Witter broker you're going to give him your business."  As for Dean Witter brokers themselves using Prodigy, "I guarantee it never happens," says Mr. Flynn.  "You work here, you like it here, you do business here."  At Pershing, which handles about 10% of the daily volume on the New York Stock Exchange, Prodigy is an important part of the firm's growth strategy.  "Obviously, there will be a value in an account representative who helps customers pick stocks" and charges full commissions for that service, says Richard Brueckner, a Pershing managing director.  "Prodigy is designed for people who make their own investment decisions and we think this is the fastest growing segment" of the individual market.  David LaRoche, chairman and majority stockholder of Neco Enterprises Inc., sold the company a major block of stock he owns in a financially ailing Massachusetts savings bank, Neco disclosed.  The sale of the stock by Mr. LaRoche is the second major recent sale of assets by him to Neco, which last week disclosed that it bought $20.5 million in real estate from Mr. LaRoche.  Neco said it acquired 165,000 shares of Home Owners Savings Bank stock from Mr. LaRoche, increasing its stake in Home Owners to about 270,800 shares, or 4.6% of the shares outstanding.  The company said it paid Mr. LaRoche $933,000 in convertible debentures for the Home Owners shares.  Neco's total investment in Home Owners stock is $1.5 million.  The sale by Mr. LaRoche, who once owned about 9.9% of Home Owners, reduces his stake to about 225,000 shares, or 3.8%.  Home Owners, which had grown rapidly in the mid-1980s, has suffered as the New England real estate market has slumped.  In the nine months ended Sept. 30, the company had a net loss of $7.4 million.  Mr. LaRoche was named Neco's chairman and chief executive last spring, following a three-year struggle to gain control of the company.  Neco's former chairman, Richard B. Sheffield, who left in part because of differences with Mr. LaRoche, earlier criticized Neco's purchase of real estate from Mr. LaRoche.  Since Mr. LaRoche took control of the company, Neco has agreed to sell its principal operating unit, Neco Electric Corp., and said it plans to restructure and diversify into non-utility businesses.  Two Indianapolis businessmen have purchased the Seattle Mariners baseball franchise for $76 million.  The price was based on a recent independent appraisal of the team.  The Mariners were purchased from George Argyros, a California real-estate developer who bought the team eight years ago for $13.1 million.  The new owners are Michael Browning, 41 years old, an Indianapolis real-estate developer, and Jeff Smulyan, 42, owner of Indianapolis-based Emmis Broadcasting, a chain of radio stations.  The new owners said they will keep the Mariners, who play in the American League, in Seattle.  The team, founded in 1977, has never had a winning season.  Apple Computer Inc. said it won part of a contract to supply the Air Force with at least 10,000 personal computers, boosting the company's effort to win a piece of the fast-growing market for technical machines.  Apple didn't specify its share of a $164 million contract awarded to Honeywell Inc., but analysts estimated the company would receive at least $50 million over the life of the five-year contract.  While the value of the award is relatively small, it signals that Apple's Macintosh is increasingly viewed as an alternative to workstations, which are powerful desktop computers widely used by engineers and scientists.  Workstations generally run software on a common operating system known as Unix.  To satisfy the military's Unix requirement, Apple developed its own variant of this operating system.  Kimball Brown, an analyst at Prudential-Bache, said the Air Force's award was an endorsement of Apple's version of Unix.  "It's not a monster play in terms of dollars," he said.  "But it supports Apple's entry into the Unix world."  In national over-the-counter trading, Apple closed yesterday at $42.875, up 62.5 cents.  Several years ago, Apple launched a major effort to obtain federal contracts, but until now hasn't been successful in landing big awards.  The Air Force award is the largest the firm has received to date.  Earlier this month, the company announced a $30.2 million award from the U.S. Postal Service.  A spokeswoman said the Air Force has the option to purchase additional computers and related equipment such as printers.  PepsiCo Inc. sells some of its sodas in three-liter plastic bottles, partly to cut down on packaging and trash.  There's just one problem: The container has bombed with consumers because it "doesn't fit in the refrigerator," says Sal Porrazzo, director of environmental affairs at the company's Pepsi-Cola division.  Wendy's International Inc. is testing a paper plate to replace its foam plates, "but customers don't want it," company officials say.  Wendy's suffered the same response when it offered paper coffee cups, so now it sells coffee only in foam cups.  Procter & Gamble Co. offers its Downy fabric softener in concentrated form, which requires less packaging than ready-to-use products.  But the concentrate version must be mixed with water, and sales have been poor, the company says.  Each false start illustrates a growing dilemma for food and consumer-products companies: How can they satisfy environmentalist concerns without reducing the demand for their products?  The problem arises, says Deborah D. Anderson, who heads P&G's three-year-old environmental task force on trash, because "American consumers want convenience."  Citing the poor Downy sales, she says most people won't favor one product over another simply because it generates less waste.  "Contrary to popular belief," she adds, "we can't stuff these things down people's throats."  The pressure on consumer-product companies to make environmentally beneficial changes comes from communities and environmental activists concerned about overflowing landfills.  The average American generates about 3 1/2 pounds of trash a day -- or a national total of about 158 million tons a year.  With both the population and per-capita consumption increasing, that may reach about 193 million tons by the year 2000, says Franklin Associates, a Prairie Village, Kan., consulting firm.  Many companies have responded to the pressure.  At others, the research and marketing departments are fighting over how to balance environmental goals and consumer desires.  In addition, about 800 different pieces of legislation to curb trash and mandate recycling are under consideration or have been passed this year.  "We can no longer afford a throwaway society," says Bob Long, a St. Paul, Minn., councilman who led a successful fight to ban packaging materials not considered reusable or biodegradable.  Such legislation worries many companies.  Purchasing and distribution will become a nightmare, they say, if they have to eliminate certain plastics, for example, in one region but not in others.  These laws are proliferating.  Florida's legislature has passed a sweeping solid-waste law that, among other things, will tax any package that doesn't meet recycling standards and will prohibit plastic grocery bags that aren't deemed biodegradable.  Berkeley, Calif., is banning polystyrene foam, such as coffee cups at fast-food restaurants, as of January.  Suffolk County, N.Y., has approved a ban, effective next February, on foam coffee cups and lids; the plastics industry has challenged the law in court.  "Corporations are just going nuts because every community is coming up with its own law," says William Rathje, an archaeologist studying the trash crisis.  In addition, many companies think the environmentalists and their legislative allies are going overboard.  Pepsi-Cola's Mr. Porrazzo contends that laws to curb or ban two-liter plastic bottles are too punitive because soft-drink containers account for less than 2% of U.S. solid waste.  Yet many companies are cutting out unnecessary packaging and are trying hard to find other solutions.  Mr. Porrazzo puts the environmental issue at the top of Pepsi-Cola's agenda: "It's no longer a luxury.  It's a business necessity."  P&G is testing the use of recycled plastics in bottles for its Spic & Span cleaners and liquid Tide detergent.  McDonald's Corp. is recycling its foam sandwich cartons, which Rubbermaid Inc. melts into fast-food trays.  McDonald's also expects to save about 90 million pounds of packaging a year through such moves as changing how its Coca-Cola syrup is delivered.  Instead of shipping it in individual cartons, the company now delivers the syrup by tanker truck and pipes it into its restaurants.  Orange-juice concentrate has replaced shipments of ready-to-drink juice.  But many companies are leery of packaging changes that, by reducing convenience, might reduce sales.  H.J. Heinz Co. is seeking alternatives to its plastic squeeze bottles for ketchup.  But with plastic bottles now accounting for about a third of all ketchup sold in the U.S., the company has doubts about the feasibility of converting consumers back to its traditional ketchup bottle.  "You can't squeeze glass," a company official says.  Burger King Corp., which already uses paperboard rather than polystrene for its sandwich cartons, still sells salads in plastic containers because it suspects that customers would resist a switch to cardboard.  "They like to see the salad because they're not really sure what they're going to get," says Chet England, the group director of quality and food safety.  Change is especially risky for well-known brands that depend on preserving their package design to ensure consumer loyalty.  When Eastman Kodak Co. tested the idea of eliminating its yellow film boxes, it found that photographers buying film by the case didn't seem bothered but that ordinary consumers didn't like it at all.  Without the box, says Dick D. Lorbach, the director of world-wide planning for Kodak's consumer products, "there's an implication of lesser value."  But perhaps the toughest challenge in balancing consumer desires against environmental concerns is finding a disposable diaper that is truly biodegradable.  The political pressure is building.  In St. Paul, Mr. Long plans to propose that licensed day-care centers be required to allow parents to choose cloth diapers instead of disposables.  In Berkeley, Councilwoman Nancy Skinner wants to keep diapers out of landfills.  In Vermont, officials are helping cloth-diaper services to start up by offering counsel and financial assistance.  Many parents, concerned about disposables but not wanting to bother with cloth diapers, are using disposables made of plastic containing cornstarch or oils, which some researchers believe speeds disintegration of the outside cover.  Early tests, however, showed that plastics laced with cornstarch can be difficult to recycle.  RMed International, of Sedona, Ariz., says its first-half sales topped its 1988 total of $600,000 because of its new TenderCare diapers, which the company calls 98% biodegradable.  The diapers also are free of chemicals because they don't use the "slurper" material found in super-absorbent disposables.  Officials at P&G and Kimberly-Clark Corp. contend that their diapers are as biodegradable as any on the market.  But P&G officials say they soon will sell in Britain a more biodegradable diaper, one with a plastic backsheet made with cornstarch.  The officials add, however, that they won't try such a diaper in the U.S. until they're convinced it works.  Instead, P&G's U.S. research focuses on how diapers can be washed and reused in other products, such as flower pots and building insulation.  Even with such efforts, companies will be most strongly encouraged to produce environmentally benign products if consumers show a willingness to buy them.  In Europe, experts say, consumers are readier to accept changes in packaging or products to protect the environment.  For example, P&G has found that Europeans will buy its Vizir and Lenor brands of detergents in concentrate form and mix them at home in a reusable bottle.  But so far, Ms. Anderson says, Americans prefer to pour detergents straight out of a bottle.  McDonald's encounters resistance to new uses for its trash.  It has been testing mini-incinerators that convert trash into energy in its parking lots, and one store uses heat from an incinerator to melt parking-lot ice in the winter.  But in most areas, McDonald's finds that local groups worry whether the incinerators will pollute the air, even though Shelby Yastrow, a senior vice president, says the emissions are mostly carbon dioxide and water vapor and "less offensive than a barbecue."  Mr. Yastrow is convinced that most Americans really don't want to give up their plastic life styles.  "Look at what people are doing, not what they're saying," he says.  "Most people who march in front of our restaurants still put their children in disposable diapers.  Or they picket us, then go inside and order a sandwich."  ---  @ Convenience vs.  Environmentalism  @ McDonald's Corp. -- It contemplates a return to paper coffee cups, but worries consumers will balk because, unlike the foam variety, paper cups leak.  PepsiCo Inc. -- Its three-liter bottle, designed partly to reduce the use of plastic, has bombed because consumers consider it too big for refrigerators.  H.J. Heinz Co. -- Its squeezable ketchup bottle is a great hit among consumers but anathema to environmentalists because it's plastic.  Burger King Corp. -- It packages sandwiches in paper but says consumers prefer salads in plastic containers.  In the 1950s, Louis Kelso had a vision of an increasingly technological society in which productivity would be increased largely through capital improvements and in which employees could participate not only through their labor but through ownership.  And so he devised Employee Stock Ownership Plans, or ESOPs, whereby an employer either gives employees stock, or extends or guarantees a loan for them to buy stock; the loan is then repaid with earnings and dividends generated by the stock.  The ESOP Association convention in Washington in June demonstrated ESOPs' growing popularity world-wide.  The most interesting possibility for ESOPs is their use in privatizing state-owned companies in communist countries.  There, the main obstacle to reforming the economy is managers' and employees' lack of interest in the results of their labor; this leads to low productivity, inefficiency and waste.  China, the Soviet Union and Poland sent representatives to the ESOP convention.  China fielded a high-level government delegation that expressed interest in applying ESOP-like mechanisms on a large scale in China's cooperative and public enterprises.  The Soviet Union dispatched an economist, who talked about the beginnings of the ESOP movement there.  Soviet ESOPs are concentrated in the Baltic republics, where they are productivity boosters even though the workers have no ownership rights and must pay a surtax if they make "too much" profit.  Nevertheless, the results are considered successful enough to warrant an expansion of the program within those republics. (Apparently there are no plans to organize ESOPs in other republics because they are not considered entrepreneurial enough.)  It is in Poland, however, that ESOPs have the greatest chance of success.  The Polish delegation to the convention consisted of four Solidarity members: Jan Mujzel of the Solidarity Economic Commission; Barbara Blaszccyk, an employee ownership expert; and Jan Kalita and Ryszard Wrzensinski, presidents of two enterprises' workers' councils. (Workers' councils would be the executive bodies of any ESOPs.) In Poland's national debate on economic reforms and property rights, Solidarity and the Communist Party agree that privatization must be the base of a market economy.  But they differ on a fundamental question: Who owns the factories and enterprises?  The state, as represented by the government bureaucracy, or the employees of these enterprises?  In response to calls for private enterprise and competitiveness, the Communist government increasingly has turned to "nomenklatura capitalism," whereby ownership of state enterprises is transferred wholly to their Communist managers or state resources are used to set up Communist Party members in businesses that complement or fulfill needs created by the inadequacy of state-owned enterprises.  Solidarity opposes this, of course, and further fears that the capital assets of state-owned enterprises have such a low value that they might be sold out to foreign investors.  And so Solidarity appears to be leaning toward ESOPs as the best way to privatize the economy.  This was one of the points of its recent roundtable negotiations with the Communist Party.  According to the ESOP plan Solidarity is considering, some key enterprises would remain state-owned, but most would be transferred to employee ownership or to joint ownership between an ESOP and the state or an ESOP and a foreign investor.  ESOP companies would become to some extent quasi-stock markets; their own share-trading and investment sources could substitute for the capital market that does not exist in Poland.  Under the plan, the first step is the organization of an International Advisory Board for Employee Ownership Development, which would advise enterprises on how to set up ESOPs and oversee the banks that would finance them.  This board is being organized by Krzysztof Ludwiniak, director of international operations of ESOP Services, a consulting firm based in Baltimore.  The board will work closely with three other organizations interested in promoting ESOPs in Poland.  One is the Solidarity Economic Research Institute, being set up by, among others, Mr. Mujzel of the economic commission.  The second is the economics department of Catholic University in Lublin, which is a focus of free-market-oriented Solidarity economists.  Catholic groups are particularly interested in ESOPs because this mechanism of privatization agrees with the social teachings of the church.  The Federation of Workers' Councils, whose two representatives attended the ESOP convention in Washington, is the third group studying ESOPs.  Poles and potential foreign investors worry that letting workers' councils manage factories would result in runaway inflation, uncontained wage demands, and a chaotic economy, as happened in Yugoslavia.  But Yugoslavian workers' councils are controlled by Communist Party nomenklatura, while Polish councils have ownership aspirations and want to transform the self-management movement into the employee-shareholder movement.  Poland has a small tradition of employee ownership and privatization of state-owned companies.  Gasolina, a company that made equipment for the oil and gas industry in Lvov (now in the Soviet Union), was employee-owned and extremely profitable from its inception in 1912 until World War II. Starting with fewer than a dozen employees, by 1939 it employed more than a thousand workers.  The initial group of investors controlled 54% of the equity and the remaining 46% was spread among other employees in proportion to their length of employment and position within the company.  Using Gasolina as a model, the prewar Polish government started in 1937 to develop a plan for privatization of the large state-owned industrial conglomerate Wspolnota Interesow Ltd., which employed more than 30,000 workers.  Needless to say, World War II interrupted this process.  Many questions must be answered before ESOPs can be successfully implemented in Poland.  Can they work in the absence of a strong legal framework and an adequate business infrastructure?  What will be the response to calls of "inequality" when ESOPs result in some workers owning shares in competitive, valuable enterprises, while others, thanks partly to bad luck, own shares that are nearly worthless?  Will ESOPs contribute to the modernization of the Polish economy if they reward mainly industrial workers, already the highest-paid class in Poland?  Are they going to stem the tide of emigration of highly educated young people?  Where will the money to buy ESOP shares come from?  Who will sit on the ESOP fiduciary trust boards?  How will state-owned enterprises be valued in the absence of marketdetermined prices?  These are difficult but not insurmountable issues.  If they can be resolved, they could transform the Polish economy.  ---  Miss Swiatkowski is a Washington consultant on Eastern Europe.  Merger-and-acquisition professionals must be licensed as real-estate brokers in California, a state appeals court judge recently ruled.  Few are, so Wall Street deal makers are in a tizzy.  The big worry is that disgruntled investment banking clients -- relying on the ruling -- might refuse to pay fees, or might sue to recover funds paid.  This apparently hasn't happened, but some firms wouldn't publicly discuss the decision out of fear of becoming a litigation target.  "Everyone wants to be free to say 'this doesn't apply to me,'" one securities attorney said.  Based on a little-noticed clause in the state code, Judge Armand Arabian ruled June 21 that Barrington Associates, a small Los Angeles investment banking concern, couldn't collect a $227,800 fee because it lacked the real-estate license required to legally negotiate sale of a "business opportunity."  The decision is so sweeping, attorneys say, it could be applied to most large transactions, such as a tender offer to California investors by an out-of-state company.  Deal makers practicing without a real-estate license are subject to $5,000 in fines and six months in prison.  "It's a ludicrous decision," railed James Freedman, managing director of Barrington, which specializes in transactions valued at between $5 million and $150 million.  "This is sending a shock wave through our industry," said Lloyd Greif, executive vice president of corporate finance at Sutro & Co., a 131-year-old San Francisco investment banking firm.  While most M&A professionals are perplexed about what to do, their attorneys in California and New York are telling them that the decision has the force of law and must be taken seriously.  "Investment bankers have two shots before they go to real-estate school -- one in the courts and one in the legislature," said Guido R. Henry Jr., a partner in the Los Angeles office of Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy, one of the law firms representing Barrington.  Several New York firms are helping pay Barrington's legal bills, Mr. Freedman said.  He wouldn't identify the firms, citing "sensitivities" about their support.  A Goldman, Sachs & Co. spokesman acknowledged that the firm "is one of five participating in the petition."  CS First Boston Group, believed to be another, wouldn't comment.  Barrington petitioned the California Supreme Court July 31 to review the appellate court decision.  In a nutshell, Barrington argues that the court erred by extending the definition of "the sale of a business opportunity" to include sophisticated corporate transactions.  The California "business opportunity" license was created in 1937 to protect sellers of grocery stores, gasoline service stations, bakers and other small businesses, the petition says. (The business opportunity and real-estate licensing requirements were merged in 1965 because it was decided that the value of most small businesses is largely reflected in their property holdings.)  The Securities Industry Association, whose 625 members conduct more than 90% of all U.S. securities business, has retained Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom to file a friend-of-the-court brief with the California Supreme Court.  And Orrick, Herrington & Sutcliffe, another law firm working for the trade group, is working feverishly in Sacramento to get an amendment to the state code passed before legislators adjourn Sept. 15 for the year.  Despite the importance of the case to investment bankers, the California court might be too busy reviewing death-penalty convictions and other matters to hear the case.  If the court does agree to consider Barrington, a decision could be a year or more away.  Thus, simply changing the law might be a swifter, surer solution.  "We're working on putting Humpty Dumpty together again," said Sen. John Garamendi (D., Sacramento) who introduced a securities industry-sponsored measure.  The measure, which technically amends Senate Bill 1209, could come up for a vote on the assembly floor next week.  The amendment would exempt licensed broker-dealers, who are already regulated by state and federal authorities, from the real-estate license requirement.  Sen. Garamendi noted that the issue poses potential political problems with the real-estate industry that he has been working to avoid.  "The Realtors don't want us to do anything that diminishes their turf; I don't think we will," he said.  Real-estate agents have complained about increasing competition from the real-estate brokerage divisions of Morgan Stanley & Co., Merrill Lynch & Co. and other investment banking giants.  While these divisions hold real-estate brokerage licenses -- and aren't an issue in the Barrington case -- their success has contributed to concerns about poachers.  "We don't want securities dealers involved in our business," said Alexander Creel, vice president of governmental affairs for the California Association of Realtors.  But real-estate agents probably will accept a proposal that eliminates any dual license requirement for firms that stick to the traditional investment banking business, he said.  "It doesn't make sense {under such circumstances} to require multiple licenses," agreed Robin Wilson, chief legal counsel in the state's Department of Real Estate.  There haven't been any recent complaints or criminal prosecutions involving "business opportunity sales" and there are no plans to investigate investment banking firms, he added.  However, the real-estate department did submit a brief in the Barrington appellate case advising that the company should have a real-estate license.  Barrington, like many small investment banking concerns, has neither a real-estate brokerage nor a broker-dealer license.  The emerging legislative solution thus appears likely to exclude Barrington and other unlicensed investment banking firms.  The big New York and regional firms are licensed broker-dealers, but some small investment banking concerns have been exempted from securities license requirements because they don't receive or hold funds or securities for their customers.  While state real-estate schools say they haven't noticed many new students in pinstriped suits, a handful of M&A specialists are getting licenses to play it safe.  "We've starting signing up our people and some have already started taking classes," Barrington's Mr. Freedman said.  ---  @ California's Top Deal Makers  Ranked by dollar value of 1988 transactions in which the acquiring or acquired company was based in California.  @ Estimated % of Total  @ Amount Market Number Number  @Financial Adviser (in mils)* Share Of Deals Of Deals  @Goldman Sachs $14,627.8 36.8% 26 3.8%  @Drexel Burnham  @ Lambert 14,079.2 35.4 36 5.3  @Morgan Stanley 12,410.8 31.2 21 3.1  @First Boston 11,526.4 29.0 15 2.2  @Shearson Lehman  @ Hutton 10,459.6 26.3 25 3.7  @Salomon Brothers 7,943.7 20.0 17 2.5  @Conning 5,308.5 13.4 1 0.1  @Lazard Freres 3,460.8 8.7 6 0.9  @PaineWebber 2,001.4 5.0 8 1.2  @Wasserstein Perella 1,566.0 3.9 2 0.3  @TOTAL $39,720.84 683  @*Adds to more than total because all advisers participating in a transaction are credited with the full value  @Source: IDD Information Services  Quick & Reilly Group Inc., New York, said its discount-brokerage unit agreed to buy the majority of accounts of Marine Midland Banks Inc.'s discount-brokerage unit, OvestMarine.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The Quick & Reilly Inc. unit, which has 425,000 accounts nationwide, said its purchase of 18,000 OvestMarine accounts would give it access to a group in the New York metropolitan area.  The purchase is expected to close in late September.  Marine Midland is a unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp., Hong Kong.  Quick & Reilly Inc. also said it completed buying the assets of Fred Bonnell & Co., a Boulder, Colo., discount brokerage firm, adding about 5,600 customer accounts.  Quick & Reilly Inc. also agreed to buy about 13,000 discount-brokerage customer accounts from Cary Grant & Co., Chicago, which had purchased the discount brokerage firm of Haas Securities Inc.  That transaction is expected to be completed in early September.  Xerox Corp., Stamford, Conn., and Du Pont Co., Wilmington, Del., signed a letter of intent for Du Pont to acquire Xerox Medical Systems from Xerox.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Xerox had earlier announced its intention to sell its medical unit, which incorporates xerographic technology in diagnostic devices, in order to focus on its core document and financial-services businesses.  Du Pont said the acquisition is part of a planned expansion of its diagnostic-imaging business.  "The intention is to flex our muscles and see what we could do better," said Mike Ricciuto, a spokesman for the diversified chemicals company.  "Our interest in this is from a technological standpoint."  Xerox Medical Systems has 15% to 20% of the market for mammographic machines, its primary product.  There's never a shortage of bad ideas.  One of the latest is a proposal made at the Paris summit of the G-7 in June that the 12 European Community countries create a common currency.  What a blow that would be to every European business catering to the whims and excesses of American tourists]  If we really knew what we were spending while wandering around Dinkelsbuehl, Dijon and Dover, we wouldn't be doing nearly as much of it.  Everywhere you go they have funny money.  It comes in funny colors and funny sizes and has funny looking people and funny looking castles.  Even in Britain, with which we share a common language, sort of, the monetary unit is incomprehensible to the average American.  What the hell are 10 quid?  Are they better sauteed or breaded and do they come with a salad?  Twelve bob.  What's that?  Twelve guys named Bob or a bunch of sleds?  Pounds, francs, lira, it's all play money to most Americans touring the Old Country.  None of it has any value or meaning to us.  Who in their right mind would hand over 2,000 of something for a newspaper, and a day old newspaper at that?  People of Western Europe, get serious] We want to feel lost and intimidated when we visit you.  If we understood the currency or had no trouble instantly converting its true worth in our heads, what would we talk about back home?  Fourteen years after the fact, my wife still needles me about the time I handed a cabdriver what I thought was a 50 for a short ride to the train station.  As our train pulled out, I checked my finances and discovered it was a 500.  The cabbie hadn't blinked or even smiled when told to keep the change.  Most people I know who have traveled on their own in Europe have similar adventures to tell.  Frequently their repertoires include an incredibly long story about crossing a border at some out-of-the-way place at an out-of-the-way hour and being out of almost everything -- food, gas, patience and cash.  They find, of course, that the one bank and the one currency exchange are closed either for lunch or for the next three days because of an obscure religious holiday.  Believe it or not, we enjoy the feeling of ineptitude abroad.  We go to countries where we don't speak a word of the language because we're tired of being ept.  We get a buzz from going into a small shop, spotting some piece of local flotsam that we have absolutely no use for and pointing and grunting until the store-owner figures out what all the pointing and grunting is about.  Once this has been accomplished, we reach into our pockets, bring out a mix of bills, coins and lint from 42 na tions and let him take what he wants right out of our palms.  For a shopkeeper, it doesn't get much better than that.  Don't go and spoil it for us.  Please.  We like stopping at a supermarket in Italy for juice and being given a piece of candy or a stamp in lieu of change.  We cherish arguments with our traveling companions over the size of a tip we've left after a marvelous meal.  It's either 17 cents or 17 dollars, but neither of us is sure and at least one of us doesn't care.  We look forward to the currency exchange at the end of our trip which won't accept most of our coins.  So we bring them home and just for cussedness spend our first two weeks back testing whether they will fit in parking meters, toll booths, stamp machines, subway turnstiles and pay toilets.  If we wanted to understand the language and the money on our vacations, we would go to Nebraska.  ---  Mr. McCoy, a writer in Rockville Centre, N.Y., won't be going to Europe much after 1992.  Sea Containers Ltd. said its board authorized the sale of certain hotel assets to a U.S. unit, Sea Containers America Inc.  Sea Containers, a Hamilton, Bermuda-based shipping concern, declined to elaborate on the move, which was detailed in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Some individuals speculated that it may be a prelude to the company's previously announced restructuring.  According to British news reports, James Sherwood, Sea Containers' chief executive officer, said that in a restructuring, Sea Containers' hotel assets may be sold to an Italian company in which he would likely have an interest.  As reported, Sea Containers announced its intentions to recapitalize itself when it rejected a sweetened $63-a-share, or $963 million, tender offer by Stena Holding AG and Tiphook PLC.  The California Department of Insurance tentatively ordered six more major insurers to refund $110.6 million in premiums to consumers and said rates for 34 more carriers would be reviewed under the state's rate-slashing Proposition 103.  But consumer-advocacy groups remain unhappy with the department's implementation, charging that it is mired in procedural confusion and that certain actions taken by the department leave Proposition 103 open to additional litigation.  These insurers, along with seven other carriers who were ordered earlier this month to reduce their rates, represent 47% of California's property and casualty market.  Potential rollbacks from the 47 firms amount to $815.9 million, the department said.  The carriers identified yesterday by the department include United Pacific Insurance Co., with a potential rollback of $10 million; U.S. Fidelity & Guaranty Co., $19 million; Government Employees Insurance Co., $14.3 million; Fireman's Fund Insurance Co., $55.5 million; Century-National Insurance Co., $4.9 million; and CalFarm Insurance Co., $6.9 million.  The Fireman's Fund Corp. unit declined to comment; the other firms weren't immediately available.  Approved by California voters in November, Proposition 103 carried a 20% reduction in property and casualty rates throughout the state.  But in June, the state's Supreme Court essentially voided the rollback in cases where it deprived a company the chance to earn a "fair rate of return" on its investment.  In calculating rollbacks for the industry, the department has established an 11.2% overall rate of return on equity, which it said has been the average U.S. return for property and casualty carriers over the past 15 years.  All 13 firms ordered to roll back their rates had rates of return in 1988 that exceeded that benchmark, the department said.  The additional 34 carriers, mostly medium-sized to smaller-sized insurers, represent potential rollbacks of about $400 million, the department said.  Three weeks ago, the state insurance commissioner, Roxani M. Gillespie, tentatively ordered seven large carriers to roll back their rates a combined $305.3 million.  Those firms included the California State Automobile Association, Progressive Casualty Insurance Co., Safeco Corp., Allstate Insurance Co. and State Farm & Casualty Co.  Consumer-advocacy groups haven't been pleased with Ms. Gillespie's department.  For starters, the department initially didn't tentatively order rollbacks from three big insurers, including Farmers Insurance Exchange, Interinsurance Exchange-Southern California Automobile Club and State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Co., an affiliate of State Farm & Casualty.  The groups said that only after the state attorney general named the firms he wanted targeted for rollbacks did the insurance department indicate it would evaluate the carriers.  DWG Corp. and Andrew Heine, its spurned suitor, failed to resolve their differences during a 30-day cooling-off period and seem destined to square off in court.  DWG, the crown jewel of Miami Beach, Fla., investor Victor Posner's business empire, and Granada Investments Inc., which is controlled by Mr. Heine, had agreed to the 30-day breather but the stay has expired.  A federal judge in Cleveland, meanwhile, set Sept. 11 for a hearing in the case.  Mr. Heine, apparently leaving the door open for a possible resolution of the case, said: "We're still talking."  The legal fireworks followed Granada's $22-a-share, or $572 million, bid for DWG in March, which Mr. Posner has opposed.  In its lawsuit, Granada charges that Mr. Posner and DWG's board have been manipulating the company's stock price.  DWG calls Granada's bid a "scheme to manipulate the market for DWG shares."  DWG owns a textile maker and a gas distributor and holds interests in Royal Crown Cos. and Arby's Inc.  In view of the September hearing, DWG said a shareholders meeting previously set for Oct. 20 will be held later, probably in early to mid-November.  In composite American Stock Exchange trading yesterday, DWG closed at $11.75, down 25 cents.  Today is the 50th anniversary of the "nonaggression" pact through which Hitler and Stalin coordinated their rape of Poland and Stalin's takeover of the Baltic nations.  Latvians, Lithuanians and Estonians will mark the occasion with new defiance of Moscow; a commission of the Lithuanian Supreme Soviet yesterday called the pact an "international crime."  Elsewhere, the Polish people have renounced communism.  An exodus of East Germans dramatizes their discontents.  Does all of this turmoil -- echoed in Czechoslovakia, Hungary and the coal fields of Russia itself -- have importance to the prosperous West?  Surely so.  If nothing else, a record much distorted by Soviet apologists is becoming more clear.  Moscow itself now acknowledges the secret protocols awarding it the Baltic States.  The Russians have appeared close to admitting that incredible later crime, the Katyn Forest massacre of 4,143 Polish military officers, which they traditionally have blamed on the Germans.  It is as if Mikhail Gorbachev wants to purge a half-century of guilts and suspicions as he attempts to establish his own legitimacy.  The key question for the West is how much to help him.  So far, the Western response has been subdued but has at the same time subtly encouraged new political forces, such as Poland's Solidarity.  The Brezhnev Doctrine of permanent sovereignty over Soviet holdings is being quietly ignored.  If the dissidents become more troublesome to Moscow, will that encourage a rebirth of Stalinism, much like the reactionary backlash China has just experienced?  No one really knows, but that fear does not justify timidity in suporting peoples who yearn for Western-style freedoms.  We hardly need reminding that it was timidity in the democracies, and deliberate blindness to terrible deeds, that emboldened Hitler and Stalin to pursue their great crimes.  The Soviet Union does, however, deserve some credit for opening what, to a dictatorship, is a Pandora's box.  Valentin Falin of the Communist Party's Central Committee confirmed the secret addenda's existence on West German television in July.  The Kremlin then permitted an article in Sovietskaya Rossiya that questioned the pact's legality and with it the legality "of all institutions of Soviet power in the Baltic."  Such dramatic revisionism has encouraged Baltic nationalism, a now vigorous movement that a few years ago had seemed anachronistic and feeble.  The Molotov-Ribbentrop revelations also are explosive for Poland, where Solidarity now is exercising its popular mandate.  If the 1939 pact isn't valid, goes the logic, than how about the Allied arrangements that followed it at Yalta and Potsdam?  The Baltic groups will ask the Russians to match historiography with action and end 50 years of occupation by pulling out troops and apparatchiki.  The Balts are talking secession.  But the problems aren't likely to end there.  Now that Moscow has started the war discussion it won't be able to stop it.  A new volume, titled "The Icebreaker" and published in West Germany by a former member of the Soviet secret service, the GRU, does much to refute the myth that Stalin agreed to the Nazi Pact in order to keep peace for the Russian motherland.  Writing under the pseudonym "Suvorov" -- the name of a great Russian field marshal -- the Soviet exile argues that Stalin calculatedly allowed Hitler to commit the first aggressions in the hope they would clear the way for an international socialist revolution.  He claims that the numbers of Soviet prisoners and materiel seized in the first days of the June 1941 Nazi attack were so huge because Stalin himself was preparing to attack Hitler the following month.  What about the consequences of the new revelations and interpretations in Russia itself?  For decades the memory of the motherland's great wartime sacrifice has served as one of the Soviet Communist Party's most powerful instruments for demanding popular support for its leadership and the nation's huge military expenditures.  Schoolchildren are annually marched through cemeteries packed with mass graves of war victims.  They learn to read with primers detailing the hungry days of the Leningrad siege, when citizens received only 200 grams a day of sawdust-bread.  The Great Patriotic War is simultaneously blamed for Soviet backwardness and cited in claims that conditions have improved greatly.  But now the Great Patriotic War is being demythologized.  Can the party that produced a Stalin survive the revelations?  Not long ago we would have asserted confidently that it could easily do so.  But in viewing the visible anger toward communism in this anniversary week, we have begun to wonder.  The nation's savings-and-loan associations had a loss of $3.7 billion in the second quarter as higher interest rates forced thrifts to pay more for deposits and regulators moved into insolvent S&Ls and slashed the book value of assets, the Office of Thrift Supervision said.  The deficit continued a two-year string of multibillion-dollar losses, and showed the industry's performance worsened from a $3.5 billion loss in the first quarter.  The loss narrowed, however, against last year's second quarter, when the loss totaled $4.1 billion.  In other action, regulators said they intend to honor rates on certificates of deposits issued by insolvent savings and loans under their control, or whose deposits and assets are sold to buyers.  Buyers who only purchase the deposits of a thrift and not its assets -- relatively rare and minor transactions -- may pay off the CDs early.  The regulators were seeking to address concerns that the sometimes unusually high rates generally wouldn't be honored in order to bring down the cost of the thrift bailout plan.  The OTS said two large California associations taken over earlier this year by regulators had losses of $1 billion together and were a major factor in the overall results.  Lincoln Savings & Loan, based in Irvine, Calif., had a $788 million loss -- the biggest of any thrift in the quarter -- and Gibraltar Savings, Beverly Hills, had a $332 million loss.  Non-operating losses were $460 million at Lincoln and $280 million at Gibraltar, a sign that regulators found overvalued assets on the thrifts' books and marked them down to market value, James Barth, OTS chief economist, said.  The signing of the thrift rescue bill two weeks ago won't stem the losses immediaely, partly because for the next several quarters regulators will be writing down assets and selling off perhaps 500 other insolvent thrifts.  Mr. Barth said he "wouldn't be surprised" if a third-quarter loss matched that of the second quarter.  The OTS said 232 insolvent savings and loans taken over by the government this year -- but which remained open because regulators didn't have the funds to sell them or pay off depositors -- had losses of $3.2 billion in the second quarter.  The OTS operates under the Treasury Department.  The losses at Lincoln and Gibraltar helped put the total loss in the San Francisco Home Loan Bank district, which also includes Nevada and Arizona, at $1.5 billion, following earnings of $17 million in the first quarter.  Thrifts in the Dallas Home Loan Bank district, though, had the highest total loss in the quarter, $1.6 billion.  That district includes New Mexico, Arkansas, Louisiana, Mississippi and Texas.  Typical of the past several quarters, the industry was divided into two segments: 2,533 solvent thrifts had a total net income of $334 million, while 401 insolvent thrifts had losses totaling $4 billion.  But Mr. Barth said all thrifts had been hurt by paying higher interest rates to draw deposits.  Thrifts are generally hurt more than banks by rising interest rates because the associations make longer-term loans and thus can't adjust the rates they charge as quickly as banks.  The cost of funds, which includes the rates thrifts pay for Federal Home Loan Bank borrowings and other advances, increased to 8.38% from 7.88% in the first quarter.  The highest rate in the second quarter was in the San Francisco Home Loan Bank district, where the cost of funds jumped to 8.75% from 8.09% in the first quarter.  The second-quarter loss also hurt the industry's capital position, leaving tangible capital at $15.5 billion, or 1.15% of assets, measured by generally accepted accounting principles.  It was a decline from $19.2 billion, or 1.43%, at the end of the first quarter.  Under the savings-and-loan bailout law, thrifts must currently meet a 1.5% tangible capital ratio and reach 3% by the end of 1994.  Thrifts that don't meet the criteria must submit a business plan to regulators detailing how they will raise capital.  Separately, officials of the Resolution Trust Corp., the agency created to merge or sell ailing savings and loans, sought to clear up confusion over its policy on honoring certificate-of-deposit rates at thrifts it takes over.  The officials said they have no plans to pay off early those CDs earning unusually high rates in the 264 thrifts now in its conservatorship program.  However, when the RTC transfers a broke thrift's deposits to another institution -- in contrast to a sale of the whole thrift, including assets -- the acquirer may pay off CDs early if it wishes.  David Cooke, RTC executive director, said the agency follows the same policy as the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., which handles bank failures.  There had been some concern that the RTC, which is operated by the FDIC, might pay off high-interest CDs early to bring down costs quickly at the thrifts it is overseeing.  But Mr. Cooke said, "We have no plans to sever deposit contracts in the conservatorship program."  "If we break contracts there's some question what effect that will have on the funding markets," Mr. Cooke said, referring to suggestions that not honoring CD rates might prompt investors to demand even higher rates because of possible risk.  Rather than paying off CDs early, the RTC plans to use most of the $20 billion it will spend by the end of next month replacing high-cost deposits in thrifts as they mature.  The RTC said yesterday it had already injected $921 million into 11 ailing savings and loans.  Socanav Inc. won control of Steinberg Inc. despite a higher offer by Oxdon Investments Inc.  Oxdon withdrew from the contest for the Montreal food retailing and real estate concern yesterday after failing to block Socanav's 1.33 billion Canadian dollar (US$1.13 billion) tender offer.  In the end, Oxdon couldn't overcome Socanav's dual advantages: an exclusive option to acquire a 52% voting block from a Steinberg family group and the financial backing of the Quebec government's big pension fund agency, Caisse de Depot et Placement.  Socanav said that as of yesterday, more than 90% of Steinberg's common stock and a "considerable volume" of Steinberg's non-voting Class A stock had been tendered to its bid.  Socanav extended its offer, which was to have expired yesterday, to Sept. 6.  Oxdon's latest attempt to acquire Steinberg was its third in 18 months.  In the first two tries, Steinberg family members, who hold almost all the voting common stock, didn't bite.  According to people familiar with the transaction, after Oxdon made its second bid last spring, a complicated proposal that didn't offer a premium to holders of common, the three surviving daughters of company founder Sam Steinberg quietly began discussing with Oxdon the sale of their 52% control block.  But after Oxdon made its third bid, a tender offer of C$75 a common share and C$50 a Class A share (later raised to C$53), the Steinberg sisters signed an exclusive option agreement with Socanav, a small Montreal shipping concern.  Socanav then made its tender offer of C$75 a common share and C$51 a Class A share.  In a last ditch attempt to undo Socanav's grip on the controlling block, Oxdon last Friday made a merger proposal to Steinberg's board offering C$80 a common share and C$60 a Class A share.  The board said it declined to "entertain" the merger proposal.  Oxdon is owned equally by Kingsbridge Capital Corp., a merchant bank affiliate of Unicorp Canada Corp., Oxford Development Group Inc., a closely held real estate developer, and Gordon Investment Corp. a brokerage firm.  All three concerns are based in Toronto.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Steinberg Class A shares closed at C$50, down C$1.  Steinberg common isn't publicly traded.  Some Steinberg Class A shareholders weren't pleased with the outcome of the Steinberg contest.  "It's pretty awful," said Stephen Jarislowsky, of Montreal fund manager Jarislowsky Fraser & Co.  "It just shows you should never own non-voting shares."  Mr. Jarislowsky said his firm held a "minor position" in Steinberg.  "We tendered to Socanav {yesterday morning} not because we wanted to but because we had no choice."  "The lock-up agreement prevented any other bids," said William Allen of Allenvest Group Ltd., a Toronto institutional brokerage concern.  Oxdon doesn't walk away from the Steinberg contest empty-handed.  It said it would tender its Steinberg holdings to Socanav.  Based on information in its offering circular, Oxdon will earn a gross profit of C$22 million on the sale of its Steinberg shares.  An Oxdon spokesman couldn't say what the attempt to acquire Steinberg cost Oxdon.  MSA Realty Corp., Indianapolis, said its directors approved a plan to sell the assets of the real estate investment trust and liquidate it, subject to shareholder approval.  MSA owns shopping malls and shopping strips in seven states, which the company said were appraised at about $130 million as of last Dec. 31.  It said it has retained Morgan Stanley Realty to sell the assets.  Jay A. Rosenfeld, president of MSA, said the board approved the liquidation plan because the stock market wasn't reflecting the company's full value.  Sale proceeds would be distributed to shareholders, though the company said it doesn't expect that to occur this year.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, MSA shares closed at $9.50, down 25 cents, giving the company an indicated market value of about $82.1 million, based on about 8.6 million shares outstanding.  Garden State Newspapers Inc. agreed to acquire two daily newspapers in fast-growing metropolitan areas in New Mexico and Virginia, and agreed to sell its daily newspaper in Hamilton, Ohio.  Garden State Newspapers said it will buy the Las Cruces Sun News, a 20,000-circulation daily in Las Cruces, N.M., and the Potomac News, a 25,000-circulation daily in Woodbridge, Va.  Both papers are owned by Worrell Enterprises Inc. of Charlottesville, Va.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Garden State, which owns 19 daily newspapers and 15 weekly newspapers in nine states, is controlled by Houston-based MediaNews Group.  Garden State is 40%-owned by Richmond, Va.-based Media General Inc. Garden State's other owners include William Dean Singleton, chief executive of MediaNews and vice chairman of Garden State, and Richard B. Scudder, chairman of MediaNews.  Garden State also agreed to sell its daily Journal-News in Hamilton, Ohio, and weeklies in Oxford, Mason and Fairfield, Ohio, to Toronto-based Thomson Corp.  China's Deng Xiaoping, supreme leader of one-fifth of the world's population, celebrated his 85th birthday yesterday -- or so we think.  The most remarkable aspect of the celebration was the absence of any certainty that Mr. Deng is still alive.  He has not been seen in public for more than two months.  His most recent appearance was June 9 on Chinese television, when he popped up after a three-week absence to praise the People's Liberation Army for extinguishing the 1989 Tiananmen Square democracy movement.  We note this mainly as a reminder of what's deeply and chronically wrong in Communist China.  It's often argued that communist rule, if it offers no other benefit, has at least conferred stability.  Not exactly.  What communist rule has conferred upon China is an immensely powerful machinery of control, manned by cadres who answer to no one but their own secretive inner circles.  This may provide stability for the 47 million member party, but it's awfully rough on the other 1.1 billion or so citizens.  It's especially rough when the top party members start jostling for the helm.  Mao Tse-tung's maneuvers for power included the catastrophic Great Leap Forward of the late 1950s, which backfired to discredit and greatly disempower Mao for a few years.  Then he grabbed back power in the countercoup known as the Cultural Revolution, which wracked the country from 1966 until Mao's death in 1976.  The total number of Chinese who died due to these party machinations is estimated at 20 million to 30 million.  Today, there is still no institutional mechanism for Mr. Deng to hand over whatever power he's got, or for the Chinese people to have any say in the process.  Mr. Deng holds no official post except his perch atop the army, as chairman of the Military Advisory Commission.  Presumably Mr. Deng is far more powerful than Premier Li Peng.  Perhaps Mr. Deng is still more powerful than President Yang Shangkun -- though Mr. Yang has stacked the PLA top ranks with his relatives.  Small wonder that China shows symptoms of a relapse into the Cultural Revolution -- a terrible trauma.  Civilian militia are posted on the city streets, brought back from the Cultural Revolution days.  Informers are encouraged to turn in anyone who might fail to resolutely support the party line, and thousands have been arrested so far.  These include workers, students and many of China's eminent liberal thinkers, such as economist Li Honglin -- a staunch Marxist who nonetheless dared to endorse democratic freedoms.  The purge does not seem aimed so far at all intellectuals; merely those who might be tempted to think for themselves.  Last week the Chinese government announced that the students who were about to enter the country's leading school, Beijing University, will instead spend the next year undergoing political indoctrination in the army.  To help fend off virulent notions of democracy, China has suspended the Fulbright scholar exchange program with the U.S.  The Beijing regime also has proclaimed that most Chinese students who now aspire to graduate-level studies must first spend a year or two on the farms or in factories -- a policy that starts to echo the rural exile of intellectuals during the Cultural Revolution.  There are also weird thumps and rumbles from within the highest ranks of the party.  Last week there were rumors that the defense minister, Qin Jiwei, had been arrested by troops loyal to President Yang Shangkun.  The Chinese government denied the story, but it was credible enough to send the Hong Kong stock market down almost 4% in the first 90 minutes of trading last Friday.  And former Party Secretary Zhao Ziyang has not been heard from since he expressed some sympathy back in May for the democratic protesters.  Never mind that just over three months ago Mr. Zhao ranked high enough to help welcome Mikhail Gorbachev to the Sino-Soviet summit.  This is not a stable system of government.  It is an arrangement in which the government controls everyone and answers to almost no one; in which the citizens now mark the birthday of a supreme leader whose existence they cannot even be sure of.  The hope is that somehow China may stagger back toward the path of reform.  But as the Communist Party sinks deeper into its secret turmoil over succession, there is one thing the West might want to remember.  During the Cultural Revolution, very few people outside China believed the horrors now accepted as fact.  They were brought on by the same Communist Party that still controls China.  HCC Industries Inc., Encino, Calif., said a group of investors led by top HCC executives proposed to acquire the maker of precision electronic parts by paying $8.50 each for the approximately 1.2 million common shares they don't already own.  The proposal gives the company an indicated value of about $14.5 million, based on 1.7 million common shares outstanding.  The group includes Andrew Goldfarb, president and chief executive officer; Christopher Bateman, vice president and chief financial officer; and Eugene Harrison, vice president of Hermetic Seal Corp., an HCC subsidiary.  Other investors are Steven Goldfarb, Andrew Goldfarb's brother, and the Neubauer family trust, a major HCC shareholder.  The company said holders of about 48.8% of HCC's shares outstanding have agreed to sell to the group.  The proposal is subject to several conditions including board approval, financing and the execution of a definitive agreement.  HCC's common closed yesterday at $8 a share, up $1.75, in national over-the-counter trading.  Tucson Electric Power Co. slashed its quarterly common-stock dividend more than 50% to 40 cents a share from 97.5 cents a share.  The company blamed financial deterioration and uncertainty about the outcome of its rate-boost plea pending before Arizona utility regulators.  The dividend is payable Sept. 25 to stock of record Sept. 11.  The cut doesn't affect dividends on the company's preferred stock, a company spokesman said.  The dividend reduction had been anticipated since last month, when the electric utility said it might cut or even eliminate it.  At the same time last month, Einar Greve, Tucson Electric's former chairman, resigned suddenly amid questions about stock sales by him and other insiders in advance of the adverse news about the company's financial condition.  Currently, the Securities and Exchange Commission is investigating those sales.  Yesterday's announcement came after the close of New York Stock Exchange trading; Tucson Electric common closed at $23.50 a share, unchanged.  In announcing the dividend cut, Tucson Electric cited its disclosure in a recent SEC filing that Arizona utility regulators are likely to slash its request for an annual rate boost of about $80 million.  The utility noted that the Arizona Corporation Commission had ordered the company to end the accumulation of certain purchased power and fuel expenses that had been counted as revenue, which it did effective July 1, and that "the order signals an increased likelihood of an adverse decision in the company's pending base-rate application."  Through June 30, Tucson Electric had accumulated a total of $70 million of the special purchased power and fuel expenses.  In June, the commission provisionally granted the utility only $3.1 million of the $70 million it was seeking through higher electricity rates.  The commission's main rate decision is expected in September.  Tucson Electric's earnings also have plunged.  Second-quarter net income fell to $20.9 million, or 76 cents a share, from $29.9 million, or $1.15 a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $153.2 million from $151.2 million.  The company added that it expects to operate at a loss.  Edward J. Tirello Jr., a utility analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton, said the amount of the reduced dividend indicates that Tucson Electric anticipates "a sustainable earnings level of $2.80 a share" this year, compared with per-share net of $4.95 a share in 1988.  "When a company does a dividend cut it considers what's the worst case scenario, and what sort of sustainable earnings" it has, Mr. Tirello said.  For Tucson Electric, such a worst-case scenario would include an unfavorable rate decision, and increased surplus generating capacity compounded by the addition of a big coal-fired plant that's scheduled to come on line in 1990, Mr. Tirello noted.  The possibility of eliminating or cutting the dividend became evident after a regular board meeting June 27, when Mr. Greve, at the prodding of one director, provided the directors with information about the company's gloomy financial condition.  Board members also discovered that day that the Greve management had ordered a report from the company's investment bankers, Goldman Sachs & Co., but hadn't provided it to outside directors.  Directors demanded copies of the report and scheduled a special meeting June 30.  It was between those meetings, on June 28, that Mr. Greve sold 24,000 of his Tucson Electric shares at an average price of $32.25 a share.  He sold 8,000 more shares for $32 each on July 6, keeping 4,400 shares.  CABLE: Adelphia Communications Corp. definitively agreed to acquire cable-TV systems serving approximately 33,000 subscribers in New York state from a unit of Jones Intercable Inc.  The purchase price wasn't disclosed.  With strike talk in the air and dull performances on stage, it is not too soon to worry about the New York City Opera.  Beverly Sills is of course gone.  She resigned last winter as the company's general director after a 10-year stint.  Her legacy is mixed.  Innovative directors and designers did not flock to the company during those years.  New music was also not much favored.  But the lady worked hard to raise the level of singing (something she did cherish) and a lot of money (another commodity she has always valued).  Her bubbly presence energized the company.  What now?  Where's the company going?  There were grounds to wonder after the new "Don Giovanni" that opened the season last month.  If Christopher Keene, Ms. Sills's successor, survived the evening with any hair and nails, he was either out of town or is tougher than he looks.  A "dramma giocoso" Mozart called his opera, but he wouldn't have if he'd seen this production.  Nothing was dramatic or jocose, just dark and dreary.  This was the first time that Harold Prince, who'd previously strayed from theater direction into opera with some success, had ever put his hands on a masterwork of this order, and he must have trembled, like poor Leporello when the stone statue breaks into song.  He couldn't see the depth in da Ponte's libretto, so he just plunged the Don's Spain in darkness.  The good part was we couldn't see much of Rolf Langenfass's hideous sets, all clogged with statues and trees. (Is this the same Mr. Langenfass who did those wonderfully goofy costumes for the Met's "Ring" cycle?  It's hard to believe.)  The bad part was we could still hear the singers stumbling around, driving us crazy with their tinny, tiny, tune-strangling voices.  Except for tenor Jon Garrison, elegant but erratic of pitch as Don Ottavio, there was nobody onstage singing with even a glimmer of Mozartean style.  In the pit, the orchestra playing for Sergiu Comissiona did not make a good case for the pay raise it is gunning for this season.  In May all contracts expired for instrumentalists, singers, dancers, chorus, directors, and it doesn't look as if any papers are going to be signed tomorrow.  Perhaps when the phone strike is settled, the musicians can be replaced with TouchTone devices from Bell Labs.  Who needs an orchestra anyway when the panicky board cancels the fall season's major new production?  This is no fantasy.  It did just that a few weeks ago in a preemptive strike that removed any threat of a belated New York premiere of Arnold Schoenberg's "Moses und Aron."  This massive relic of the Second Viennese School at its most tunelessly grandiloquent is expensive to produce, what with its Golden Calf orgy, a stage-sized Mount Sinai, not to mention all Ten Commandments and a pillar of fire.  What if the unions struck the premiere, wasting money?  I guess nobody thought Mr. Keene -- never mind his years spent in the company's orchestra pit, shaking the first violinist's hand, smiling at the bassoons, cueing the diva -- would be able to handle his own troops.  What a vote of confidence.  Even if the unions had decided to spoil the opening, the confrontation would have brought the company the kind of press coverage money can't buy and the City Opera's other productions don't deserve.  With such thoughts weighing down my spirits, I rebounded weakly from the crepuscular "Don Giovanni" to see the City Opera revival of Donizetti's "Anna Bolena" last Tuesday.  This was one of Ms. Sills's triumphs in her heyday as a singer with the company in the '70s Golden Age.  The role of Henry VIII's ill-fated queen requires a singing actress.  Maria Callas was a great Anna, and Donizetti composed the part for the Callas of the 1830s, Guiditta Pasta (Judy Noodle).  Pasta once worked herself into such a frenzy that she fainted during a curtain call.  Last week, we heard Marilyn Mims, who dropped to the stage a few times but always got up, I was sorry to see.  Ms. Mims has a pleasant voice and a pretty decent technique.  But her posturing is clumsy and words mean nothing to her.  When Anna cries "Guidici ad Anna]" as she realizes Henry intends to drag her in front of judges who will condemn her, she should be trembling with outrage and pain.  Ms. Mims looked merely cross.  At least the production has held up better than most revivals here.  Thanks to director Jay Lesenger and lighting designer Dawn Chiang, Henry's ladies and courtiers took attractive poses in Ming Cho Lee's cleanly stylized Windsor Castle.  But this was not enough to distract attention from the other vocalists, among them Paul Hartfield's tentative Percy, Harry Dworchak's rough Henry and Mimi Lerner's intensely acted, vocally thin Giovanna Seymour.  I wish there were a way of putting Ms. Mims's voice in Ms. Lerner's body.  But science advances slowly and so art suffers.  It is not widely recognized that this is a major subject of great opera.  But think of Faust, struggling to titrate a homunculus from the alembics and retorts in his lab.  We see this never so vividly as in Boito's "Mefistofele," which has also returned to the repertoire without advancing science or art.  Badly lit, sloppily cued, those once stunning astral projections showing the birth of time and space, evil and good, are now as exciting to watch as century plants.  John Cheek rolled around through the murk in a body stocking that suited him better than Don Giovanni's frock coat a few weeks ago.  As Satan, the bass was finally making the big sounds he has mostly mimed before.  Faust was sung by Robert Grayson, whose bright tenor often pleased, particularly in the prison-scene duet with Frances Ginsberg.  Another refugee from the "Don Giovanni" disaster, the soprano seemed more at home in Boito's arching music, though the phrasing could be more polished.  The rest of the season looks unexciting.  September at least brings a revival of Erich Korngold's dreamy "Die Tote Stadt" -- a production now in its second decade and well-remembered for its moody projections of Bruges.  With any luck, Mr. Keene's taste will run more to such unfamiliar works and interesting staging techniques.  The company needs to replace its creaky look with a cutting-edge style.  Mr. Keene could do worse than pay a visit to Opera at the Academy, a young company that puts on sophisticated, offbeat productions cleverly tailored to an unusual space: a large, rectangular room in what was once a industrial loft in downtown New York.  Last week the company presented Henry Purcell's "Dido and Aeneas," which was written in 1689 for a girls' school.  I have always thought it a boring, fey little distortion of Vergil, but Christopher Alden's direction had some notions amusing enough to make the time pass.  Carthage was replaced by a schoolroom painted Puritan white; the teacher turned into Aeneas, the headmistress into Dido.  They necked a lot on the floor, observed by Belinda and her pal, who writhed energetically on their school desks.  Everyone was enviably dressed in the trademark pleats of designer Mary McFadden.  Maybe Ms. McFadden could go press some pleats for City Opera, and bring along the soprano who looked so good in Dido's black silk, Angelina Reaux, a chunky woman with a powerful personality and a cultivated dark voice.  In a mere two seasons, Ms. Reaux has acquired a large downtown following with her sharp performances of Offenbach and Weill.  So I am sorry to report that Ms. Reaux auditioned for City Opera's upcoming revival of Weill's "Street Scene" and didn't make the cut.  This is crazy.  If Faust today were trying to grow the perfect diva, he'd sure be happy to find Ms. Reaux propagating on a petri dish.  Ounce of Prevention,  In the Shape of a Label  HOPING TO HEAD OFF liability problems, many companies are improving safety labels.  In a survey of 500 chief executives by the Conference Board, a business information service, 47% of the 264 respondents said their firms have made warning labels and instructions more explicit.  "They're trying to idiot-proof the products," says E. Patrick McGuire of the Conference Board.  Ajusto Corp., a maker of adjustable chairs, has beefed up warning labels since liability suits "really blossomed" in the past five years.  It says suits have arisen from people who've tipped over after sitting improperly or racing on wheeled chairs.  "A few years ago, insurance companies never wanted you to indicate someone could be injured using your product," says Dale Barnard, Ajusto president.  "Now they're saying, 'Be specific.'"  Deere & Co. is graphic.  The machinery maker hired Henry Dreyfuss Associates to design safety decals vividly warning what will happen if you aren't careful.  "He suffers so you don't have to," Deere says of the hapless fellow depicted.  Auto Makers Tailor  Cars to Suit Women  AUTO MAKERS are adding details to appeal to women, but with mixed results.  Women bought 47% of all the new cars sold in 1988, up from 36% in 1980, and they influenced selection for most of the rest, Ford Motor says.  Aware of this, many manufacturers have lowered the outside lip of the trunk to make it easier for a smaller person to load parcels.  They've designed larger control buttons and reach-through door handles, making them easier for someone with long fingernails.  They've also added flip-down mirrors for the driver as well as the front passenger.  Chrysler says its new Laser is popular with women, partly because of changes such as an improved view for shorter drivers and a seat that rises as it comes forward.  Concern for women buyers played "an important part" in designing the Taurus, says Joel Pitcoff, Ford's research manager.  Mr. Pitcoff cites a net in the trunk to hold groceries upright and a swiveling vanity mirror.  Companies say that tailoring details to women doesn't hurt the sales appeal for men.  "Good design appeals equally," says Fritz Mayhew, a Ford executive.  But car makers sometimes strike out.  Chrysler says many women didn't like the makeup kit it put in the instrument panel of some models.  GM reports that its thin steering wheels and pink-and-white color schemes haven't set well with female buyers.  "Women don't specifically want to be catered to," says George Angersbach, a GM designer.  Watch for the Future:  A Shadow Creeps In  TIME MAY LOOK different in the future.  A solar-powered wristwatch won first prize in Timex Corp.'s competition to design the "personal timepiece of the future."  The watch, designed by Steven Monti, absorbs energy through a solar cell, which generates a circle for minutes surrounded by a thicker ring for hours on the face of a liquid-crystal display.  The minute circle is divided into 60 sections radiating from the center, and the hour ring into 12 increments.  As time goes by, a black simulated shadow fills up the minute portions.  When all 60 minutes are filled, the hour ring then shows one of its increments filled.  When the hour circle is full, the minute circle clears and begins filling all over again.  Likewise with the hour ring after 12 hours.  Mr. Monti, a North Providence, R.I., designer, says his watch uses "the most ancient element for measuring time-light and shadow."  Building Pieces Make  For a Prefab Lab  THE FINISHING touches are being put on a modular laboratory building that arrived last month at Dartmouth Medical School in 23 pieces.  The pieces, made by Totalab Inc. in Stafford, Texas, came to New Hampshire via flat-bed trucks, with most equipment already installed.  The pieces were simply bolted together, making four laboratories, and then faced with brick to match other campus structures.  The $1.5 million steel and concrete lab cost about what conventional construction would have, but building time was much less.  "We saved at least a year," says Joyce Lai, the medical school's director of facilities.  Totalab, apparently the only company in its field, promises to find a buyer or buy back the lab if the school doesn't want to take it when it relocates three years from now.  LA CUCINA ITALIANA (or is it the Chianti?) makes big tippers of Americans.  To be good at enforcement, the IRS is learning, it must be good at economics, sociology, and curious facts.  It hired University of Illinois researchers to study tipping habits of 13,000 households in 1986 to help judge the extent of waiters' unreported income.  One finding: People ate least often in restaurants with Italian cuisine (2.5% of the time), but tipped the highest there -- 15.8%.  Other tip averages: seafood, 14.1%; Mexican, 14.8%; Chinese, 15%; general menu (58% of the meals), 15.2%.  Between 1983 and 1986, as tastes shifted more to fast food, people ate less often in tipping-type restaurants, but the average tip overall rose to 15.1% from 14.6%.  Yet there was quite a spread: For 30% of the meals, diners left tips exceeding 18%; 9% of the time, the tips fell under 10%.  Tip rates generally were highest in the Northeast and lowest in the interior states.  But even the lowest averages, the IRS learned, were well above the 8% minimum that tax law requires restaurants to report for their employees.  CAN COMPUTERS GUIDE IRS phone aides to correct answers for taxpayers?  The 5,000 "assistors" answered 13.5 million phoned requests for help on tax law in 1988, with mixed results; the General Accounting Office figures 36% of the replies were wrong.  IRS computer experts are working on two projects to help assistors do the job better and easier.  One would eliminate the need to search thousands of pages of reference works by hand; it uses key words to retrieve information from data bases for display on computer screens.  The other would radically change the method of determining what information is needed; potentially, it is far more effective -- and harder and costlier to develop.  With a series of questions and responses displayed on a screen, the "expert system" would lead the assistor through an inquiry designed to discover a caller's real problem and the right solution.  The IRS Boston district is to test the system in 1990.  AN INSURANCE TRUST'S estate-tax exemption survives an untimely death.  You can ease taxes on estates exceeding $1 million with an irrevocable trust; if it owns the life-insurance policy and satisfies other terms, the proceeds fall outside the taxable estate.  But beware of complexities.  One: The IRS argues that an insured person who dies within three years after a policy is bought remains its owner, making proceeds taxable.  Now a Tax Court ruling for the estate of Eddie L. Headrick provides vital clarification, says adviser Sam Radin of National Madison Group, New York.  Headrick, a Cleveland, Tenn., lawyer, died in an auto accident in 1982, less than three years after a trust he created bought a $375,000 policy on his life; he had given the trust cash to pay the premiums.  But Chief Judge Nims, with 17 concurrences, found that Headrick never had any ownership right to the policy; so the court upheld exemption from estate tax for the proceeds.  The trust worked because it was the original buyer of the policy and didn't hold policies that Headrick had owned and transferred to it, Radin says.  FOREIGN CORPORATIONS and individuals doing business in the U.S., but not resident here, must file returns by new deadlines or lose otherwise allowable deductions and credits, under proposed IRS rules.  The cost may be severe for concerns that don't realize they must file returns, says Eli Fink of Deloitte Haskins & Sells, CPAs.  AND YOU THOUGHT?  Individual taxpayers spent less time working on 1987 returns -- 1.6 billion hours -- than they did on 1986 returns -- 1.7 billion hours, IRS researchers say.  They credit tax revision's effects on deductions and other matters.  AFTER THE BALL, rental tuxedos have an economic life of only about two years, Treasury analysts tell Congress in their first required review of depreciable-asset lives.  The rental finery now is part of an asset class assigned a life of nine years.  HOLDING BACK REFUNDS to pay non-tax debts is a job the IRS dislikes.  At agencies' requests, the IRS must withhold refunds and forward them to offset overdue family-support payments or non-tax federal debts, such as student loans.  But the IRS worries that these offset programs may have long-term adverse effects on voluntary tax compliance.  Its researchers studied what taxpayers did in years after their refunds were withheld for other debts.  Now the researchers offer data suggesting that non-tax offsets lead to tax delinquencies.  First, agencies began giving debtors notice in 1985 that they could lose their tax refunds; that year, 47% of child-support delinquents didn't file returns, up from 27% in 1981.  Then, the IRS found, 23% to 27% of all delinquents who lost refunds in 1985 either filed no returns in 1986 or filed returns showing tax due without paying all that they owed; such behavior was shown by only 11% to 12% of a control group of taxpayers who weren't subject to offsets.  The data imply that many delinquents start piling overdue taxes on top of other debts, the IRS says.  BRIEFS: Catherine J. Hill of Long Beach, Calif., who repudiated a settlement in Tax Court, must not only pay the agreed sum, the court says; she also must pay damages of $2,000 for frivolous arguments. . . .  The IRS billed $8.2 million in added taxes to 26,000 taxpayers who failed to file Form 8283 for non-cash charitable gifts exceeding $500 in 1985; the assessments were 26 times the cost of the enforcement.  Dell Computer Corp. said its net income fell about 42% for its second quarter, ended July 28, to $1.9 million, or 10 cents a share.  The Austin, Texas, direct marketer of computers earned $3.3 million, or 19 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales increased 72%, to $95.7 million from $55.5 million.  Average shares increased about 13%, to 19.3 million.  Dell attributed the earnings decline in part to price reductions on computers using the Intel Corp. 80286 microprocessor, a line that is reaching maturity.  Dell also said that its gross margins were affected by the use of parts, primarily memory chips, that were purchased at high prices late last year.  The company said it is whittling down its inventories, which bloated to $104 million at Jan. 27, or enough for 24 weeks of sales.  Dell said it had $73 million in inventory at July 28, enough for 14 weeks of sales.  For the six months, net income declined 36%, to $3.9 million, or 20 cents a share, from $6.1 million, or 38 cents a share, last year.  Sales rose 79%, to $183.2 million from $102.4 million.  Average shares increased to 19.3 million from 16.1 million a year ago.  Bond International Gold Inc. said in Denver that it agreed to sell its Australian subsidiary to Poseidon Ltd. for about $64 million.  Bond said it will receive a gold note maturing over 4 1/2 years for its Bond Gold Australia Pty. unit.  The company said the transaction is expected to be completed within a week.  The sale is subject to certain conditions in a transaction in which Poseidon, an Australian miner, has agreed to receive 38.7 million shares in Gold Mines of Kalgoorlie Ltd. for debt owed by Gold Mines to Poseidon.  Bond International owns about 12% of Gold Mines of Kalgoorlie, and the Bond Gold Australia unit has a long-term contract to manage Gold Mines' operations.  Far in the back of the main floor of the Metropolitan Museum, rising among the marquetry and marble of 18th-century Europe, stands a great green-and-gold vase, nine feet high, and, for all its cramped surroundings, startlingly powerful.  This immense object is known as the Demidoff vase, made for that noble Russian family's Palace of San Donato in Florence.  Its glistening malachite came from the Demidoff mines in the Urals, and its gilt bronze nymphs and laurel leaves were added by goldsmiths in Paris shortly after the Napoleonic era.  The vase eventually was sold to the Vanderbilts and taken to New York, where it presided over the entrance hall of 640 Fifth Avenue at the northwest corner of 51st Street.  This brownstone palace, for it was a palace too, was one of the last and certainly the most celebrated of the old social venues of New York, the home of Mrs. Cornelius Vanderbilt, who lived there until the late 1940s.  Glimpsed across the halls and rooms of the house, the vase was a breathtaking sight, its light more brilliant than anything that surrounded it.  And this was in a vast, competitive interior glowing with Turner landscapes and chandeliers and old silk curtains billowing against French panelling and dusty velvet chairs, save in the music room where the chairs were small and gilt and there stood in a corner a slack-stringed harp.  Mrs. Vanderbilt used her house, which functioned like a minor court, to entertain the great world then.  It was palatially, that is rather carelessly, furnished with what had survived or accumulated in the way of chairs and tables and sofas and mirrors and clocks.  Famous people came to her receptions and balls and dinners and mingled with the old New Yorkers who continued to like the idea of formal and uncommercialized entertainment.  There was no celebrity network then, and the public spending of large sums of money in restaurants or nightclubs meant a good deal less.  Nearly every generation laments the passing of an earlier social scene, as readers of memoirs are well aware.  Nevertheless, it did seem that as a guest at Mrs. Vanderbilt's one had one's claims allowed.  I was first taken to 640 as a 10-year-old boy by my father to a Christmas afternoon reception and let loose in a grave way to wander through the rooms and hall, and the Demidoff vase is what struck me most.  I had started my tour in a large square sky-lit room known as the picture gallery, where rows of dark, rather small pictures in very heavy gold frames with over-lights formed a dense quadrilateral.  This was an art at the end of its declining fashion, "salon" pictures bought by American travelers at the end of the last century, Meissoniers, Viberts, Geromes, historical scenes of picturesque violence and emotional disarray, or of cardinals in full pontificals engaged in keyhole peeping or bibulous games.  The collection of such things in the Vanderbilt house was known as the Gallery, and its pictures were considered as an ensemble period piece, not exactly derided but definitely something destined for oblivion.  The vase stood high in the hall beyond, even more impressive in the contrasting light that descended chiefly from above in creamy drifts and then diffused itself, hard-edged or soft-edged, in the planes of shadow that fell on the marble squares of floor.  That was as close as any of us got to St. Petersburg, I realized later, for although the vase was technically French, its scale and its power were the hallmark of imperial Russian decorative art.  When Mrs. Vanderbilt left 640 and moved up Fifth Avenue to the Starr Miller house on 86th Street, the vase was acquired by the museum.  At the time it was officially described as "one of the most arresting objects to enter its collections in many a day."  No doubt the curator who wrote that had been to Mrs. Vanderbilt's too.  ---  Mr. King is the director of the Foreign Press Center in New York.  George Tweed, 64 years old, was elected corporate senior vice president and chief operating officer of this high-technology company.  Mr. Tweed, who has held several Cubic positions over the past 20 years, headed Cubic's defense systems subsidiary since June 9.  No successor has been named to that post.  In June, Colvin C. "Sam" Wellborn, 56, retired as president of that division.  As previously announced, Cubic was notified May 31 that the defense systems unit is a target of the Pentagon's bribery-scandal investigation.  A company spokesman said Cubic is continuing to cooperate with the government.  It was a sleepy backwater, the Middle East in the early years of this century.  The place was picturesque and hopeless and corrupt.  No Europeans believed that the malady of that civilization could be cured.  This was Europe's southern neighborhood, and its ruined walls and unkempt gardens told of better times.  Then an illusion, born of World War I, took hold of European statesmen: the southern neighborhood was to be awakened and rehabbed.  Onto the ruined domains of the Ottoman Empire descended the soldiers and statesmen of Europe: Winston Churchill, David Lloyd George, T.E. Lawrence, George Curzon, Lord Kitchener of Khartoum, Georges Clemenceau, many others.  They all had a go at the ruined neighborhood.  They painted over the old house, rearranged the thread-bare furniture and divided up the inheritance among themselves.  The story ended badly.  The balance of that old world was broken, but nothing durable was bequeathed it.  This is the tale whose colorful thread David Fromkin pulls together in his ambitious and splendid "The Peace to End All Peace: Creating the Modern Middle East 1914-1922" (Henry Holt, 635 pages, $39.95).  In its large outlines, the tale is familiar.  But Mr. Fromkin is a storyteller with an eye for detail and irony.  To this epic tale of ruin and disillusion he brings the right sensibility: He has no axe to grind, no nationalist orthodoxy to uphold.  He writes of the ambitions of men and nations -- the British and the French, the Greeks, the Turks, the Arabs and the Jews -- with a calm voice.  He writes history from the top down and forthrightly says so.  Mr. Fromkin's is a tale of great men, their large deeds and even larger follies.  Consider these tales: Turkey was finished, Britain's leaders and warriors were sure in 1914.  They were wrong.  At the Dardanelles and on the shores of the Gallipoli Peninsula the Turks fought the Allied armies to a draw.  Plans had been drawn to carve up the Ottoman domains, with czarist Russia putting in its bid for Constantinople.  But in no time the czarist system itself came tumbling down.  Syria would be France's, and it would be so forever, the French asserted.  But a brief, unhappy French dominion in Syria was all that France secured.  Britain would reconcile its commitments to Jew and Arab in Palestine and square those commitments with the pledges made to protect France's interests in the Levant.  But the competing claims of Arab and Jew in Palestine would not be reconciled, nor was the struggle for Syria between Britain's Arab allies and the French amenable to a resolution.  The tide had run out for empires.  Lloyd George, Britain's prime minister, the would-be architect of a new order in the Middle East, wanted British hegemony on the cheap.  But no skill or bravado would redeem the fatal flaws in Britain's design: the absence of will and resources.  Indeed it is Mr. Fromkin's central contention that somewhere along the line, over the course of the turbulent decade he covers, the heart and the conviction went out of Britain's bid for primacy.  Glory deserted the imperial enterprise.  Mr. Fromkin tells the suicidal tale of Greece's push into Anatolia in 1921-1922.  This was a disastrous project that Lloyd George was particularly sympathetic to.  The politician who was brought up on the Bible had seen the destruction of the Ottoman Empire as the great event of his time; he was sympathetic to the resurgence of Hellenism in Asia Minor.  In the end, the Greek scheme issued in disaster for Greece and Smyrna (now Izmir), the principal city of Asia Minor, the city of minorities and trade.  Lloyd George had nothing concrete to offer, just windy words: "Greece must go through the wilderness, she must live on manna picked up from the stones, she must struggle through the stern trial of the present time," he told a Greek interlocutor.  Much of Smyrna was put to the torch.  And the Turk, pushed against the wall, found a savior -- Mustapha Kemal Ataturk.  There were smaller domains of the old Ottoman Empire: the Arab domains.  They were partitioned between Britain and France.  The colonial rulers went to work, creating new political entities.  The French put together the state of Lebanon as we now know it to guarantee the primacy of their Christian wards.  Winston Churchill pasted the kingdom of Jordan out of desert wilderness.  Iraq, too, was patched together, out of Sunni and Shiite Arabs and Kurds.  Thus did the colonial rulers sow the winds, flinging people into strange concoctions.  The diplomatic settlement of the Middle Eastern question in the aftermath of World War I casts a long shadow across our world.  The work of the men who put together that settlement, Mr. Fromkin observes, is "being contested by force of arms, year after year, in the ruined streets of Beirut, along the banks of the slow-moving Tigris-Euphrates and by the waters of the Biblical Jordan."  In today's Middle East, millennial passions and new machines have created a monstrous new world.  No Kitcheners, no T.E. Lawrences wander there: It has been blown away, that old neighborhood.  ---  Mr. Ajami is professor of Middle East Studies at Johns Hopkins University.  D. Raymond Riddle, executive vice president and chief banking officer of First Wachovia Corp., was named to this information services company's board in an expansion of the board to 12 from 11.  Barring last-minute delays, Tadeusz Mazowiecki will be elected prime minister of Poland by Parliament tomorrow, and set about forming East Europe's first non-Communist-led regime in more than 40 years.  He will then assemble a coalition cabinet amid much backbiting, infighting and allegations of betrayal -- in short he will be conducting politics that are usual for Western democracies but highly unusual, and highly exciting, here.  The delicate task of balancing competing interests in the new government apparently caused Mr. Mazowiecki's confirmation as prime minister to be delayed; it had been scheduled for today.  Meanwhile, corridors and restaurants of the once morgue-like Sejm, Poland's parliament, bustle as members of various political stripes meet, plot, whisper and get ready to run a government far different from the centrally planned Communist one that imploded earlier this year.  The soft-spoken, unpretentious new premier will be presiding over major changes.  In an interview in the French newspaper Le Monde, Mr. Mazowiecki said he wants to create a "normal" government and economy gradually in digestable stages.  His goal, he said, is nothing short of "passing from a totalitarian system to a democratic one."  This passage will require changes not only in Poland itself but especially in two major institutions, Solidarity and the Communist Party.  For Solidarity, the challenge remains to transform itself from a militant trade union capturing the public imagination with strikes and civil disobedience, into a competent governing party.  "There's no question that we weren't ready to take power, but we had to take the responsibility," says Solidarity journalist Krzystof Sliwinski, referring to the unexpected political deal last week that brought Solidarity to power.  "The most important thing we've got going for us is psychological," he says.  "Ten days ago people were very unhappy and politics was stalemated.  Now we've given people hope."  One sign psychology works: Strikers in one town returned to work saying they wanted to give the new government a chance.  But to fulfill people's hopes, Solidarity needs more quick victories.  Its strategists say good weather leading to good grain harvests should win it relief from food shortages for some time.  They also plan to work quickly on assembling accurate economic statistics as a prelude to negotiating an austerity plan under the auspices of the International Monetary Fund.  "Even if it is a tough austerity plan, people will see it as something tangible, as movement away from chaos," Mr. Sliwinski says.  Prime Minister-designate Mazowiecki told Le Monde: "It's no longer enough just to say everything is terrible.  The time has come to say how to get out of this mess, even if the truth is difficult."  Meanwhile, the Communist Party -- which after 40 years of habit people here still call "the party," as if there were no other -- is facing tough reforms of its own.  It suddenly finds itself just another political party, and the country's least popular one at that.  It actually has to appeal to voters.  A growing band of Communists in Parliament -- perhaps 35 of the 173 Communist members -- wants the party to adopt a free-market approach to the economy that could get them elected as moderate socialists in most Western European countries.  "If the Party Congress next spring doesn't do this, we will have to consider forming a new splinter party," says Les zek Jaskiewicz, the head of the party's branch at Warsaw University.  The trend, most younger party members agree, is toward a free-market oriented society with a "safety net" of social protection and an active, though not overwhelming, state.  Most Westerners would call this social democracy -- or beyond.  "It will certainly be democracy and we will see if it even stays social democracy," says Communist member of Parliament Wlodzimierz Cimoszewicz.  Already most Polish Communists have given up on their old industrial model, where companies really had no owners, because state bureaucracies couldn't keep tabs on them.  Andrzej Bratowski, another Communist reformer, says he knows of one state-owned alcohol maker that doesn't pay any taxes to the state because its state-owned industrial customers don't pay their bills.  "We have got to start over," Mr. Bratowski says.  This Communist's solutions include a hefty dose of the free market -- which already worked in increasing farm output -- and could help get more small and medium-size companies off the ground.  He adds that he doesn't have any philosophical objections to even Thatcher-style public offerings of big state companies, "But nobody in Poland has the money to buy them."  As for the party itself, Mr. Bratowski says it must "transform itself from a religious cult into a political party.  It won't be easy."  The stakes for Poland are high in both the transformation of the Communists into a real party and the transformation of Solidarity from a movement to a government.  Mr. Sliwinski, the Solidarity journalist, says he fears that if the economy continues to deteriorate, hard-liners in the Communist and Solidarity-unionist camps could cause trouble by preaching populist opposition to the free market.  "Both extremes use the same simple slogans and appeal to the same nationalistic strains," he says.  "They could cause us real trouble."  Petroleum-futures prices moved mostly higher, continuing a rebound from recent weakness.  The rise in prices added as much as 30 cents a barrel to some of the world's crude oil and helped to shake petroleum markets out of the summer doldrums.  But the rise stalled before being fully reflected in U.S. futures trading, and oil analysts and traders generally lacked confidence about the duration of the new firming of prices.  In European markets, spot prices of North Sea and North African crudes were higher by 10 cents to 20 cents a barrel, according to the Dow Jones International Petroleum Report.  One major Middle East crude increased 30 cents a barrel.  In U.S. futures trading, gasoline strengthened.  But crude prices were unchanged to modestly higher even though yesterday marked the expiration of the September contract.  Traders and analysts had expected heavy activity in that contract, and there was a buying spurt early in the day.  "Most of the fireworks was in the September contract, and that caused the early strength," said R. B. Hoover, an energy-futures broker for Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., New York.  But West Texas Intermediate crude for September delivery settled on the New York Mercantile Exchange at $19.08 a barrel, the same as Monday's close.  The October crude rose five cents to settle at $18.69, and the November contract was up seven cents to $18.50.  Petroleum-product prices were mixed on the New York Mercantile Exchange, but unleaded gasoline for September delivery was up 0.76 cent a gallon to close at 53.58 cents.  October and November contracts were up 0.47 cent and 0.46 cent, respectively.  Traders cited a number of uncertainties affecting the price outlook.  Not the least, they said, is the actual level of second-half petroleum demand.  Oil inventories are important in determining demand.  For this reason, reports on U.S. oil by the American Petroleum Institute and the Department of Energy are being watched closely.  "A lot of traders seem confused and are looking toward the API and DOE reports for further direction," said Andrew Lebow, a trader and energy analyst with E. D. & F. Man, New York.  The latest API report, released yesterday after the close of trading, showed across-the-board increases last week in inventories of crude oil and most fuels.  Inventories increased nearly 4.5 million barrels for crude oil, one million barrels for gasoline and 1.1 million barrels for distillate fuels.  Mr. Lebow called the API report "slightly bearish."  In other commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Most soybean-futures prices rose in the wake of less-than-expected rains across the Midwest and a forecast for warmer temperatures later this week.  Soybean prices are especially sensitive to weather developments because much of the Midwest crop is at the stage in which rainfall has its greatest influence on potential yield.  The price of the soybean contract for August delivery dropped sharply on thin volume as trading in the contract expired yesterday.  The final day of trading in a contract is often volatile.  Corn-futures prices rose slightly while wheat-futures prices settled mixed.  SUGAR: Futures prices rose strongly on rumors that India bought physical sugar in the world market.  The October contract rose 0.60 cent a pound to end at 13.95 cents, which was just 0.05 cent below the high of the day.  Reports circulated that India had bought 300,000 tons of raw sugar and 250,000 tons of refined, but analysts and dealers couldn't confirm the purchases.  India had originally been expected to buy 300,000 tons of raw sugar, but for several days there have been reports that the purchases of raw and refined had taken place, one analyst said.  Another analyst contended that if the larger transaction had indeed occurred, prices would have been much higher in futures.  A sugar dealer said India might have solicited offerings from a small number of dealers.  But if these dealers had sold sugar to India, he said, there was no sign that they were "lifting their hedges" -- market jargon for buying back short positions they took in futures to protect the value of the physical sugar they owned from price drops.  Such hedges are lifted, or reversed, when the sugar is sold to a customer.  A third analyst said that while the Indian reports were a factor, the market also could be rebounding from a decline of more than a cent a pound since Aug. 11.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices showed little change in quiet trading.  December-delivery gold ended unchanged from the previous session at $374.50 an ounce.  September silver was off 0.80 cent an ounce at $5.235.  October platinum edged $2.10 an ounce higher to $489.80.  One analyst said the markets' impassiveness was surprising in light of yesterday's selloff in the dollar and rebound in the Commodity Research Bureau index, which are both factors that would normally be price-supporting.  Precious-metals prices usually move opposite to the dollar, and increases in the CRB index are regarded as a measure of potential inflation.  "It's apparent that metals traders regarded the moves in the dollar and the CRB as not meaningful and only of a temporary nature," the analyst said.  According to Bernard Savaiko, analyst for PaineWebber, New York, the lull in activity reflects the confusion as to where the economy is going and what the response of the Federal Reserve will be.  "People are using the summertime and vacations to justify the lack of action, but over the years, there have been some hot markets during the summertime," Mr. Savaiko said.  "What is needed is a clearer perspective of what's happening to the economy," he said. 